And remember, each 10,000 mile journey begins with just one step.
All good things come to an end
Dig the Well Before You Are Thirsty 
Teach a Man to Fish 
One Only Learns From One’s Mistakes 
It’s Better to Make Slow Progress Than No Progress at All 
Opportunity Knocks But Once 
Learn to Walk Before You Run 
The Master Leads You to the Door, the Rest is Up to You
He Who Asks A Question 
repair (bind with silk) your house before the rain comes, make sure that you are prepared for a rainy day.
Giving a man a fish is not equal to teaching a man to fish.
Give a man a fish and you feed him for one day. Teach a man to fish and you feed him for a lifetime.
Fall into the pit, a gain in your wit or Fall into the moat and you’ll be wiser next time.
Be not afraid of growing slowly, be afraid of standing still.
Altogether, it’s impossible to become fat with just one mouthful.
English translation: He who asks a question is a fool for five minutes; he who does not ask a question remains a fool forever.
When one door shuts another opens.
A small hole not mended in time will become a big hole much more difficult to mend.
English equivalent: "What's past is prologue." or "A stitch in time saves nine."
Meaning: Fix something while it can be fixed. Don't wait until it's too late to do so.
"Destroy the seed of evil, or it will grow up to your ruin."
Aesop, "The Swallow and the Other Birds" (c. 6th century BC)
郭唯真Meaning: Study requires utmost attention and overlooking one thing can cost all credibility.
"When reading, don’t let a single word escape your attention; one word may be worth a thousand pieces of gold."
The edge of the sword comes from sharpening, and the fragrance of plum blossom comes from the bitter cold.
Meaning: Hardship can make a person stronger
Meaning: The energy of the old generation inspires the new.
汉语成语俗语对照词典Reading ten thousand books is not as useful as traveling ten thousand miles.
English equivalent: An ounce of practice is worth a pound of theory.
English: When the wind changes direction, some people build walls while others build windmills[1]
Careful with others is a must have.
English equivalent: He that reckons without his host must reckon again.
Fortune does not come twice. Misfortune does not come alone.
Meaning: Good things will only come once. Bad things will always come in groups.
English equivalent: Misery loves company.
Meaning: Opportunities should not be taken for granted. A problem ignored is a problem doubled.
A problem shared is a problem halved. A joy shared is a joy doubled.
Father's debt, son to give back.
Meaning: The new generation can fix the mistakes made by previous ones.
"New generation can put right the mistakes of the old."
"To do the opposite of something is also a form of imitation."
Do not harbour intentions to hurt others.
English translation: Do not desire to hurt others in the depths of your heart.
Meaning: Don't put off until tomorrow what can be finished today.
Wine makes words from secrets.
Meaning: Alcohol can make you or others say things they shouldn't
English equivalent: In wine there is truth.
English equivalent: Where there's smoke, there's fire.
"Nothing in life is to be feared, it is only to be understood."
"It is supposed that if there is a rumour, there must be some truth behind it."
Good medicine tastes bitter.
Meaning: What may be good for us later may be hard for us now.
English equivalent: Bitter pills may have blessed effects.
"Present afflictions may tend to our future good."
Having such a father must be such a son.
English equivalent: Like father, like son.
Meaning: Every person bears resemblance to the ones who brought them into this world.
Man's schemes are inferior to those made by heaven.
English equivalents: Man proposes and God disposes; The best laid plans of mice and men often go awry.
To hit a dog with a meat-bun, so it leaves never turning around. Meaning: Punishment gives less incentive than a reward.
Three monks have no water to drink. English equivalent: Too many cooks spoil the broth.
Try to save the dead horse as if it is still alive.
"You are braver than you believe, stronger than you seem, and smarter than you think."
Meaning: Teachers open the door. You enter by yourself.
"Boys must not have th' ambitious care of men,
Nor men the weak anxieties of age."
Translation: Teach a man to take a fish is not equal to teach a man how to fish.
English equivalent: Give a man a fish and you feed him for a day. Teach a man to fish and you feed him for a lifetime. Learn from him and you feed yourself.
Translation: When the tree falls, the monkeys scatter.
English equivalent: Rats desert a sinking ship.
Translation: Not only can water float a boat, it can sink it also.
Meaning: Nature can help and harm you. The people (the water) can raise someone (a boat) to power, but can also take that power away (sinking the boat).
Think three times before you move.
English equivalent: Measure twice, cut once.
Meaning: One should always act only after due consideration. A hasty action may involve an improper consideration of important aspects.
The sky is big and the emperor is far away.
English Equivalent: When the cat is away, the mice will play.
"When authorities warn you of the sinfulness of sex, there is an important lesson to be learned. Do not have sex with the authorities."
Listen to all, 'plucking a feather from every passing goose,' but follow no one absolutely.
One bitten by a snake for a snap dreads a rope for a decade.
English equivalent: A burnt child dreads the fire; Once bitten, twice shy.
If one does not plow, there will be no harvest.
English equivalent: Sow thin, reap thin.
Meaning: Work hard and you shall gain success.
中四普通If you have money you can make the devil push your grind stone.
English equivalents: Money talks; money makes the world go round.
English equivalent: A single slip may cause lasting sorrow.
English equivalent: All that is fair must fade.
Those who help themselves, God will help.
English equivalent: Heaven helps those who help themselves.
"If thy hope be anything worth, it will purify thee from thy sins."
Translation and English equivalent: Early bird gets the worm. Early worm gets eaten.
Meaning: "Those who are late to act, arrive, or get up tend to miss opportunities already seized by those who came earlier."
Seeing is believing.
陳世琪Misfortune comes on horseback and departs on foot
孙莹莹Rome wasn't built in a day.
孙莹莹For want of a nail, the shoe was lost, for want of a shoe, the horse was lost, for want of a horse, the messenger was lost, for want of a messenger, the battle was lost, for want of a battle, the kingdom was lost.
陳榮吉Love is blind.
姚昆群When in Rome, do as the Romans do.
王勤Enjoy the present day, trusting little to what tomorrow may bring.
陳榮吉The pitcher goes so often to the well that it is broken at last.
思言It is a blessing in disguise.
王树山Don't hear one and judge two.
武占坤Time flies like an arrow.
朱安群Money talks
中国谚语资料The longest mile is the last mile home.
毅That government is best which governs least.
潘禮文Do not judge a book by its cover.
陳榮吉He who sows the wind shall reap the whirlwind.
If you fail to plan, you plan to fail.
朱安群Life is short, and art long.
The wheel of fortune is forever in motion.
What is bred in the bone will not go out of the flesh.
王和卿Catching crabs on the mountain — difficult
There is no building bridges across the ocean.
Absence makes the heart grow fonder.
What goes around comes around.
张印栋When one blind man leads several blind men, before long all will fall into a fire pit.
If the blind lead the blind, both shall fall into the ditch.
He that leaves the highway to cut short, commonly goes about.
陳世琪Knowing yourself is the beginning of all wisdom.
It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it.
Happiness depends upon ourselves.
Anybody can become angry – that is easy, but to be angry with the right person and to the right degree and at the right time and for the right purpose, and in the right way – that is not within everybody’s power and is not easy.
Excellence is never an accident. It is always the result of high intention, sincere effort, and intelligent execution; it represents the wise choice of many alternatives – choice, not chance, determines your destiny.
Educating the mind without educating the heart is no education at all.
Pleasure in the job puts perfection in the work.
What is a friend? A single soul dwelling in two bodies.
The whole is greater than the sum of its parts.
We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act, but a habit.
You have power over your mind – not outside events. Realize this, and you will find strength.
Everything we hear is an opinion, not a fact. Everything we see is a perspective, not the truth.
Waste no more time arguing about what a good man should be. Be one.
If you are distressed by anything external, the pain is not due to the thing itself, but to your estimate of it; and this you have the power to revoke at any moment.
The happiness of your life depends upon the quality of your thoughts.
When you arise in the morning think of what a privilege it is to be alive, to think, to enjoy, to love…
The best revenge is to be unlike him who performed the injury.
It is not death that a man should fear, but he should fear never beginning to live.
Our life is what our thoughts make it.
If it is not right do not do it; if it is not true do not say it.
The supreme art of war is to subdue the enemy without fighting.
If you know the enemy and know yourself, you need not fear the result of a hundred battles. If you know yourself but not the enemy, for every victory gained you will also suffer a defeat. If you know neither the enemy nor yourself, you will succumb in every battle.
Let your plans be dark and impenetrable as night, and when you move, fall like a thunderbolt.
All warfare is based on deception.
Victorious warriors win first and then go to war, while defeated warriors go to war first and then seek to win.
In the midst of chaos, there is also opportunity.
Appear weak when you are strong, and strong when you are weak.
The greatest victory is that which requires no battle.
Treat your men as you would your own beloved sons. And they will follow you into the deepest valley.
There is no instance of a nation benefiting from prolonged warfare.
We suffer more in imagination than in reality.
Luck is what happens when preparation meets opportunity.
All cruelty springs from weakness.
Difficulties strengthen the mind, as labor does the body.
It is not because things are difficult that we do not dare, it is because we do not dare that they are difficult.
As is a tale, so is life: not how long it is, but how good it is, is what matters.
He who is brave is free.
True happiness is to enjoy the present, without anxious dependence upon the future, not to amuse ourselves with either hopes or fears but to rest satisfied with what we have, which is sufficient.
You act like mortals in all that you fear, and like immortals in all that you desire.
It is not the man who has too little, but the man who craves more, that is poor.
The beginning is the most important part of the work.
Wise men speak because they have something to say; fools because they have to say something.
We can easily forgive a child who is afraid of the dark; the real tragedy of life is when men are afraid of the light.
The greatest wealth is to live content with little.
The measure of a man is what he does with power.
One of the penalties for refusing to participate in politics is that you end up being governed by your inferiors.
Good people do not need laws to tell them to act responsibly, while bad people will find a way around the laws.
Only the dead have seen the end of war.
The price good men pay for indifference to public affairs is to be ruled by evil men.
The first and greatest victory is to conquer yourself; to be conquered by yourself is of all things most shameful and vile.
“Although you may spend your life killing, you will not exhaust all your foes. But if you quell your own anger, your real enemy will be slain.”
“Beware the barrenness of a busy life.”
“What we are today comes from our thoughts of yesterday, and our present thoughts build our life of tomorrow. Our life is the creation of our mind.”
“Watch a man in times of…adversity to discover what kind of man he is; for then at last words of truth are drawn from the depths of his heart, and the mask is torn off.”
“It is a painful thing to look at your own trouble and know that you yourself and no one else has made it.”
“Apply yourself both now and in the next life. Without effort, you cannot be prosperous. Though the land be good, you cannot have an abundant crop without cultivation.”
“True wisdom comes to each of us when we realize how little we understand about life, ourselves, and the world around us.”
“I am all that hath been, and is, and shall be and my veil no mortal has hitherto raised.” Plutarch, Greek philosopher, 46 B.C.-after 119 A.D.
“No man ever steps in the same river twice, for it’s not the same river and he’s not the same man.”
“The art of living is more like wrestling than dancing.”
“Happiness resides not in possessions, and not in gold, happiness dwells in the soul.” Democritus, Greek philosopher, 460-370 B.C.
“The more man meditates upon good thoughts, the better will be his world and the world at large.” Confucius, Chinese politician and philosopher, 551-479 B.C.
“The happy man is the one who has a healthy body, a wealthy soul and a well-educated nature.” Thales of Miletus, Greek philosopher, born 626 B.C.
“True happiness is… to enjoy the present without anxious dependence on the future.” Seneca the Younger, Stoic philosopher, 4 B.C.-66 A.D.
“Happiness and freedom begin with one principle. Some things are within your control, and some are not.” Epictetus, Stoic philosopher, 55-155 A.D.
“Happy is the man who has broken the chains which hurt the mind and has given up worrying once and for all. Ovid, Roman poet, 43 B.C.- 17 or 18 A.D.
“The greatest blessings of mankind are within us and within our reach. A wise man is content with his lot, whatever it may be, without wishing for what he has not.” Seneca the Younger, Stoic philosopher, 4 B.C.-66 A.D.
“If you are depressed, you are living in the past. If you are anxious, you are living in the future. If you are at peace, you are living in the present.” Lao-Tzu, Chinese philosopher and writer, born 571 B.C.
“He is a wise man who does not grieve for the things which he has not but rejoices for those which he has.” Epictetus, Stoic philosopher, 55-155 A.D.
“Friends show their love in times of trouble, not in happiness.” Euripides, Greek playwright, 480-406 B.C.
“One of the most beautiful qualities of true friendship is to understand and to be understood.” Seneca the Younger, Stoic philosopher, 4 B.C.-66 A.D.
“Love your enemies, do good to them that hate you, bless them that curse you, and pray for them that despitefully use you.” Jesus Christ, religious figure, 1st century
“Love is composed of a single soul inhabiting two bodies.” Aristotle, Greek philosopher, 384-322 B.C.
“There is no duty more obligatory than the repayment of kindness.” Marcus Tullius Cicero, Roman lawyer and philosopher, 107-43 B.C.
“Enjoy life with the woman whom you love all the days of your fleeting life which He has given to you under the sun; for this is your reward,” Solomon, king of Israel, 990-931 B.C.
“Every heart sings a song, incomplete, until another heart whispers back. Those who wish to sing always find a song. At the touch of a lover, everyone becomes a poet.” Plato, Greek philosopher, 424-348 B.C.
“Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, while loving someone deeply gives you courage.” Lao-Tzu, Chinese philosopher and writer, born 571 B.C.
“One word frees us of all the weight and pain in life, that word is Love.” Sophocles, Greek philosopher, 497-406 B.C.
“Fortune and love favor the brave.” Ovid, Roman poet, 43 B.C.- 17 or 18 A.D.
“Glory ought to be the consequence, not the motive of our actions.” Pliny the Younger, Roman lawyer, author and magistrate, 61-113 A.D.
“Lust for power is the most flagrant of all the passions.” Tacitus, Roman historian and politician, 56-120 A.D.
“Prefer a loss to a dishonest gain: the one brings pain for a moment, the other for all time.” Chilon of Sparta, Greek sage, 6th century B.C.
“We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence then, is not an act, but a habit.” Aristotle, Greek philosopher, 384-322 B.C.
“People in their handling of affairs often fail when they are about to succeed. If one remains as careful at the end as he was at the beginning, there will be no failure.” Lao-Tzu, Chinese philosopher and writer, born 571 B.C.
“They can conquer who believe they can.” Virgil, Roman poet, 70 B.C.-19 A.D.
“Small opportunities are often the beginning of great enterprises.” Demosthenes, Greek statesman and orator, 484-422 B.C.
“When you are inspired by some great purpose, some extraordinary project, all your thoughts break their bonds.” Patanjali, Indian sage and author, 2nd century A.D.
“All things will be produced in superior quantity and quality, and with greater ease, when each man works at a single occupation, in accordance with his natural gifts, and at the right moment, without meddling with anything else.”Plato, Greek philosopher, 424-348 B.C.
“Whoever walks with the wise will become wise, but the companion of fools suffers harm.” Solomon, king of Israel, 990-931 B.C.
“Good character is not formed in a week or a month. It is created little by little, day by day. Protracted and patient effort is needed to develop good character.” Heraclitus of Ephesus, Greek philosopher, 535-475 B.C.
“Waste no more time arguing about what a good man should be. Be one.” Marcus Aurelius, emperor of Rome, 121-180 A.D.
“Do not say a little in many words, but a great deal in few.” Pythagoras, Greek mathematician and philosopher, 570-495 B.C.
“Difficulties strengthen the mind as labor does the body.” Seneca the Younger, Stoic philosopher, 4 B.C.-66 A.D.
“A room without books is like a body without a soul.” Marcus Tullius Cicero, Roman lawyer and philosopher, 107-43 B.C.
“If a man’s mind becomes pure, his surroundings will also become pure.” Buddha, founder of Buddhism, 4th century B.C.
“Life is a series of natural and spontaneous changes. Don’t resist them; that only creates sorrow. Let reality be reality. Let things flow naturally forward in whatever way they like.” Lao-Tzu, Chinese philosopher and writer, born 571 B.C.
“The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing.” Socrates, classical Greek philosopher, 470 or 469 B.C.-399 B.C.
“No one saves us but ourselves. No one can and no one will. We ourselves must walk the path.” Buddha, founder of Buddhism, 4th century B.C.
“Nothing is ever said that has not been said before.” Terence, Roman African playwright, 195-159 B.C.
“Avarice and luxury, those evils which have been the ruin of every great state.” Livy, Roman historian, 64 B.C.-12 A.D.
“Better to be wise by the misfortunes of others than by your own.” Aesop, Greek storyteller, 620-564 B.C.
“In our play we reveal what kind of people we are.” Ovid, Roman poet, 43 B.C.- 17 or 18 A.D.
“Short is the joy that guilty pleasure brings.” Euripides, Greek playwright, 480-406 B.C.
“Without feelings of respect, what is there to distinguish men from beasts?” Confucius, Chinese politician and philosopher, 551-479 B.C.
“Men seek retreats for themselves – in the country, by the sea, in the hills – and you yourself are particularly prone to this yearning. But all this is quite unphilosophic, when it is open to you, at any time you want, to retreat into yourself. No retreat offers someone more quiet and relaxation than that into his own mind.” Marcus Aurelius, emperor of Rome, 121-180 A.D.
“Time is the wisest counselor of all.” Pericles, Greek statesman and Athenian general, 495-429 B.C.
“When I let go of what I am, I become what I might be.” Lao-Tzu, Chinese philosopher and writer, born 571 B.C.
“Victorious warriors win first and then go to war, while defeated warriors go to war first and then seek to win.” Sun Tzu, Chinese general, military strategist, writer and philosopher, 544-496 B.C.
“The bravest are surely those who have the clearest vision of what is before them, glory and danger alike, and yet notwithstanding, go out to meet it.” Thucydides, Greek historian and Athenian general, 460-400 B.C.
“Only the dead have seen the end of war.” Plato, Greek philosopher, 424-348 B.C.
“We make war so that we may live in peace.” Aristotle, Greek philosopher, 384-322 B.C.
“No man is so foolish as to desire war and not peace; for in peace children take their parents to the grave, in war it is the parents who take the children to the grave.” Herodotus, Greek writer, geographer and historian, 484-425 B.C.
“The laws are silent when weapons speak.”Marcus Tullius Cicero, Roman lawyer and philosopher, 107-43 B.C.
“There is no instance of a nation benefitting from prolonged warfare.” Sun Tzu, Chinese general, military strategist, writer and philosopher, 544-496 B.C.
"While we're talking, envious time is fleeing; pluck the day, put no trust in the future." 
Make the most of today, because there's no guarantee you'll be around tomorrow. And even if you are, who knows what tomorrow will hold?
"The Fox and the Grapes" remind us that it is easy to despise what you cannot get.
Omnium Rerum Principia Parva Sunt – ‘ The beginnings of all things are small.’
Vixere – ‘They lived.’ (after the execution of the participants in the Catilinarian conspiracy; meaning: “they are dead”).
Semper Idem – ‘Always the same.’
Pecunia Nervus Belli – ‘Money is the soul (or sinew) of war.’
Male Parta Male Dilabuntur – ‘What has been wrongly gained is wrongly lost.’
Amor Vincit Omnia – ‘Love conquers all.’
Non Omnia Possumus Omnes – ‘We can’t all of us do everything.’
Aere Perennius – ‘More lasting than bronze.’
Permitte Divis Cetera – ‘Leave all else to the gods.’
Omnes Una Manet Nox – ‘One night awaits everyone.’
Carpe Diem – ‘Seize the day.’
Nil Desperandum – ‘Never despair!’
Veritas Odit Moras – ‘Truth hates delay.’
Timendi Causa Est Nescire – ‘The cause of fear is ignorance.’
Vivamus, Moriendum Est – ‘Let us live, since we must die.’
Nemo Sine Vitio Est – ‘No one is without fault.’
Magna Servitus Est Magna Fortuna – ‘A great fortune is a great slavery.’
Vitam Impendere Vero – ‘Dedicate your life to truth.’
Mens Sana In Corpore Sano – ‘A healthy mind in a healthy body.’
Panem et Circenses – ‘Bread and circuses.’
Quis Costodiet Ipsos Custodies? – ‘Who will guard the guards?’
Ars Longa, Vita Brevis – ‘Art is long, life is short.’ – Hippocrates.
Vade Retro Me, Satana – ‘Get off my back, Satan.’
In Vino Veritas – ‘Truth in Wine.’ – Pliny the Elder
Acta est Fabula, Plaudite! – ‘The play is over, applaud!’ – Augustus
Quis, Quid, Ubi, Quibus Auxiliis, Cur, Quomodo, Quando? – ‘Who, what, where, with what, why, how, when?’– Quintilian
Alea Jacta Est – ‘The die is cast.’ — Julius Caesar
Exitus Acta Probat – ‘The result justifies the deed.’ — Ovid
Fiat Lux – ‘Let there be light.’ — Old Testament ‐ Genesis 1:3
Caveat Emptor – ‘Let the buyer beware.’ 
What you leave behind is not what is engraved in stone monuments, but what is woven into the lives of others.
Our greatest glory is not in never falling, but in rising every time we fall.
The man who moves a mountain begins by carrying away small stones.
The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing.
When you are content to be simply yourself and don't compare or compete, everybody will respect you.
Life is really simple, but we insist on making it complicated.
The method of trying to conquer hatred through hatred never succeeds in overcoming hatred. But, the method of overcoming hatred through non-hatred is eternally effective. That is why that method is described as eternal wisdom.
Ancient wisdom offers . . . a simple yet profound formula to guide everyone who leads, anyone who aspires to leadership: 'Do justly, love mercy, and walk humbly.'
When anger rises, think of the consequences.
Love is composed of a single soul inhabiting two bodies.
He who conquers others is strong; He who conquers himself is mighty.
To sit patiently with a yearning that has not yet been fulfilled, and to trust that, that fulfillment will come, is quite possibly one of the most powerful "magic skills" that human beings are capable of. It has been noted by almost every ancient wisdom tradition
[All the ancient wisdom] tells us that work is necessary to us, as much a part of our condition as mortality; that good work is our salvation and our joy; that shoddy or dishonest or self-serving work is our curse and our doom. We have tried to escape the sweat and sorrow promised in Genesis - only to find that, in order to do so, we must forswear love and excellence, health and joy. (pg. 44, "The Unsettling of America")
There's a bit of ancient wisdom that appeals to us: it's a saying that a fight starts only with the second blow.
Choose a job you love, and you will never have to work a day in your life.
Silence is the true friend that never betrays.
As is a tale, so is life: not how long it is, but how good it is, is what matters. I wish you all very good lives.
...I believe, with Gandhi, that we need to take an imaginative leap forward toward fresh and generous idealism for the sake of all humanity - that we neeed to renew this ancient wisdom of nonviolence, to strive for a disarmed world, and to create a culture of nonviolence.
Those who attempt to conquer hatred by hatred are like warriors who take weapons to overcome others who bear arms. This does not end hatred, but gives it room to grow. But, ancient wisdom has advocated a different timeless strategy to overcome hatred. This eternal wisdom is to meet hatred with non-hatred. The method of trying to conquer hatred through hatred never succeeds in overcoming hatred. But, the method of overcoming hatred through non-hatred is eternally effective. That is why that method is described as eternal wisdom.
Ancient wisdom: deal in personal trust; your word is your bond; avoid extremes; treat the money you invest for others as something sacred; don't take any more perks than you would wish others to take; don't borrow what you couldn't suddenly pay back; imagine the worse case financial scenario and expect it very may well happen; the wealthier you become the more humble you should act.
Modern physics is describing what the ancient wisdom keepers of the Americas have long known. These shamans, known as 'the Earthkeepers,' say that we’re dreaming the world into being through the very act of witnessing it. Scientists believe that we’re only able to do this in the very small subatomic world. Shamans understand that we also dream the larger world that we experience with our senses.
The mental disease of the present generation is impatience of study, contempt of the great masters of ancient wisdom, and a disposition to rely wholly upon unassisted genius and natural sagacity.
Respect yourself and others will respect you.
Wherever you go, go with all your heart.
To change the world, we need to combine Ancient wisdom with new technologies
“Carpe Diem” is perhaps the most well-known of all Roman proverbs. This concise phrase urges us to make the most of the present moment. Its origins can be traced to the Roman poet Horace, who emphasized the importance of living in the present, as the future is uncertain.
“Veni, Vidi, Vici” – I Came, I Saw, I Conquered
“Mens Sana in Corpore Sano” – A Sound Mind in a Sound Body
“Si Vis Pacem, Para Bellum” – If You Want Peace, Prepare for War
“Dulce et Decorum Est Pro Patria Mori” – It is Sweet and Fitting to Die for One’s Country
“Aquila Non Capit Muscas” – The Eagle Does Not Catch Flies
“Festina Lente” – Make Haste Slowly
“Panem et Circenses” – Bread and Circuses
“Aegrescit Medendo” – The Cure is Worse Than the Disease
“Sic Transit Gloria Mundi” – Thus Passes the Glory of the World
"Everything has beauty, but not everyone sees it."
"They must often change who would be constant in happiness or wisdom."
"What the superior man seeks is in himself; what the small man seeks is in others."
"In a country well governed, poverty is something to be ashamed of. In a country badly governed, wealth is something to be ashamed of."
"It does not matter how slowly you go so long as you do not stop."
"When anger rises, think of the consequences."
"When it is obvious that the goals cannot be reached, don't adjust the goals; adjust the action steps."
"Faced with what is right, to leave it undone shows a lack of courage."
"To be able under all circumstances to practice five things constitutes perfect virtue; these five things are gravity, generosity of soul, sincerity, earnestness, and kindness."
"To see what is right, and not to do it, is want of courage or of principle."
"Fine words and an insinuating appearance are seldom associated with true virtue."
"Before you embark on a journey of revenge, dig two graves."
"Success depends upon previous preparation, and without such preparation, there is sure to be failure."
"Do not impose on others what you yourself do not desire."
"Men's natures are alike, it is their habits that carry them far apart."
"Our greatest glory is not in never falling, but in rising every time we fall."
"Real knowledge is to know the extent of one's ignorance."
"Hold faithfulness and sincerity as first principles."
"I hear and I forget. I see and I remember. I do and I understand."
"Respect yourself, and others will respect you."
"Silence is a true friend who never betrays."
"The superior man, when resting in safety, does not forget that danger may come. When in a state of security he does not forget the possibility of ruin. When all is orderly, he does not forget that disorder may come. Thus his person is not endangered, and his States and all their clans are preserved."
"The will to win, the desire to succeed, the urge to reach your full potential... These are the keys that will unlock the door to personal excellence."
"Better a diamond with a flaw than a pebble without."
"Study the past if you would define the future."
"Wheresoever you go, go with all your heart."
"Wisdom, compassion, and courage are the three universally recognized moral qualities of men."
"Forget injuries, never forget kindnesses."
"Have no friends not equal to yourself."
"He who exercises government by means of his virtue may be compared to the north polar star, which keeps its place and all the stars turn towards it."
"He who learns but does not think is lost! He who thinks but does not learn is in great danger."
"He who speaks without modesty will find it difficult to make his words good."
"Life is really simple, but we insist on making it complicated."
"A superior man is modest in his speech but exceeds in his actions."
"Be not ashamed of mistakes and thus make them crimes."
"The more man meditates upon good thoughts, the better will be his world and the world at large."
"The superior man understands what is right; the inferior man understands what will sell."
"By nature, men are nearly alike; by practice, they get to be wide apart."
"He who will not economize will have to agonize."
"When we see men of a contrary character, we should turn inwards and examine ourselves."
"He with whom neither slander that gradually soaks into the mind, nor statements that startle like a wound in the flesh, are successful may be called intelligent indeed."
"If I am walking with two other men, each of them will serve as my teacher. I will pick out the good points of the one and imitate them, and the bad points of the other and correct them in myself."
"Choose a job you love, and you will never have to work a day in your life."
"If you look into your own heart, and you find nothing wrong there, what is there to worry about? What is there to fear?"
"Ignorance is the night of the mind, but a night without moon and star."
"It is easy to hate and it is difficult to love. This is how the whole scheme of things works. All good things are difficult to achieve, and bad things are very easy to get."
"Without feelings of respect, what is there to distinguish men from beasts?"
“We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act, but a habit.” ― Aristotle
“Happiness resides not in possessions, and not in gold, happiness dwells in the soul.” ― Democritus
“First say to yourself what you would be; and then do what you have to do.” ― Epictetus
“The mind is not a vessel to be filled but a fire to be kindled.” ― Plutarch
“The most difficult thing in life is to know yourself.” ― Thales
“Wealth consists not in having great possessions, but in having few wants.” ― Epictetus
“Human behavior flows from three main sources: desire, emotion, and knowledge.” ― Plato
“No man ever steps in the same river twice, for it’s not the same river and he’s not the same man.” ― Heraclitus
“The foundation of every state is the education of its youth.” ― Diogenes
“True wisdom comes to each of us when we realize how little we understand about life, ourselves, and the world around us.” ― Socrates
Know thyself. (inscribed in the forecourt of the Temple of Apollo at Delphi over 2,000 years ago) ― Greek Quotes
“There is nothing permanent except change.” ― Heraclitus
“Silence is better than unmeaning words.” ― Pythagoras
“For a man to conquer himself is the first and noblest of all victories.” ― Plato
“The secret of change is to focus all of your energy, not on fighting the old, but on building the new.” ― Socrates
“Educating the mind without educating the heart is no education at all.” ― Aristotle
“What you leave behind is not what is engraved in stone monuments, but what is woven into the lives of others.” ― Pericles
“It’s not what happens to you, but how you react to it that matters.” ― Epictetus
“To find yourself, think for yourself.” ― Socrates
“The happy man is the one who has a healthy body, a wealthy soul and a well-educated nature.” ― Thales
“You can discover more about a person in an hour of play than in a year of conversation.” ― Plato
It’s not what happens to you, but how you react to it that matters.
He who laughs at himself never runs out of things to laugh at.
Only the educated are free.
Some things are in our control and others not. Things in our control are opinion, pursuit, desire, aversion, and, in a word, whatever are our own actions. Things not in our control are body, property, reputation, command, and, in one word, whatever are not our actions.
The greater the difficulty, the more glory in surmounting it. Skillful pilots gain their reputation from storms and tempests.
He is a wise man who does not grieve for the things which he has not, but rejoices for those which he has.
Seek not the good in external things;seek it in yourselves.
People are not disturbed by things, but by the views they take of them.
If anyone tells you that a certain person speaks ill of you, do not make excuses about what is said of you but answer, “He was ignorant of my other faults, else he would not have mentioned these alone.
Any person capable of angering you becomes your master;
he can anger you only when you permit yourself to be disturbed by him.
Wealth consists not in having great possessions, but in having few wants.
Don’t explain your philosophy. Embody it.
To accuse others for one’s own misfortune is a sign of want of education. To accuse oneself shows that one’s education has begun. To accuse neither oneself nor others shows that one’s education is complete.
There is only one way to happiness and that is to cease worrying about things which are beyond the power or our will.
If you want to improve, be content to be thought foolish and stupid.
The key is to keep company only with people who uplift you, whose presence calls forth your best.
If you would be a reader, read; if a writer, write.
God has entrusted me with myself. No man is free who is not master of himself. A man should so live that his happiness shall depend as little as possible on external things. The world turns aside to let any man pass who knows where he is going.
Remember, it is not enough to be hit or insulted to be harmed, you must believe that you are being harmed. If someone succeeds in provoking you, realize that your mind is complicit in the provocation. Which is why it is essential that we not respond impulsively to impressions; take a moment before reacting, and you will find it easier to maintain control.
A ship should not ride on a single anchor, nor life on a single hope.
Demand not that things happen as you wish, but wish them to happen as they do, and you will go on well.
Remember that you ought to behave in life as you would at a banquet. As something is being passed around it comes to you; stretch out your hand, take a portion of it politely. It passes on; do not detain it. Or it has not come to you yet; do not project your desire to meet it, but wait until it comes in front of you. So act toward children, so toward a wife, so toward office, so toward wealth.
Events do not just happen, but arrive by appointment.
Either God wants to abolish evil, and cannot; or he can, but does not want to.
It is unrealistc to expect people to see you as you see yourself.
You have power over your mind — not outside events. Realize this, and you will find strength.
The soul becomes dyed with the colour of its thoughts.
Do not act as if you were going to live ten thousand years. Death hangs over you. While you live, while it is in your power, be good.
Dwell on the beauty of life. Watch the stars, and see yourself running with them. Think constantly on the changes of the elements into each other, for such thoughts wash away the dust of earthly life.
The impediment to action advances action. What stands in the way becomes the way.
If it is not right do not do it; if it is not true do not say it.
If any man despises me, that is his problem. My only concern is not doing or saying anything deserving of contempt.
The first rule is to keep an untroubled spirit. The second is to look things in the face and know them for what they are.
Never let the future disturb you. You will meet it, if you have to, with the same weapons of reason which today arm you against the present.
How much time he gains who does not look to see what his neighbour says or does or thinks, but only at what he does himself, to make it just and holy.
Very little is needed to make a happy life; it is all within yourself in your way of thinking.
Whenever you are about to find fault with someone, ask yourself the following question: What fault of mine most nearly resembles the one I am about to criticize?
If you are distressed by anything external, the pain is not due to the thing itself, but to your estimate of it; and this you have the power to revoke at any moment.
The happiness of your life depends upon the quality of your thoughts.
The happiness of your life depends upon the quality of your thoughts.
Everything we hear is an opinion, not a fact. Everything we see is a perspective, not the truth.
If someone is able to show me that what I think or do is not right, I will happily change, for I seek the truth, by which no one was ever truly harmed. It is the person who continues in his self-deception and ignorance who is harmed.
I have often wondered how it is that every man loves himself more than all the rest of men, but yet sets less value on his own opinion of himself than on the opinion of others.
Begin each day by telling yourself: Today I shall be meeting with interference, ingratitude, insolence, disloyalty, ill-will, and selfishness – all of them due to the offenders’ ignorance of what is good or evil.
Perfection of character is this: to live each day as if it were your last, without frenzy, without apathy, without pretence.
A person’s worth is measured by the worth of what he values.
Observe always that everything is the result of change, and get used to thinking that there is nothing Nature loves so well as to change existing forms and make new ones like them.
Or is it your reputation that’s bothering you? But look at how soon we’re all forgotten. The abyss of endless time that swallows it all. The emptiness of those applauding hands. The people who praise us; how capricious they are, how arbitrary. And the tiny region it takes place. The whole earth a point in space – and most of it uninhabited.
Be like the cliff against which the waves continually break; but it stands firm and tames the fury of the water around it.
A man must stand erect, not be kept erect by others.
We suffer more often in imagination than in reality.
If you really want to escape the things that harass you, what you’re needing is not to be in a different place but to be a different person.
Sometimes even to live is an act of courage.
Fire tests gold, suffering tests brave men.
Enjoy present pleasures in such a way as not to injure future ones.
They lose the day in expectation of the night, and the night in fear of the dawn.
It is not that we have so little time but that we lose so much. The life we receive is not short but we make it so; we are not ill provided but use what we have wastefully.
Luck is what happens when preparation meets opportunity.
The greatest obstacle to living is expectancy, which hangs upon tomorrow and loses today. You are arranging what lies in Fortune’s control, and abandoning what lies in yours. What are you looking at? To what goal are you straining? The whole future lies in uncertainty: live immediately.
If a man knows not to which port he sails, no wind is favorable.
Anger, if not restrained, is frequently more hurtful to us than the injury that provokes it.
True happiness is to enjoy the present, without anxious dependence upon the future, not to amuse ourselves with either hopes or fears but to rest satisfied with what we have, which is sufficient, for he that is so wants nothing. The greatest blessings of mankind are within us and within our reach. A wise man is content with his lot, whatever it may be, without wishing for what he has not.
All cruelty springs from weakness.
Difficulties strengthen the mind, as labor does the body.
Withdraw into yourself, as far as you can. Associate with those who will make a better man of you. Welcome those whom you yourself can improve. The process is mutual; for men learn while they teach.
He who spares the wicked injures the good.
You act like mortals in all that you fear, and like immortals in all that you desire.
He suffers more than necessary, who suffers before it is necessary.
A gift consists not in what is done or given, but in the intention of the giver or doer.
People are frugal in guarding their personal property; but as soon as it comes to squandering time they are most wasteful of the one thing in which it is right to be stingy.
Every new beginning comes from some other beginning’s end.
To win true freeedom you must be a slave to philosophy.
It is a rough road that leads to the heights of greatness.
Often a very old man has no other proof of his long life than his age.
No man is crushed by misfortune unless he has first been deceived by prosperity.
Man conquers the world by conquering himself.
Better to trip with the feet than with the tongue.
Well-being is realized by small steps, but is truly no small thing.
Nothing is more hostile to a firm grasp on knowledge than self-deception.
The goal of life is living in agreement with Nature.
We have two ears and one mouth, so we should listen more than we say.
If you lay violent hands on me, you’ll have my body, but my mind will remain with Stilpo.
Happiness is a good flow of life.
A bad feeling is a commotion of the mind repugnant to reason, and against nature.
No loss should be more regrettable to us than losing our time, for it’s irretrievable.
Wealth is able to buy the pleasures of eating, drinking and other sensual pursuits-yet can never afford a cheerful spirit or freedom from sorrow.
In our control is the most beautiful and important thing, the thing because of which even the god himself is happy— namely, the proper use of our impressions. We must concern ourselves absolutely with the things that are under our control and entrust the things not in our control to the universe.
If you accomplish something good with hard work, the labor passes quickly, but the good endures; if you do something shameful in pursuit of pleasure, the pleasure passes quickly, but the shame endures.
Choose to die well while you can; wait too long, and it might become impossible to do so.
If we were to measure what is good by how much pleasure it brings, nothing would be better than self-control- if we were to measure what is to be avoided by its pain, nothing would be more painful than lack of self-control.
From good people you’ll learn good, but if you mingle with the bad you’ll destroy such soul as you had.
You will earn the respect of all if you begin by earning the respect of yourself. Don’t expect to encourage good deeds in people conscious of your own misdeeds.
Since every man dies, it is better to die with distinction than to live long.
To accept injury without a spirit of savage resentment-to show ourselves merciful toward those who wrong us-being a source of good hope to them-is characteristic of a benevolent and civilized way of life.
We will train both soul and body when we accustom ourselves to cold, heat, thirst, hunger, scarcity of food, hardness of bed, abstaining from pleasures, and enduring pains.
What good are gilded rooms or precious stones-fitted on the floor, inlaid in the walls, carried from great distances at the greatest expense? These things are pointless and unnecessary-without them isn’t it possible to live healthy? Aren’t they the source of constant trouble? Don’t they cost vast sums of money that, through public and private charity, may have benefited many?
Being good is the same as being a philosopher. If you obey your father, you will follow the will of a man; if you choose the philosopher’s life, the will of the universe. It is plain, therefore, that your duty lies in the pursuit of philosophy.
For mankind, evil is injustice and cruelty and indifference to a neighbour’s trouble, while virtue is brotherly love and goodness and justice and beneficence and concern for the welfare of your neighbour—with.
Husband and wife should come together to craft a shared life, procreating children, seeing all things as shared between them-with nothing withheld or private to one another-not even their bodies.
To accept injury without a spirit of savage resentment-to show ourselves merciful toward those who wrong us-being a source of good hope to them-is characteristic of a benevolent and civilized way of life.
Whoever has walked with truth generates life.
Do not cut off the neck of that which has had its neck cut off.
That which is given in submission becomes a medium of defiance.
The destruction is from his own personal god; he knows no savior.
Wealth is hard to come by, but poverty is always at hand.
He acquires many things, he must keep close watch over them.
A boat bent on honest pursuits sailed downstream with the wind; Utu has sought out honest ports for it.
He who drinks too much beer must drink water.
He who eats too much will not be able to sleep.
Since my wife is at the outdoor shrine, and furthermore since my mother is at the river, I shall die of hunger, he says.
May the goddess Inanna cause a hot-limited wife to lie down for you; May she bestow upon you broad-armed sons; May she seek out for you a place of Happiness.
The fox could not build his own house, and so he came to the house of his friend as a conqueror.
The fox, having urinated into the sea, said "The whole of the sea is my urine."
The poor man nibbles at his silver.
The poor are the silent ones of the land.
All the households of the poor are not equally submissive.
A poor man does not strike his son a single blow; he treasures him forever.
“Do not dwell in the past, do not dream of the future, concentrate the mind on the present moment. – Buddha
“He is a wise man who does not grieve for the things which he has not, but rejoices for those which he has.” – Epictetus
“If the only prayer you said in your whole life was, “thank you,” that would suffice. – Meister Eckhart
“Happiness depends upon ourselves. – Aristotle
“When you arise in the morning, give thanks for the morning light, for your life and strength. Give thanks for your food, and the joy of living. If you see no reason for giving thanks, the fault lies with yourself.” – Tecumseh, Shawnee Chief
“Enough is as good as a feast.” – Sir Thomas Malory
“A grateful mind is a great mind which eventually attracts to itself great things.’ – Plato
“Let us rise up and be thankful, for if we didn’t learn a lot today, at least we learned a little, and if we didn’t learn a little, at least we didn’t get sick, and if we got sick, at least we didn’t die; so, let us all be thankful.” – Buddha
“Gratitude is not only the greatest of virtues, but the parent of all the others. – Marcus Tullius Cicero
“If you cannot be grateful for what you have received, then be thankful for what you have been spared.” – Yiddish Proverb
“If you look to others for fulfillment, you will never be fulfilled. If your happiness depends on money, you will never be happy with yourself. Be content with what you have; rejoice in the way things are. When you realize there is nothing lacking, the world belongs to you.” – Lao-Tzu
“Do not tell the man that is carrying you that he stinks.” – African Proverb
“Whatever I am offered in devotion with a pure heart — a leaf, a flower, fruit, or water — I accept with joy.” – Bhagavad Gita
“Do not indulge in dreams of having what you have not, but reckon up the chief of the blessings you do possess, and then thankfully remember how you would crave for them if they were not yours.” – Marcus Aurelius
“Do not spoil what you have by desiring what you have not; but remember that what you now have was once among the things you only hoped for.” – Epicurus
“Gratitude is the sign of noble souls.” – Aesop
“Nothing more detestable does the earth produce than an ungrateful man.” – Decimus Magnus Ausonius
“When eating bamboo sprouts, remember the man who planted them.” – Chinese Proverb
“He that is hard to please, may get nothing in the end.” – Aesop
“Forget injuries, never forget kindness.” – Confucius
“He who is not contented with what he has, would not be contented with what he would like to have.” – Socrates
“We can easily forgive a child who is afraid of the dark; the real tragedy of life is when men are afraid of the light.”
“Be kind, for everyone you meet is fighting a hard battle.”
“To find yourself, think for yourself.”
“Let him who would move the world first move himself.”
“Prefer knowledge to wealth, for the one is transitory, the other perpetual.”
“We cannot live better than in seeking to become better.”
“Beware the barrenness of a busy life.”
“My friend…care for your psyche…know thyself, for once we know ourselves, we may learn how to care for ourselves.”
“The really important thing is not to live, but to live well. And to live well meant, along with more enjoyable things in life, to live according to your principles.”
“Those who are hardest to love need it the most.”
“True wisdom comes to each of us when we realize how little we understand about life, ourselves, and the world around us.”
https://play.google.com/books/reader?id=3y8JAAAAQAAJ&pg=GBS.PA282.w.1.1.0&hl=en
Sacrifice not thy Heart upon every altar.
Sadness and Gladness succeed each other.
Sail, quoth the King; hold, saith the Wind.
Salt spilt, is seldom clean taken up.
Sampson was a strong Man, yet could not pay Money before he had it.
Satires ran faster than Panegy ricks.
Save something for the Man, that rides on the white Horse.
Saving is getting.
Sauce for a Goose, is Sauce for a Gander.
Say not ill of the Year, till it be past.
Scabby Heads love not the Comb.
Scabby Parents will have scurfy Children.
Scald not thy Lips with another Man's Porridge.
Scalded Cats fear even cold Water.
Scandal will rub out like Dirt, when it is dry.
Scanderbeg's Sword must have Scanderbeg's Arm.
School-Distinctions are the Impressions of the Devil's cloven Foot.
Scepters and Suitors hate Competitors.
Scorners are an Abomination to a sober Man.
Scorning is catching.
Scratching is bad; because it begins with Pleasure, and ends with Pain.
Seamen are the nearest to Death, and the farthest from God.
Search not a Wound too deep, lest thou make a new one.
Search not for a good Man's Pedigree.
Secret Mines may take the Town, when open Battery cannot;
Seeing's Believing, but Feeling's the Truth.
Seek not to reform every one's Dial by your Watch.
Seek, till you find; and you'll not lose your Labour.
Seek your Salve, where you got your Sore.
Self do, self have.
Self-Exaltation is the Fool's Paradise.
Self-Love is a Mote in every Man's Eye.
Self-Preservation is Nature's first Law.
Sell not the Bear's Skin, before you have caught him.
Send a Fool to Market, and a Fool he'll return.
Send not for an Hatchet, to break open an Egg with.
Send not to Market for Trouble.
Send your noble Blood to Market, and see what it will buy.
Serpents engender in still Waters.
Servants should put on Patience, when they put on a Livery.
Servants will not be diligent, where the Master's negligent.
Serving one's own Passions is the greatest Slavery.
Set a Beggar on Horse-back, and he'll ride to the Devil.
Set a Stool in the Sun; when one Knave rises, another comes.
Set a Thief to catch a Thief.
Set but this Feather well to my Arrow, and he'll certainly moot the Mark.
Set hard Heart against hard Hap.
Set the Hare's Head against the Goose's Giblets.
Set not your Loaf in, till the Oven's hot.
Set not your House on Fire, to be reveng'd of the Moon.
Seven Hour's sleep will make a Clown forget his Design.
Seven may be Company, but nine are Confusion.
Shake a Leicestershire-Man by the Collar, and yon shall hear the Beans rattle in his Belly.
Shall the Goflins teach the Goose to swim?
Shallow Wits censure every Thing, that is beyond their Depth.
Share not Pears with your Master, either in Jest or in Earnest.
Sharp Stomachs make short Devotion.
She broke her Elbow on her Wedding-Day.
She can laugh and cry, both in a Wind.
She cannot leap an Inch from a Slut.
She goes, at if she crack'd Nuts with her Tail.
A BAD Jack may have as bad a Jill.
A bad Padlock invites a Picklock.
A bad thing never dies.
A bad Shift is better than no Shift.
A bad Workman never gets a good Tool.
A Barber learneth to shave, by shaving of Fools.
A Barley-corn is better than a Diamond to a Cock.
A Basket-Justice will do Justice, right or wrong.
A Bean in Liberty is better than a Comfit in Prison.
A Beggar payeth a Benefit with a Louse.
A bellyful is a bellyful, whether it be Meat or Drink.
A Bird is known by its Note, and a Man by his Talk.
A Bird may be caught with a Snare, that will not be shot.
A Bit and a Knock, as Men feed Apes.
A black Hen will lay a white Egg.
A black Man is a Jewel in a fair Woman's Eye.
A blind Man will be glad to see it.
A blind Man will not thank you for a Looking-Glass:
A blunt Wedge will do it, where sometimes a sharp Ax will not.
A Blow with a Reed makes a Noise, but hurts not.
A Boaster and a Lyar are Cousin-Germans.
A bold Fellow is the Jest of wise Men, and the Idol of Fools.
A Book that is shut, is but a Block.
A brave Retreat is a brave Exploit.
A Bridle for the Tongue is a necessary Piece of Furniture.
A broad Hat does not always cover a venerable Head.
A broken Friendship may be soder'd, but will never be found.
A broken Glass can't be hurt.
A Burst on-Horse, and a Cambridge-Master of Arts will give the way to nobody.
A Bushel of March-Dust, on the Leaves, is worth a King's Ransom.
A Calm is most welcome after a Storm.
A careless Watch invites the vigilant Foe.
A Carper can cavil at any thing.
A Cat has nine Lives, and a Woman has nine Cats Lives.
A Cat may look upon a King.
A charitable Man is the true Lover of God.
A Child's Birds, and a Boy's Wife are well used.
A civil Denial is better than a rude Grant.
A clean Hand wants no washing.
A clear Conscience can bear any Trouble.
A clear Conscience is a sure Card.
A clear Conscience laughs at false Accusations.
A close Mouth catcheth no Flies.
A College of Wit-Crackers.
A Colt you may break, but an old Horse you never can.
A common Blot is held no Stain.
A common Jeerer may have Wit, but not Wisdom.
A constant Guest is never welcome.
A constrained Will seeketh every Opportunity to slip its Head out of the Collar.
A Cook is known by his Knife.
A covetous Man does nothing that he should do, till he dies.
A covetous Man is a Dog in a Wheel, that, roasteth Meat for others.
A covetous Man is good to none, but worst to himself.
A Cough will stick longer by a Horse, than a Peck of Oats.
A Countryman may be as warm in Kersey, as a King in Velvet.
A courageous Foe is better than a cowardly Friend.
A Courtesy much entreated is half recompensed.
A Coward's Fear can make a Coward valiant.
A crafty Fellow never has any Peace.
A Cripple may possibly catch an Hare.
A crooked Stick will have a crooked Shadow.
A Crowd is not Company.
A Crown in Pocket doth you more Credit than an Angel spent.
A curs'd Cow has short Horns.
A curs'd Curr should be short ty'd.
A customary Railer is the Devil's Bagpipe, which the World danceth after.
A Danger foreseen is half avoided.
A Day to come shews longer than a Year that's gone.
A Day will come, when fair Dealing will be found a Jewel.
A debauched Son of a noble Family, is a foul Stream from a clear Spring.
A deformed Body may have a beautiful Soul.
A Deluge of Words, and a Drop of Sense.
A Detractor is his own Foe, and the World's Enemy.
A Diamond is valuable, tho' it lie on a Dunghill.
A Disease known is half cured.
A dishonest Woman cannot be kept in, and an honest one will not.
A dogmatical Tone, a pragmatical Pate.
A Dog's Life, Hunger and Ease.
A Dog will not cry, if you beat him with a Bone.
A drowning Man will catch at a Rush.
A drunken Night makes a cloudy Morning.
A Duck will not always dabble in the same Gutter.
A dull Ass near Home needs no Spur.
A dumb Man never gets Land.
A Dwarf threatens Hercules. 
A fair Booty makes many a Thief.
A fair Face, and a foul Bargain.
A fair Face, and a foul Heart.
A fair Face is half a Portion.
A fair Gamester, among Rooks, must he heat.
A fair Wife without a Fortune, is a fine House without Furniture.
A Father is a Treasure, a Brother a Comfort; but a Friend is both.
A Fault, once denied, is twice committed.
A Fault, wilfully committed, deserveth no Pardon.
A Favour ill-placed is Profusion.
A Feast is not made of Mushrooms only.
A fine Diamond may be ill-set.
A Fool and his Money are soon parted.
A Fool can dance without a Fiddle.
A Fool demands much; but he's a greater that gives it.
A Fool is better than an obstinate Man.
A Fool is happier in thinking well of himself, than a wise Man in other's thinking well of him.
A Fool knows more in his own House, than a wise Man in another's.
A Fool loseth his Estate, before he finds his Folly.
A Fool may chance to put something into a wise Man's Head.
A Fool's Bolt is soon shot.
A Fool's Bolt may sometimes hit the White.
A Fool's Tongue is long enough to cut his own Throat.
A Fool's Speech is a Bubble of Air.
A Fool wants his Cloke in a rainy Day.
A Fool, when he hath spoke, hath done all.
A Fop of Fashion is the Mercer's Friend, the Taylor's Fool, and his own Foe.
A forced Kindness deserves no Thanks.
A fortunate Man may be any where.
A foul Morn may turn to a fair Day.
A Fox should not be of the Jury at a Goose's Trial.
A Friend in Court is as good as a Penny in Pocket.
A Friend is never known till needed.
A Friend in the Market is better than Money in the Chest.
A Friend to all, is a Friend to none.
A Friend, that you buy with Presents, will be bought from you.
A full Cup must be carried steadily.
A full Purse makes the Month run over.
A gallant Man needs no Trumpets and Drums to rouse him.
A gallant Man rather despises Death than hates Life.
A generous Confession disarms Slander.
A Gentleman ought to travel abroad, but dwell at home.
A Gentleman should have more in his Pocket than on his Back.
A Gentleman without an Estate, is a Pudding without Suet.
A Gift long waited for is sold, not given.
A Gift, with a kind Countenance, is a double Present.
A golden Dart kills where it pleases.
A golden Shield is of great Defence.
A gold Ring does not cure a Felon.
A good Archer is not known by his Arrows, but his Aim.
A good Beast will get himself a heat with eating.
A good Beginning makes a good Ending.
A good Candle-Snuffer may come to be a good Player.
A good Cause, and a good Tongue; and yet Money must carry it.
A good Cause makes a stout Heart, and a strong Arm.
A good Conscience is the best Divinity.
A good Conscience needs never sneak.
A good Day will not mend him, nor a bad Day impair him.
A good Dog deserves a good Bone.
A good Edge is good for nothing, if it has nothing to cut.
A good Example is the best Sermon.
A good Face needs no Band, and a bad one deserves none.
A good Face needs no Paint.
A good Faculty in Lying is, now-a-days, a fair Step to Preferment.
A good Fame is better than a good Face.
A good Friend is my nearest Relation.
A good Garden may have some Weeds.
A good honest Man, now-a-days, is but a better Word for a Fool.
A good Hope is better than a bad Possession.
A good Horseman wants a good Spur.
A good Horse should be seldom spurr'd.
A good Life fears not Life nor Death.
A good Life is the only Religion.
A good Man has more Hope in his Death, than a wicked Man in his Life.
A good Man is no more to be fear'd than a Sheep.
A good Man will as soon ran into a Fire as a Quarrel.
A good Man will requite a Gift, an ill Man will ask more.
A good Marksman may miss.
A good Merchant may meet with a Misfortune.
A good Neighbour, a good Morrow.
A good Orator must be Cicero and Rossius in one Man.
A good Paymaster may build Paul's. 
A good Paymaster never wants Workmen.
A good Pinch, and a Rap with a Stick, is a Clown's Complement.
A good Presence is Letters of Recommendation.
A good Present need not knock long for Admittance.
A good Reputation is a fair Estate.
A good Sailor may mistake in a dark Night.
A good Sallad may be the Prologue to a bad Supper.
A good Season for Courtship is, when the Widow returns from the Funeral.
A good Servant must have good Wages.
A good Shift may serve long, but cannot serve for ever.
A good Tale ill told, is a bad one.
A good Tongue has seldom need to beg Attention.
A good Tongue is a good Weapon.
A good Thing is soon caught up.
A good Tree is a good Shelter.
A good Winter brings a good Summer.
A Goose-Quill is more dangerous than a Lion's Claw.
A Goss-Hawk beats not at a Bunting.
A Gossip speaks ill of all, and all of her.
A Grain of Prudence is worth a Pound of Craft.
A great Blockhead hath not Stuff enough to make a Man of Sense.
A great Bustle, and no Business done.
A great Ceremony for a small Saint.
A great City, a great Solitude.
A great Cry, and little Wool.
A great Dowry is a Bed-full of Brambles.
A great Fortune, in the Hands of a Fool, is a great Misfortune.
A great Fortune is a great Slavery.
A great Head, and a little Wit.
A great Load of Gold is more burthensome than at light Load of Gravel.
A great Man, and a great River, are often ill Neighbours.
A great Man's foolish Sayings pass for Sentences.
A great Man will not trample upon a Worm, nor sneak to an Emperor.
A great Mark is soonest hit.
A great Reputation is a great Charge.
A great Ship must have deep Water.
A great Tree hath a great Fall.
A green Winter makes a fat Church-yard.
A green Wound is soon healed.
A grunting Horse, and a groaning Wife, seldom fail.
A guilty Conscience never thinketh it self safe.
A Giant will starve with what will surfeit a Dwarf.
A Handsaw is a good thing, but not to shave with.
A Hare may draw a Lion, if she have but a golden Cord.
A heady Man, and a Fool, may wear the some Cap.
A Hog in Armour is still but a Hog.
A Hog that's bemir'd, endeavours to bemire others.
A Hog upon trust, grunts till he's paid for.
A Hook's well lost, to catch a Salmon.
A Horse is neither better nor worse for his Trapping.
A Horse that will not carry a Saddle, must have no Oats.
A hot May fills the Church-yard.
A House built by the Way-side, is either too high, or too low.
A House ready built never sells for so much as it cost.
A House ready made, but a Wife to make.
A House well furnish'd makes a good Housewife.
A hungry Man smells Meat a far off.
A jealous Head is soon broken.
A jealous Man's Horns hang in his Eyes.
A Jest driven too far, brings home Hate or Scorn.
A Joke never gains over an Enemy, but often loseth a Friend.
A Journey were better too long than dangerous.
A joyful Evening may follow a sorrowful Morning.
A Kentish Jury; hang half, and save half.
A Knave discover'd is a great Fool.
A knavish Confession should have a Cane for Absolution.
A Lamb is as dear to a poor Man, as an Ox to the rich.
A lame Traveller should get out betimes.
A lazy Ox is little better for the Goad.
A lazy Sheep thinks its Wool heavy.
A leaden Sword in an Ivory Scabbard.
A libertine Life is not a Life of Liberty.
A Life of Leisure and a Life of Laziness are two things.
A light Purse makes a heavy Heart.
A Linsey-wolsey Gown does not become June. 
A little Barrel can give but a little Meal.
A little Bird is content with a little Nest.
A little Debt makes a Debtor, but a great one an Enemy.
A little Evil contributes more to our Misery.
A little of every thing, it nothing in the Main.
A little Ship needs not but a little Sail.
A little Stream may quench Thirst, as well as a great River.
A little Stream will drive a light Mill.
A little String will tie up a little Bird.
A little Time may be enough to hatch a great deal of Mischief.
A little Wind kindleth a great Fire; a great one bloweth it out.
A little Wood will heat a little Oven.
A long Harvest, and a little Corn.
A long Life hath long Miseries.
A long Ox, and a short Horse.
A Lord without Riches, is a Soldier without Arms.
A low Hedge is easily leap'd over.
A loyal Heart may be landed under Traytor's Bridge.
A Lyar is a Bravo towards God, and a Coward towards Men. 
A Lye begets a Lye, till they come to Generations.
A Lye has no Leg, but a Scandal has Wings.
A Lyon may come to be beholding to a Mouse.
A mad Beast must have a sober Driver.
A mad Bull is not to be ty'd up with a Packthread.
A mad Man and a Fool are no Witnesses.
A mad Parish must have a mad Priest.
A Maid, that laughs, is half taken.
A Man among Children will be long a Child, a Child among Men will be soon a Man.
A Man apt to promise, is apt to forget.
A Man, as he manages himself, may die old at Thirty, and a Child at Eighty.
A Man at Sixteen, will prove a Child at Sixty.
A Man gains nothing by being Vain-glorious, but Contempt and Hatred.
A Man gets no Thanks for what he loseth at Play.
A Man has no more Goods, than he gets good by.
A Man is a Man, tho' he have but a Hose upon his Head.
A Man is a Man, tho' he have never a Cap to his Crown.
A Man is a stark Fool, all the while he's angry.
A Man is not good or bad, for one Action.
A Man is not so soon healed as hurt.
A Man in Distress or Despair, does as much as ten.
A Man in Passion rides a Horse that runs away with him.
A Man knows his Companion in a long Journey and a little Inn.
A Man, like a Watch, is to be valued for his Goings.
A Man loseth his Time, that comes early to a bad Bargain.
A Man may as well expect to be well, and at Ease without Wealth, as Happy without Virtue.
A Man may be an Artist, tho' he have not his Tools about him.
A Man may be good in the Camp, and yet bad in the Church.
A Man may be happy here and hereafter, without much Fame or Wealth.
A Man may be strong, and yet not mow well.
A Man may buy even Gold too dear.
A Man may come to Market, tho' he don't buy Oysters.
A Man may lead his Horse to Water, but cannot make him drink.
A Man may love his House, and yet not ride on the Ridge.
A Man may be young in Years, and yet old in Hours.
A Man may have a just Esteem of himself, without being proud.
A Man may provoke his own Dog to bite him.
A Man may say even his Paternoster out of time.
A Man may say too much, even upon the best of Subjects.
A Man must ask his Wife's Leave to thrive.
A Man of Courage never wants Weapons.
A Man of Cruelty is God's Enemy.
A Man of many Trades begs his Bread on Sundays. 
A Man of Parts may lie hid all his Life, unless Fortune call him out.
A Man's best Fortune, or his worst, is a Wife.
A Man's Folly ought to be his greatest Secret.
A Man's Gift makes room for him.
A Man's little the better for liking himself, if no body else like him.
A Man surprized is half beaten.
A Man that breaks his Word, bids others be false to him.
A Man that keeps Riches, and enjoys them not, is like an Ass that carries Gold and eats Thistles.
A Man under no Restraint, is a Bear without a Ring.
A Man with a running Head never wants where with to trouble himself.
A Man without Ceremony had need of great Merit in its Place.
A Man without Money, is a Bow without an Arrow.
A Man without Money, is no Man at all.
A Mare's Shoe and a Horse's Shoe are both alike.
A Mariner must have his Eye upon Rocks and Sands, as well as upon the North-Star.
A Mastiff groweth the fiercer, for being ty'd up.
A Match, quoth John, when he kiss'd his Dame.
A mere Scholar at Court it an Ass among Apes.
A Merchant's Happiness hangs upon Chance, Winds and Waves.
A merry Companion is Musick in a Journey.
A merry old Fool, and a gay apish Matron, are domestick Monsters.
A mischievous Plot may produce a good End.
A misty Morning may have a fine Day.
A modest Man at Court is the silliest Wight breathing.
A Mole wants no Lanthorn.
A Moneyless Man goes fast thro the Market.
A Mouse in Time may shear a Cable asunder.
A Mouse must not think to cast a Shadow like an Elephant.
A Myrtle among Thorns is a Myrtle still.
A natural Propension will have its Course; especially a bad one.
A Nightingale cannot sing in a Cage.
A Nod of an honest Man is enough.
A Nod for a wise Man, and a Rod for a Fool.
A Nod from a Lord is a Breakfast for a Fool.
A Paradysical Temper is not to be expected from Postdiluvian Mortals.
A Pebble and a Diamond are alike to a blind Man.
A Penny more buys the Whistle.
A Penny sav'd is Two-pence got.
A Penny-weight of Love is worth a Pound of Law.
A Penny-worth of Ease is worth a Penny.
A pensive Soul feeds upon nothing but Bitters.
A Person that is beautiful and vicious, is a fine Picture set in a scurvy Frame.
A Petitioner at Court that spares his Purse, angles without a Bait.
A Piece of a Kid is worth two of a Cat.
A Pilot is not chosen for his Riches, but his Knowledge.
A Pin a Day is a Groat a Year.
A Place at Court is a continual Bribe.
A Plaister is a small Amends for a broken Head.
A poor Man gets a poor Marriage.
A poor Man has not many Marks for Fortune to shoot at.
A poor Man's Debt makes a great Noise.
A poor Man wants some things, a covetous Man all things.
A poor Pleader may do in a plain Cause.
A poor Spirit is poorer than a poor Purse.
A poor Wedding is a Prologue to Misery.
A Pot that belongs to many, is ill stirr'd and worse boil'd.
A Pound of Care will not pay an Ounce of Debt.
A pretty Fellow to make an Axle-tree for an Oven.
A pretty Pig makes an ugly old Sow.
A princely Mind will undo a private Family.
A Prince wants a Million, a Beggar but a Groat.
A Promise against Law or Duty, is void in its own Nature.
A proud Look makes foul Work in a fine Face.
A proud Man hath many Crosses.
A proud Mind and a poor Purse are ill met.
A Puff of Wind and the Praise of the People, weigh alike.
A Purse without Money, is but a Piece of Leather.
A quiet Calf sucks its Dam, and another Cow also.
A quick Baker, and a slow Brewer.
A quiet Conscience causes a quiet Sleep.
A quiet Conscience sleeps in Thunder.
A Race-Horse is an open Sepulcher.
A Rascal grown rich has lost all his Kindred.
A ready Way to lose your Friend, is to lend him Money.
A reconcil'd Friend is a double Enemy.
A rich Friend is a Treasure.
A rich Rogue; two Shirts and a Rag.
A right Englishman knows not when a thing is well.
A Rogue's Wardrobe is Harbour for a Louse.
A Rope and Butter; if one slip, t'other will hold.
A scabbed Horse is good enough for a scabbed Knight.
A Scepter is one Thing, a Ladle another.
A Scoff is the Reward of Bashfulness.
A Scotish Mist may wet an Englishman to the Skin.
A Servant and a Cock should be kept but a Year.
A Servant is known by his Master's Absence.
A Servant never yet miscarried thro' Excess of Respect.
A shameless Beggar must have a short Denial.
A Sheepskin-Shoe lasts not long.
A Ship, a Mill, and a Woman, are always repairing.
A short Horse is soon curried.
A short Man needs no Stool to give a long Lubber a Box on the Ear.
A short Prayer may reach up to the Heaven of Heavens.
A Shrew profitable, may serve a Man reasonable.
A shroved Tree may stand long.
A Silver Key can open an Iron Lock.
A Slight from an Inferiour is highly provoking.
A Slight Gift, small Thanks.
A Slip of the Foot may be soon recover'd; but that of the Tongue perhaps never.
A small Demerit extinguishes a long Service.
A small Family is soon provided for.
A small Hurt in the Eye, is a great one.
A small Leak will sink a great Ship.
A small Matter hurts one that is sore.
A small Pack becomes a small Pedlar.
A small Rain may allay a great Storm.
A small Shop may have a good Trade.
A small Sore wants not a great Plaister.
A small Sum may serve for a small Reckoning.
A small Wound may be mortal.
A smoaking Chimney in a great House is a good Sign.
A Snow Year, a rich Year.
A soft Answer bids a Furioso put up his Sword.
A solitary Man is either a Brute or an Angel.
A Soul in a fat Body lieth soft, and is loth to rise.
A Sparrow in Hand is worth a Pheasant that flyeth by.
A Spot is most seen upon the finest Cloth.
A Spur in the Head is worth two in the Heels.
A stout Heart crushes ill Luck.
A Stumble may prevent a Fall.
A streight Stick is crooked in the Water.
A successful Man loses no Reputation.
A sweet and innocent Compliance is the Cement of Love.
A Swine fatted hath eat its own Bane.
A Tale twice, told, is Cabbage twice sod.
A Thief knows a Thief, as a Wolf knows a Wolf.
A Thief passes for a Gentleman, when stealing has made him rich.
A thin Bush is better than no Shelter.
A thin Meadow is soon mowed.
A thinking Man is always striking out something new.
A Thistle is a fat Sallad for an Ass's Mouth.
A thousand Years hence, the River will run as it did.
A Thread-bare Coat is Armour proof against Highwaymen.
A Thread too sine spun, will easily break.
A Thrush paid for, is better than a Turkey owing for.
A tired Traveller must be glad of an Ass, if he have not an Horse.
A toiling Dog comes halting home.
A too quick Return of an Obligation is a fort of Ingratitude.
A tragical Plot may produce a comical Conclusion.
A Tree is known better by its Fruit, than its Leaves.
A true Friend dares sometimes venture to be offensive.
A true Reformation must begin at the upper End.
A vertuous Woman, tho' ugly, is the Ornament of the House.
A very good or very bad Poet is remarkable; but a middling one, who can bear?
A very proud Man is always wilful.
A vicious Gentleman has a Blot in his 'Scutcheon.
A vicious Man's Son has a good Title to Vice.
A Wager is a Fool's Argument.
A wet Hand will hold a dead Herring.
A Whet is no Let; said the Mower.
A Whetstone can't it self cut, but yet it makes Tools cut.
A whole Bushel of Wheat is made up of single Grains.
A wicked Book is the wickeder, because it cannot repent.
A wicked Companion invites us all to Hell.
A wicked Man is afraid of his own Memory.
A wicked Man is his own Hell; and his Passions and Lusts the Fiends that torment him.
A wicked Man is the worst thing in the World.
A Wise is not to be chosen by the Eye only.
A wild Colt may become a sober Horse.
A wilful Fault has no Excuse, and deserves no Pardon.
A wilful Man had need be very wise.
A wilful Man never wants Woe.
A willing Mind makes a light Foot.
A windy March and a rainy April, make a beautiful May. 
A wise Head hath a close Mouth to it.
A wise Look may secure a Fool, if he talk not.
A wise Man begins in the End; a Fool ends in the Beginning.
A wise Man is a great Wonder.
A wise Man may be kind without Cost.
A wise Man may look ridiculous in the Company of Fools.
A wise Man turns Chance into good Fortune.
A wise Man will make Tools of what comes to Hand.
A wise Man's Loss is his Secret.
A wise Man's Thoughts walk within him, but a Fool's without him.
A wise Man will make more Opportunities than he finds.
A Woman is to be from her House three Times; when she is Christned, Married, and Buried.
A Woman that Paints, puts up a Bill, that she is to be let.
A Wonder lasts but nine Days, and then the Puppy's Eyes are open.
A wooden Leg is better than no Leg.
A Wooll-seller knows a Wooll-buyer.
A Word and a Stone let go, cannot be called back.
A Word spoke, is an Arrow let fly.
A Word to the Wise.
A Yeoman upon his Legs, is higher than a Prince upon his Knees.
A young Man negligent, an old Man necessitous.
A young Prodigal, an old Mumper.
A young Saint, an old Devil.
A young Serving-man, an old Beggar.
A young Trooper should have an old Horse.
A young Twig is easier twisted than an old Tree.
A young Whore, an old Saint.
A young Woman married to an old Man, must behave like an old Woman.
All are desirous to win the Prize.
All are Fellows at Football.
All are good Maids, but whence come the bad Wives?
All are not Friends that speak one fair.
All are not hanged that are condemned.
All are not Thieves that Dogs bark at.
All are not Turners that are Dish-Throwers.
All between the Cradle and the Coffin is uncertain..
All Blood is alike ancient.
All brings Grist to your Mill.
All Cats are alike grey in the Night.
All commend Patience, but none can endure to suffer.
All complain of want of Memory, but none of want of Judgment.
All covet, all lose.
All Death is sudden to the Unprepar'd.
All Doors open to Courtesy.
All Fame is dangerous: Good, bringeth Envy; Bad, Shame.
All Fish are not caught with Flies.
All Flesh is not Venison.
All Flowers are not in one Garland.
All Fool, or all Philosopher.
All good is the better for being diffusive.
All her Dishes are Chasing-Dishes.
All Human Power is but Comparative.
All ill Workmen quarrel with their Tools.
All is bat Lip-Wisdom, that wanteth Experience.
All is sine that is sit.
All is Fish that comes to Net.
All is soon ready in an orderly House.
All is not at hand that helps.
All is not Butter that comes from the Cow.
All is not Gold that glitters.
All is not Gospel that comes out of his Mouth.
All is not lost that is in Peril.
All is not won, that is put in the Purse.
All lay Load on the willing Horse.
All Liquors are not for every one's liking.
All Mankind is beholden to him that is kind to the Good.
All Meat is not the same in every Man's Mouth.
All Men can't be first.
All Men can't be Masters.
All Men naturally have some Love and Liking for Truth.
All Men think their Enemies ill Men.
All of Heaven and Hell is not known till hereafter.
All Rivers do what they can for the Sea.
All Saint without, all Devil within
All sorts of Sweets are not wholesome.
All strive to give to the rich Man.
All's good in a Famine.
All's lost that is pour'd into a crack'd Dish.
All Temptations are founded either in Hope or Fear.
All that are black, dig not for Coals.
All that breed in the Mud are not Eels.
All that's said in the Parlour, should not be heard in the Hall.
All the Fat is in the Fire.
All the Joys in the World cannot take one grey Hair out of our Heads.
All the Keys hang not at one Man's Girdle.
All the Levers you can bring, will not heave it up.
All the Praise of inward Virtue consists in outward Action.
All the Speed is in the Spurs.
All the Water in the Sea cannot wash out this Stain.
All the World is not wise Conduct, and Stratagem.
All the World will beat the Man whom Fortune buffets.
All things are difficult, before they are easy.
All things are easy, that are done willingly.
All things are not to be granted at all Times.
All things help, quoth the Wren, when she piss'd in the Sea.
All things that great Men do, are well done.
All things thrive with him; he eats Silk, and voids Velvet.
All Tongues are not made of the same Flesh.
All Truth is not to be told at all Times.
All unwarrantable Delights have an ill Farewell.
All Women are good; viz. good for something, or good for nothing.
All worldly Happiness consists in Opinion.
All worldly Profit, all Pleasure is correspondent to a like Measure of Anxiety or Wearisomness.
All you'll get by it, you may put into your Eyes, and not see the worse.
All your Eggs have two Yolks a piece, I warrant you.
All your Geese are Swans.
An acute Word cuts deeper than a sharp Weapon.
An advantageous Religion never wanted Proselytes.
An affected Superiority spoils Company.
An Alewive's Sow is always well fed.
An Angler eats more than he gets.
An Ape may chance to sit amongst the Doctors.
An Apple may happen to be better given than eaten.
An Argus at home, and a Mole abroad.
An artful Fellow is a Devil in a Doublet.
An Ass cover'd with Gold is more respected, than a good Horse with a Pack-Saddle.
An Ass is but an Ass, tho' laden with Gold.
An Ass is the gravest Beast, an Owl the gravest Bird.
An Ass laden with Gold overtakes every thing.
An Ass loaded with Gold, climbs to the Top of a Castle.
An Ass must be ty'd, where the Master will have him.
An Ass, that carries a Load, is better than a Lyon that devours Men.
An Ass that kicketh against the Wall, receives the Blow himself.
An Ass was never cut out for a Lap-Dog.
An Atheist is got one Point beyond the Devil.
An Egg, and to Bed.
An Emmet may work its Heart out, but can never make Honey.
An empty Belly hears no Body.
An empty Purse frights away Friends.
An empty Sack cannot stand upright.
An Enemy is a perpetual Spy.
An Enemy may chance to give good Counsel.
An envious Man is a squint-ey'd Fool.
An evil Conscience breaks many a Man's Neck.
An Handful of Trade is an Handful of Gold.
An handsome-bodied Man in the Face.
An happy Man shall have more Cousins, than his Father had Kinsfolks.
An Head with a good Tongue in it, is worth double the Price.
An high Station hath great Hazards.
An honest and diligent Servant is an humble Friend.
An honest good Look covereth many Faults.
An Honey-Tongue, a Heart of Gall.
An Horse-Kiss, like to beat one's Teeth out.
An Host's Invitation is expensive.
An Hour may destroy what an Age was a building.
An Hour of Pain is as long as a Day of Pleasure.
An hundred Traytors, 100 Weavers, and 100 Millers, make 300 Thieves.
An hungry Kite sees a dead Horse afar off.
An hungry Louse bites sore.
An Hypocrite never thoroughly repents.
An Hypocrite pays Tribute to God, only that he may impose upon Men.
An idle Person is the Devil's Playfellow.
An ill Conscience can never hope well.
An ill Cook should have a good Cleaver.
An ill Cow may have a good Calf.
An ill Father desireth not an ill Son.
An ill Man in Office is a Mischief to the Publick.
An ill Man is worst, when he appeareth good.
An ill Paymaster never wants Excuse.
An ill Receiver makes an ill Paymaster.
An ill Style is better than a lewd Story.
An ill-tim'd Jest hath ruin'd many.
An ill Turn is soon done.
An Inch breaketh no Square.
An Inch in an Hour, is a Foot in a Day's Work.
An Inch in a Man's Nose is much.
An Inch in miffing, is as bad as an Ell.
An Inch of a Horse is worth a Span of a Colt.
An indifferent Agreement, is better than carrying a Cause at Law.
An insolent Lord is not a Gentleman.
An Oak is not fell'd at one Chop.
An obedient Wife commands her Husband.
An old Ape hath an old Eye.
An old Courtier, a young Beggar.
An old Dog can't alter his way of Barking.
An old Fox needs not to be taught Tricks.
An old Fox understands a Trap.
An old Goat is never the more reverend for his Beard
An old Man, if he be a Trifler, is every one's Scorn.
An old Man is a Bed full of Bones.
An old Man never wants a Tale to tell.
An old Ox makes a strait Furrow.
An old Ox will find a Shelter for himself.
An old Physician, and a young Lawyer.
An old Whore's Curse is a Blessing.
An old wrinkle never wears out.
An open Door may tempt a Saint.
An open Knave is a great Fool.
An Ounce of Fortune is worth a Pound of Forecast.
An Ounce of Wisdom is worth a Pound of Wit.
An Ox, when he is loose, licks himself at Pleasure.
An unbounded Liberty will undo us.
An unfortunate Man's Cart is apt to overthrow.
An unpeaceable Man hath no Neighbour.
As a Cat loves Mustard.
As a wise Child maketh an happy Father, so a wise Father maketh a happy Child.
As a Wolf is like a Dog, so is a Flatterer like a Friend.
As brisk as a Bee in a Tar-Pot.
As brisk as a body-Louse.
As broken a Ship as this has come to Land.
As busy as a Hen with one Chick.
As crooked as Crawley Brook.
As deep drinketh the Goose as the Gander.
As demure as an old Whore at a Christning.
As demure as if Butter would not melt in his Mouth.
As drunk as a Tinker.
As drunk as David's Sow.
As far from the Heart, as from the Eyes.
As Fire kindled by Bellows, so is Anger by Words.
As sit as a Fritter for a Friar's Mouth.
As sit as a Thump with a Stone in an Apothecary's Eye.
As fond of it, as an Ape is of a Whip and a Bell.
As good be an addled Egg, as an idle Bird.
As good beg of a naked Man, as of a Miser.
As good be hang'd for a Sheep as a Lamb.
As good do nothing, as to no Purpose.
As good eat the Devil as the Broth he's boil'd in.
As good have no Time, as make no good Use of it.
As good never a whit, as never the better.
As good out of the World, as out of the Fashion.
As good play for nothing as work for nothing.
As good Twenty as Nineteen.
As good Water goes by the Mill, as drives it.
As grave as an old Gate-Post.
As grey as Grannum's Cat.
As great Pity to see a Woman cry, as to see a Goose go barefoot.
As hasty as Hopkins, that came to Jail over-night, and was hang'd the next Morning.
As high as a Hog, all but the Bristles.
As honest a Man, as any in the Cards, when the Kings are out.
As innocent as a Devil of two Years old.
As irrecoverable as a Lump of Butter in a Grey-hound's Mouth.
As is the Gander, so is the Goose.
As is the Gardener, so is the Garden.
As is the Workman, so is the Work.
As kind as a Kite; all you can't eat, you hide.
As lame as St. Giles Cripplegate.
As lazy as Ludlam's Dog, that lean'd his Head against the Wall to bark.
As lawless as a Town-Bull.
As like as an Apple is to a Lobster.
As like as two Peas.
As long as Meg of Westminster. 
As long as I live, I'll spit in my Parlour.
As long lives the merry Heart as the fad.
As Love thinks no Evil, so Envy speaks no Good.
As mad as a March-Hare. 
As mad as the baited Bull at Stamford. 
As much as York excels foul Sutton. 
As much Wit as three Folks, two Fools and a Madman.
As necessary as an old Sow among young Children.
As nimble as a Cow in a Cage.
As nimble as an Eel in a Sand-Bag.
As often as thou doest Wrong, Justice has thee on the Score.
As often as we do Good, we sacrifice.
As old as the Itch.
As pert as a Frog upon a Washing-Block.
As proud come behind as go before.
As rich as a new-shorn Sheep.
As safe as a Thief in a Mill.
As slender in the Middle, as a Cow in the Waist.
As soon as you have drank, you turn your Back upon the Spring.
As soon goes the Lamb's Skin to the Market as the Ewe's.
As spiteful as an old Maid.
As stout as a Miller's Waistcoat, that takes a Thief by the Neck every Day.
As sure as Exchequer-Pay.
As the best Wine makes the sharpest Vinegar, so the deepest Love turns to the deadliest Hatred.
As the Market goes, Wives must sell.
As the old Cock crows, so crows the young.
As the Touchstone tryeth Gold, so Gold tryeth Men.
As the Wind blows, seek your Shelter.
As the Wind blows, you must set your Sail.
As they brew, so let them bake.
As troublesome as a Wasp in one's Ear.
As true as the Dial to the Sun.
As true Steel as Rippon Spurs.
As Virtue is its own Reward, so Vice is its own Punishment.
As useless as Monkey's Grease.
As wary as a blind Horse.
As welcome as a Storm.
As welcome as Flowers in May. 
As welcome as Water in one's Shoes.
As welcome as Water in a leaking Ship.
As wilful as a Pig, that will neither lead nor drive.
As wise as Waltham's Calf, that run nine Miles to suck a Bull.
As you brew, so drink.
As you make your Bed, so lie down.
Absence cools moderate Passions, but inflames violent ones.
Absence sharpens Love, Presence strengthens it.
Abuse does not hinder the use of a thing that is in its self lawful.
Abused Patience turns to Fury.
Accusing is proving, where Malice and Force sit Judges.
Accusing the Times, is but excusing our selves.
Action is the proper Fruit of Knowledge.
Admiration is the Daughter of Ignorance.
Adversity flattereth no Man.
Adversity is easier borne, than Prosperity forgot.
Adversity makes wise, tho' not rich.
Adversity oftentimes leads to Prosperity.
Affairs, that are done by due Degrees, are soon ended.
Affinity in Hearts is the nearest Kindred.
Affirmations are apter to be believed than Negations.
After Cheese comes nothing,
After Christmas comes Lent. 
After Clouds, calm Weather.
After Death, the Doctor.
After Meat, Mustard.
After the greatest Danger, is the greatest Pleasure.
Against God's Wrath no Castle is Thunder-Proof.
Against the Wild-fire of the Mob there's no Defence.
After this Leaf another grows.
Age and Wedlock bring a Man to his Night-Cap.
Age and Wedlock tame Man and Beast.
Age and Wedlock we all desire, and repent of.
Agree, for the Law is costly.
Air coming in at a Window, is as bad as a Cross-Bow-shot.
Alexander himself was once a crying Babe.
Alexander was below a Man, when he affected to be a God.
Alike every Day makes a Clout on Sunday. 
Alms are the Golden-Key, that opens the Gate of Heaven.
Always you are to be rich next Year.
Ambition plagues her Proselytes.
Amendment is Repentance.
Among the People, Scoggin's a Doctor.
Among the Perils and Dangers of Life, Solitude is none of the least.
Anger begins with Folly, and ends with Repentance.
Anger is a sworn Enemy.
Anger is many times more hurtful, than the Injury that caused it.
Anger is the Fever and Frenzy of the Soul.
Anger is short liv'd in a good Man.
Anger makes a rich Man hated, and a poor Man scorned.
Anger may glance into the Breast of a wise Man, but rests only in the Bosom of Fools.
Anger punishes its self.
Angry Men and drunken Men, during the Fit, are distracted.
Angry Men seldom want Woe.
Another threshed what I reaped.
Antiquity cannot privilege an Error, nor Novelty prejudice a Truth.
Antiquity is not always a Mark of Verity.
Any thing for a quiet Life.
Apelles was not a Master-Painter the first Day.
Apes are never more Beasts, than when they wear Mens Clothes.
Application makes the Ass.
April and May are the Key of all the Year.
Are you afraid of him that dy'd last Year?
Are you there with your Bears?
Argument seldom convinces any one contrary to his Inclinations.
Arrogance is a Weed that grows mostly in a Dunghill.
Art helps Nature, and Experience Art.
Art must be deluded by Art.
Ask a Kite for a Feather, and she'll fay, she has but just enough to fly with.
Ask my Companion, if I'm a Thief.
Ask the Mother, if the Child be like his Father.
Ask the Seller, if his Ware be bad.
Ask thy Purse what thou should'st buy.
Asses die, and Wolves bury them.
Asses that bray most, eat least.
At a good Table we may go to School.
At a round Table the Herald's useless.
At Court, every one for himself.
At the end of the Game, you'll see who's the Winner.
At the End of the Work, you may judge of the Workman.
At the Gate which Suspicion enters, Love goes out.
At Weddings and Funerals, Friends are discerned from Kinsfolks.
Bacchus hath drown'd more Men than Neptune.
Backbiting oftner proceeds from Pride than Malice.
Bad Customs are better broke than kept up.
Bad Excuses are worse than none.
Bad Luck often brings good Luck.
Bad Priests bring the Devil into the Church.
Bald Heads are soon shaven.
Barbarous Asses ride on Barbary Horses.
Bare Words buy no Barley.
Bare Walls make gadding Housewives.
Barefoot must not go among Thorns.
Base Natures, if they find themselves suspected, will never be true.
Base Terms are Bellows to a slackening Fire.
Bashfulness is boyish.
Batchelor's Wives, and Maid's Children are well taught.
Bate me an Ace, quoth Bolton. 
Be a Father to Virtue, but a Father in-Law to Vice.
Be a Friend to thy self, and others will be so too.
Be aware of a fine Tongue; 'twill sting mortally.
Be as you would seem to be.
Be content; the Sea hath Fish enough.
Be Merry and Wise.
Be not choleric; 'twill make you look old.
Be not hasty to outbid another.
Be old betimes; that thou may'st long be so.
Be silent before a great Man; or speak what may please him.
Be silent, or speak something worth hearing.
Be the Business never so painful, you may have it done for Money.
Better a Barn filled, than a Bed.
Better a Blush in the Face, than a Spot in the Heart.
Better abridge petty Charges, than stoop to petty Gettings.
Better a fair Pair of Heels than a Halter.
Better a good Word than a Battle.
Better a lean Jade than an empty Halter.
Better a lean Peace than a fat Victory.
Better a little Fire to warm us, than a great one to burn us.
Better a Master be fear'd than despis'd.
Better a Mouse in the Pot, than no Flesh at all.
Better a Portion in a Wife than with a Wife.
Better a Tooth out, than always aching.
Better an empty House than an ill Tenant.
Better be a Cuckold and not know it, than be none, and every body fay so.
Better be alone than in bad Company.
Better be a Shrew than a Sheep.
Better be deny'd than deceiv'd.
Better be poor and live safe at Land, than be rich and perish in the Sea.
Better be poor than wicked.
Better be spighted than pitied.
Better be stung by a Nettle, than prick'd by a Rose.
Better be up to the Ancles, than quite over Head and Ears.
Better be unmannerly than troublesome.
Better Belly burst, than good Drink lost.
Better bow than break.
Better break your Word, than do worse in keeping it.
Better buy than borrow.
Better come at the latter End of a Feast, than the Beginning of a Fray.
Better cry phy Salt, than phy Stink.
Better cut the Shoe, than pinch the Foot.
Better die a Beggar, than live a Beggar.
Better direct well, than work hard.
Better do it, than wish it done.
Better dwell with a Dragon, than with a wicked Woman.
Better eat Salt with Philosophers of Greece, than eat Sugar with Courtezans of Italy. 
Better fare hard with good Men, than feast it with bad.
Better fed than taught, said the Churl to the Parson.
Better give a Shilling, than lend and lose half a Crown.
Better give the Wool than the whole Sheep.
Better go back, than lose your self.
Better go to Heaven in Rags, than to Hell in Embroidery.
Better go to Bed supperless, than rise in Debt.
Better half a Loaf than no Bread.
Better half an Egg than an empty Shell.
Better have a Dog fawn upon you, than bite you.
Better have an old Man to humour, than a young Rake to break your Heart.
Better have no Children, than sottish and mad ones.
Better have one Plough going than two Cradles.
Better hazard once, than be always in Fear.
Better keep the Devil at the Door, than turn him out of the House.
Better kiss a Knave, than be troubled with him.
Better known than trusted.
Better late ripe and bear, than early blossom and blast.
Better late than never.
Better leave than lack.
Better live in a poor Hovel, than be buried in a rich Sepulcher.
Better live within Compass, than have large Comings in.
Better lose a Jest than a Friend.
Better master one, than engage with ten.
Better never have been handsome when young, than ugly when old.
Better no Ring, than a Ring of a Rush.
Better one's House be too little one Day, than too big all the Year after.
Better ride an Ass that carries us, than a Horse that throws us.
Better fay nothing, than nothing to the Purpose.
Better shelter under an old Hedge, than a young Fuzbush.
Better sit up all Night, than go to Bed to a Dragon.
Better some of a Pudding than none of a Pye.
Better so than worse.
Better spent than spared.
Better's a dirty Hog than no Hog at all.
Better's the Head of an Ass, than the Tail of a Horse.
Better's the last Smile, than the first Laughter.
Better strive with an ill Ass, than carry the Wood one's self.
Better to say here it is, than here it was.
Better the Foot slip, than the Tongue.
Better the Head of the Yeomen, than the Tail of the Gentry.
Better thou perish, than Truth.
Better two Drones be preserv'd, than one good Bee perish.
Better two Losses, than one Sorrow.
Better unborn, than unbred.
Better untaught, than ill taught.
Better walk leisurely, than lie abroad all Night.
Better were out Shoes than Sheets.
Better sell, than live poorly.
Better go away longing, than loathing.
Be you never so high, the Law is above you.
Beads about the Neck, and the Devil in the Heart.
Bear with Evil, and expect Good.
Bear-Garden Breeding.
Beauty's a Blossom.
Beauty draws more than Oxen.
Beauty in Women is like the Flowers in the Spring; but Virtue is like the Stars of Heaven.
Beauty is but Skin deep; within is Filth and Putrefaction.
Beauty is no Inheritance.
Beauty is Potent; but Money is more Potent.
Beauty is soon blasted.
Beauty is the Subject of a Blemish.
Beauty may have fair Leaves, yet bitter Fruit.
Beauty will buy no Beef.
Beauty without Virtue is a Curse.
Beauties without Fortunes, have Sweethearts plenty, but Husbands none at all.
Bees that have Honey in their Mouths, have Stings in their Tails.
Before the Cat can lick her Ear.
Beggars and Borrowers must be no Chusers.
Beggars fear no Rebellion.
Beggars can never be Bankrupts.
Beggars may sing before a Thief.
Beggars never are out of their Way.
Begging of a Courtesy, is selling of Liberty.
Begin with Argus' Eyes, and finish with Briareus' Hands.
Believe well, and have well.
Bells call others to Church, but go not themselves.
Best dealing with an Enemy, when you take him at his weakest.
Best to bend it while a Twig.
Bestow on me what you will, so it be none of your Secrets.
Between Hawk and Buzzard.
Between promising and performing, a Man may marry his Daughter.
Between two Stools, the Breech cometh to the Ground.
Beware of, Had I wist.
Beware of no Man more than thy self.
Beware of the Fore-part of a Woman, the Hind-part of a Mule, and all Sides of a Priest.
Beware of the Stone thou stumbledst at before.
Bind so, as you may unbind.
Birds are entangled by their Feet, and Men by their Tongues.
Birds pay equal Honours to all Men.
Birth is much, but Breeding is more.
Biting and scratching gets the Cat with Kitten.
Bitter Pills may have wholesome Effects.
Black Plums may eat as sweet as white.
Black will take no other Hue.
Blessed is the Peace-maker, not the Conqueror.
Blessings are not valued, till they are gone.
Blind Men must not run.
Blind Men should not judge of Colours.
Blind Men's Wives need no Paint.
Blots are no Blots, till hit.
Bloody and deceitful Men dig their own Graves.
Blow first, and sip afterwards.
Blow not against the Hurricane.
Blow, Smith; and you'll get Money.
Blow thy own Pottage, and not mine.
Blushing is Virtue's Colour.
Blush like a black Dog.
Bodily Labour earns not much.
Boil not the Pap before the Child be born.
Boil Stones in Butter, and you may sip the Broth.
Bold Resolution is the Favourite of Providence.
Boldness is blind.
Boldness in Business is the first, second, and third thing.
Borrow not too much upon Time to come.
Borrowed Garments never sit well.
Both Folly and Wisdom come upon us with Years.
Bought Friends, are not Friends indeed.
Bought Wit is best, but may cost too much.
Bounty may be Bounty; and yet not go a begging for Admittance.
Bows too long bent, grow weak.
Boys will be Men.
Brag's a good Dog, but dares not bite.
Brave Actions never want a Trumpet.
Bread with Eyes, Cheese without Eyes, and Wine that leaps up to the Eyes.
Bribes throw Dust into cunning Men's Eyes.
Bribes will enter without knocking.
Bring not a Bagpipe to a Man in Trouble.
Bring your Line to the Wall, not the Wall to the Line.
Broken Sacks will hold no Corn.
Buffoonry and Scurrility are the Corruption of Wit; as Knavery is of Wisdom.
Burn not your House, to fright away the Mice.
Bush natural; more Hairs than Wit.
Business is the Salt of Life.
Business may be troublesome, but Idleness is pernicious.
Business and Action strengthen the Brain, but too much Study weakens it.
Busy-bodies never want a bad Day.
But help me to Money, and I'll help my self to Friends.
But one Egg, and that addled too.
Butter is Gold in the Morning, Silver at Noon, and Lead at Night.
Buy and sell, and live by the Loss.
Buy at a Market, and sell at home.
Buyers want an hundred Eyes, Sellers none.
Buying and Selling is but Winning and Losing.
By Art and Deceit Men live half the Year; and by Deceit and Art the other half.
By doing nothing, we learn to do ill.
By Fits and Girts, as an Ague takes a Goose.
By Hook, or by Crook.
By Ignorance we mistake, and by Mistakes we learn.
By Land or Water, the Wind is ever in my Face.
By requiting one Friend, we invite many.
By the Husk you may guess at the Nut.
Calamity is the Touchstone of a brave Mind.
Call me Cousin, but cozen me not.
Call not a Surgeon before you are wounded.
Call your Husband Cuckold in Jest and ne'er suspect you.
Calumny and Conjecture may injure Innocency it self.
Can a Mill go with the Water that's past?
Can a Mouse fall in Love with a Cat?
Can a Jackanapes be merry, when a Clog is at his Heels?
Can you make a Pipe of a Pig's Tail?
Can't I be your Friend, but I must be your Fool too?
Canterbury's the higher Rack, but Winchester's the better Manger.
Capons were at first but Chickens.
Care and Diligence bring Luck.
Careless Men let their End steal upon them unawares, and unprovided.
Careless Shepherds make many a Feast for the Wolf.
Care's no Cure.
Care not; and that will prevent Horns.
Care will kill a Cat; yet there's no living without it.
Carrion Kites will never make good Hawks.
Carry Coals to Newcastle. 
Carry your Knife even, between the Paring and the Apple.
Cast a Bone in the De'el's Teeth, and it will save you.
Cast no Dirt into the Well, that hath given you Water.
Cast not out thy foul Water, till thou hast clean.
Cast not the Helve aster the Hatchet.
Cat after Kind.
Cats are hungry, when a Crust will content them.
Cats hide their Claws.
Catholick Charity makes us Members of the Catholick Church.
Cause not thine own Dog to bite thee.
Censure and Scandal are not the same.
Censure's the Tax a Man pays the Publick for being eminent. 
Cent. per Cent. do we pay for every vicious Pleasure.
Ceremonious Friends are so, as far as a Compliment will go.
Chains of Gold are stronger than Chains of Iron.
Chance is a Dicer.
Change of Pasture makes fat Calves.
Change of Weather is the Discourse of Fools.
Chare-Folks are never paid enough.
Charity and Pride have different Aims, yet both feed the Poor.
Charity begins at home, but should not end there.
Charity excuses not Cheating.
Charity may be mistaken, but shall never be rewarded.
Charity will rather wipe out the Score, than inflame the Reckoning.
Charon waits for all.
Cheat me in the Price, but not in the Goods.
Chickens, now-a-days, cram the Cock,
Children and Fools tell Truth.
Children and Fools have merry Lives.
Children are poor Men's Riches.
Children are certain Cares, but uncertain Comforts.
Children cry for Nuts and Apples; and old Men for Gold and Silver.
Children have wide Ears, and long Tongues.
Children increase the Cares of Life; but mitigate the Remembrance of Death.
Children suck the Mother, when they are young; and the Father, when grown up.
Children, when little, make Parents Fools; when great, mad.
Child's Pig, but Father's Hog.
Choak up, Child; the Church-yard's nigh.
Choler hates a Counsellor.
Choler is the only unruly Passion, that justifies its self.
Cholerick Men are blind and mad.
Church-Work goes on slowly.
Chuse a Wife rather by your Ear, than your Eye.
City-Gates stand open to the Bad as well at the Good.
Civil Carriage is the best Sign of Affection to a Woman.
Claw me, and I'll claw thee.
Clean Hands want no Washball.
Cleaning a Blot with blotted Fingers, maketh a greater Blur.
Clear and round Dealing is the Honour of Man's Nature.
Close Mouth.
Clouds, that the Sun builds up, darken him.
Cloudy Mornings may turn to clear Evening.
Clowns arc best in their own Company; but Gentlemen are best every where.
Coarse Bread at home, it better than roast Meat abroad.
Cold of Complexion, good of Condition.
Come and welcome; go by, and no Quarrel.
Come, crack me this Nut, quoth Bumstead. 
Come, slit me this Hair.
Come, uncalled; sit, unserved.
Command your Man, and do it your self.
Command your Wealth, else that will command you.
Commend not your Wife, Wine, nor House.
Common Fame hath a Blister on its Tongue.
Common People hang more after Praise than Profit.
Common Sense is the Growth of all Countries.
Commonly he is not stricken again, who laughs when he strikes.
Company in Misery makes it light.
Company makes Cuckolds.
Comparison, more than Reality, makes Men happy or wretched.
Comparisons are odious.
Compliments cost nothing, yet many pay dear for them.
Concealed Goodness is a sort of Vice.
Concealed Grudges are Gangrenes in Friendship.
Conceited half-witted Fellows think nothing can be done without them.
Confess Debt, and beg Days.
Confession of a Fault makes half amends.
Confidence goeth farther in Company, than good Sense.
Conform to common Custom, and not to common Folly.
Congruity is the Mother of Love.
Conscience can't be compelled.
Consideration gets as many Victories as Rashness loses.
Consideration is half Conversion.
Consideration is the Parent of Wisdom.
Constant Complaints never get Pity.
Contempt is usually worse borne than real Injuries.
Contempt will cause Spight to drink of her own Poison.
Contend not about a Goat's Beard.
Content is Happiness.
Content is more than a Kingdom.
Content is the Philosopher's Stone, that turns all it touches into Gold.
Content lodges oftner in Cottages than Palaces.
Continual Cheerfulness is a Sign of Wisdom.
Contradiction should waken Attention, not Passion.
Conversation teaches more than Meditation.
Cook Russian, able to scald the Devil out of his Feathers.
Cooks are not to be taught in their own Kitchen.
Cool Words scald not the Tongue.
Corn in good Years is Hay; in ill Years Straw is Corn.
Corn is not to be gather'd in the Blade, but the Ear.
Cornelius ought to be Tacitus. 
Correction should not respect so much what is past, as what is to come.
Corruption of the Best becomes the Worst.
Cover your self with Honey, and the Flies will have you.
Covetous Men are condemn'd to dig in the Mines for they know not who.
Covetous Men are shamefully rich.
Covetous Men's Chests are rich, not they.
Covetous Men live Drudges, to die Wretches.
Covetous rich Men are not so well fed, cloathed, or respected, as other Men.
Covetousness, as well as Prodigality, brings a Man to a Morsel of Bread.
Covetousness breaks the Sack.
Covetousness brings nothing home.
Covetousness is always filling a bottomless Vessel.
Covetousness is generally incurable.
Covetousness often starves other Vices.
Counsel is as welcome to him, as a Shoulder of Mutton to a sick Horse.
Counsel is Happiness.
Counsel is irksome, when the Matter is past Remedy.
Counsel is no Command.
Counsel must be followed, not praised.
Counsel over Cups is crazy.
Count not your Chickens before they be hatch'd.
Courage and Resolution are the Spirit and Soul of Virtue.
Courage, Conduct and Perseverance conquer all before them.
Courage ought to have Eyes as well as Arms.
Courage without Fortune, destroys a Man.
Courtesy is the inseparable Companion of Virtue.
Courtesy on one Side can never last long.
Courts keep no Almanacks.
Cousin-Germans, quite removed.
Cowards are cruel.
Cowards are made to be trampled on, unless their Wit cover them.
Cowards run the greatest Danger of any Men in a Battle.
Cowardice is afraid to be known or seen.
Craft borders upon Knavery; Wisdom never uses, nor wants it.
Craft counting all things, brings nothing home.
Craft must have Clothes; but Truth loves to go naked.
Crafty Evasions fave not Veracity.
Crafty Men deal in Generals.
Credit lost is a Venice-Glass broken, which cannot be soder'd.
Credulity tells People we are short-sighted.
Crimes may be secret; but yet not secure.
Cringing is a gainful Accomplishment.
Crooked by Nature, is never made strait by Education.
Crosses are Ladders to Heaven;
Crosses, tho' they be not pleasant, yet are whole-some.
Crows are never the whiter for washing themselves.
Crows bewail the dead Sheep, and then eat them.
Cruelty deserves no Mercy.
Cruelty is a Tyrant, that is always attended with Fear.
Cruelty is the first Attribute of the Devil.
Cuckolds are Christians all the World over.
Cuckolds themselves are the very last that know it.
Cunning borders upon ill Craft.
Cunning Craft is but the Ape of Wisdom.
Curiosity is endless, restless and useless.
Curiosity is ill Manners in another's House.
Custom is another Nature.
Custom is generally too hard for Conscience.
Custom is the Guide of the Ignorant.
Custom is the Plague of wise Men, and the Idol of Fools.
Custom makes all Things easy.
Custom without Reason, is but an ancient Error.
Cut off the Head and Tail, and throw the rest away.
Cut, or give me the Bill.
Cut your Coat according to your Cloth.
Cutting out well, is better than sewing up well.
Danger and Delight grow both upon one Stock.
Dangers are overcome with Dangers.
Danger is next Neighbour to Security.
Danger past, God is forgotten.
Daughters, and dead Fish, are no keeping Wares
Daws love one another's Prattle.
Day and Night; Sun and Moon; Air and Light, every one must have, and none can buy.
Dead Folks are past fooling.
Dead Folks can't bite.
Dead Men are of no Family; and are akin to none.
Dead Mice feel no Cold.
Deaf Men are quick-ey'd and distrustful.
Deaf Men go away with the blame.
Death and the Sun are two things not to be look'd on with a steady Eye.
Death devours Lambs as well as Sheep.
Death hath nothing terrible in it, but what Life hath made so.
Death hath not so ghastly a Face at a Distance, as it hath at Hand.
Death is a certain Remedy, for the Injuries of Fortune and Vexations of Life.
Death is bitter to a Man in Prosperity, or in much Business.
Death is the grand Leveller.
Death keeps no Calendar.
Death meets us every where.
Death rather frees us from Ills, than robs us of our Goods.
Death surprizes us in the midst of our Hopes.
Death's Day is Doom's Day.
Debt is a heavy Burthen to an honest Mind; but thievish Borrowers make light of it.
Debt is an evil Conscience.
Debt is the worst Poverty.
Deceit is in Haste; but Honesty can stay a fair Leisure.
Deceiving those that trust us, is more than a Sin.
Deceiving of a Deceiver, is no Knavery.
Decency and Decorum are not Pride.
Deeds are Fruits, Words are Leaves.
Defiance provokes an Enemy.
Delays increase Desires, and sometimes extinguish them.
Deliberating is not delaying.
Denying a Fault, doubles it.
Dependance is a poor Trade.
Desert and Rewards very often go not together.
Desire of Glory is the last Garment, that even wise Men put off.
Desire to forsake the World.
Despair gives Courage to a Coward.
Despair hath damn'd some; but Presumption Multitudes.
Desperate Cases must have desperate Cures.
Destiny leads the willing, but drags the unwilling.
Destroy the Lion, while he is yet but a Whelp.
Detraction is a Weed, that grows only on Dunghills.
Detractors are their own Foes, and the World's Enemies.
Dexterity comes by Experience.
Diamonds cut Diamonds.
Disk's as dapper as a Cock-Wren.
Did you ever before hear an Ass play upon a Lute?
Different Sores must have different Salves.
Difficulty mates Desire.
Difficulties give way to Diligence.
Diffidence is the right Eye of Prudence.
Dignities and Honours set off Merit, as good Dress does handsome Persons.
Diligence alone is a good Patrimony; but Negligence will waste a fair Estate.
Diligence is the Mother of good Fortune.
Dine with Duke Humfrey.
Dirt is dirtiest upon clean white Linen.
Dirty Troughs will serve dirty Sows.
Discontents generally arise from our Desires more than our Wants.
Discreet Stops, make speedy Journies.
Discreet Wives have sometimes neither Eyes nor Ears.
Discretion in Speech is more than Eloquence.
Diseases are the Price of ill Pleasures.
Disputations leave Truth in the Middle, and Party at both Ends.
Dissembled Sin is double Wickedness.
Distrust is the Mother of Safety, but must keep out of Sight.
Do all you can to be good, and you'll be so.
Do as little as you can to repent of.
Do as most do, and Men will speak well of thee.
Do Business, but be not a Slave to it.
Do Evil, and look for the like.
Do good, if you expect to receive it.
Do in the Hole, as thou would'st do in the Hall.
Do it well, that thou may'st not do it twice.
Do nothing hastily, but catching of Fleas.
Do the likeliest, and hope the best.
Do well, and have well.
Dogs are hard drove, when they eat Dogs.
Dogs bark as they are bred.
Dogs never go into Mourning, when a Horse dies.
Dogs once scalded, are afraid even of cold Water.
Dogs ought to bark, before they bite.
Dogs, that bark at a Distance, never bite.
Dogs, that hunt foulest, hit off most Faults.
Dogs, that put up many Hares, kill none.
Dogs wag their Tails, not so much in love to you, as your Bread.
Don't turn Baker, if your Head be made of Butter.
Double Charging, will break even a Cannon.
Dover-Court; all Speakers and no Hearers.
Draff is good enough for Swine.
Draff was his Errand, but Drink he would have.
Draw not thy Bow, before thy Arrow be fixed.
Drawn Wells are seldom dry.
Dress up even a little Toad, and it will look pretty.
Drink and Drought come not always together.
Drink washes off the Dawb, and discovers the Man.
Drink Wine, and have the Gout; drink none, and have it too.
Drink Wine in Winter for Cold, and in Summer for Heat.
Drinking Kindness is drunken Friendship.
Drive not a second Nail, till the first be clinched.
Drive not too many Ploughs at once; some will make foul Work.
Drive that Nail that will go.
Drop by Drop, the Sea is drained.
Drought never bred Dearth in England. 
Drowning Men will catch at a Rush.
Drown not thy self, to save a drowning Man.
Drumming is not the way to catch an Hare.
Drunkards have a Fool's Tongue and a Knave's Heart.
Drunkenness is a Pair of Spectacles to see the Devil and all his Works.
Drunkenness makes Men Fools; some Beasts, some Devils.
Drunkenness turns a Man out of himself, and leaves a Beast in his room.
Ducks fare well in the Thames. 
Dumb Folks get no Land.
Dying is as natural as living.
Early ripe, early rotten.
Early sow, early mow.
Early up, and never the near.
Easy it is to bowl down Hill.
Easier it is to fall, than rise.
Easier it is to pull down, than build.
Eat, and welcome: fast, and heartily welcome.
Eat Peas with the King, and Cherries with the Beggar.
Eat-well is Drink-well's Brother.
Eaten Bread is forgotten.
Education, begins a Gentleman, Conversation compleats him.
Education polishes good Natures, and correcteth bad ones.
Eggs will be in three Bellies in four and twenty Hours.
Either the Hearer or Relater of Fopperies, must be a Fool.
Emulation layeth up a Grudge.
Emulation is lively and generous, Envy base and malicious.
Empty Hands allure no Hawks.
Empty Vessels give the greatest Sound.
E'en venture on, as Johnson did on his Wife.
Enemies may serve for Witnesses, as well as Friends may.
England's the Paradise of Women, and Hell of Horses.
Enough's as good as a Feast.
Enough is a Feast; too much, a Vanity.
Enough to keep the Wolf from the Door.
Enquire not what boils in another's Pot.
Enter upon Love when you will; but give over when you can.
Envy and Covetousness are never satisfy'd.
Envy and Idleness married together, begot Curiosity.
Envy hath a Leer of her Father the Devil, but Cruelty, his very Face.
Envy is asham'd, and afraid to be seen.
Envy is so shameful and cowardly a Passion, that no body ever had the Confidence to own it.
Envy never yet enrich'd any Man.
Envy shooteth at others, and woundeth her self.
Error is always in Haste.
Error is endless.
Error, tho' blind her self, yet sometimes bringeth forth seeing Children.
Errors, in the first Concoction, are hardly mended in the second.
Eternity has no grey Hairs.
Even a Child may beat a Man that's bound.
Even a Fly hath its Spleen.
Even a Pin is good for something; and that's more than you are.
Even a Venice-Glass, if well kept, will last long.
Even an Ass will not fall twice in the same Quick-sand.
Even an Emmet may seek Revenge.
Even as the blind Man shot the Crow.
Even covetous Men have sometimes their Intervals of Generosity.
Even doubtful Accusations leave a Stain behind them.
Even Fools sometimes speak shrewdly.
Even Sugar it self may spoil a good Dish.
Even ill Luck it self is good for something in a wise Man's Hand.
Even Reckonings keep long Friends.
Even too much Praise is a Burthen.
Evening-Oats are good Morning-Fodder.
Ever drink, ever dry.
Every Age confutes old Errors, and begets new.
Every Ass loves to hear himself bray.
Every Ass thinks himself worthy to stand with the King's Horses.
Every Bean hath its Black.
Every Bird is known by its Feathers.
Every Bird likes its own Nest best.
Every Bird must hatch its own Eggs.
Every Block will not make a Mercury.
Every Body's Business is no Body's Business.
Every Cock is proud on his own Dunghill.
Every Day brings a new Light.
Every Dog is stout at his own Door.
Every Dog has its Day; and every Man his Hour.
Every Fool can find Faults, that a great many wise Men can't remedy.
Every good Scholar is not a good Schoolmaster.
Every Heart hath its own ach.
Every Herring must hang by his own Gills.
Every Horse thinks his own Pack heaviest.
Every Man, a little beyond himself, is a Fool.
Every Man doth his own Business best.
Every Man for himself, and God for us all.
Every Man hath a Fool in his Sleeve.
Every Man hath his Lot.
Every Man hath his own Planet.
Every Man hath his weak Side.
Every Man is a Fool, or a Physician, at Forty.
Every Man is best known to himself.
Every Man is not born with a Silver Spoon in his Mouth.
Every Man is the Son of his own Works.
Every Man living hath something to do.
Every Man must eat a Peck of Dirt before he dies.
Every Man's Nose will not make a Shooing-Horn.
Every Man to his Trade, quoth the Boy to the Bishop.
Every Man will shoot at the Enemy, but few will gather the Shafts.
Every May-be hath a May-not-be. 
Every Miller draws the Water to his own Mill.
Every Monkey will have his Gambols.
Every Monster hath its Multitudes.
Every Mote doth not blind a Man.
Every one as they like; as the Woman said, when she kiss'd her Cow.
Every one can keep House better than her Mother, till she trieth.
Every one can tame a Shrew, but he that has her.
Every one hath a Penny for the new Alehouse.
Every one is glad to see a Knave caught in his own Trap.
Every one knows how to find Fault.
Every one lays his Faults upon the Times.
Every one's Faults are not written in their Foreheads.
Every one talks of what he loves.
Every one thinks he knows much.
Every one thinks himself able to advise another.
Every Path hath a Puddle.
Every Penny that is taken, is not clear Gains.
Every Plummet is not for every Sound.
Every Potter praises his own Pot.
Every Reed will not make a Pipe.
Every Scale hath its Counterpoise.
Every Scrap of a wise Man's Time is worth saving.
Every Shoe fits not every Foot.
Every Slip is not a Fall.
Every Sow deserves not a Sack-Posset.
Every Sparrow to its Ear of Wheat.
Every Sprat, now-a-days, calls it self a Herring.
Every thing hath an end; and a Pudding hath two.
Every thing hath its Time, and that Time must be watch'd.
Every thing is good in its Season.
Every thing is the worse for wearing.
Every thing would live.
Every Tide will have an Ebb.
Every time the Sheep bleats, it loseth a mouthful.
Every Tub must stand upon its own Bottom.
Every Tub smells of the Wine it holds.
Evil is soon believed.
Examples are the best Lessons for Youth.
Examples teach more than Precepts.
Excess of Obligations may lose a Friend.
Exchange is no Robbery.
Experience is good, if not bought too dear.
Experience is the Father of Wisdom, and Memory the Mother.
Experience is the great Baffler of Speculation.
Experience is the Mistress of Fools.
Experience perfects Speculations.
Experience teacheth Fools; and he is a great one, that will not learn by it.
Face to Face, the Truth comes out.
Faint Heart ne'er won fair Lady.
Faint Praise is Disparagement.
Fair and foolish.
Fair and softly goes far in a Day.
Fair Faces need no Paint.
Fair Words sill not the Belly.
Fair Words please Fools.
Faith sees by the Ears.
Fall Back, sell Edge.
Fame is a magnifying Glass.
Fame is a thin Shadow of Eternity.
Fame is but the Breath of the People; and that often unwholesome.
Fame is in the keeping of the Mob.
Fancy may boult Bran, and think it Flour.
Fancy may kill or cure.
Fancy surpasses Beauty.
Far-fetch'd and dear-bought, is good for Ladies.
Far from Court, far from Care.
Farewell and be hang'd; Friends must part.
Fat Housekeepers make lean Executors.
Fat Paunches make lean Pates.
Fat Sorrow is better than lean Sorrow.
Fate leads the Willing, but drives the Stubborn.
Fathers, in reclaiming of a Child, should outwit him, and seldom beat him.
Faults of Ignorance are excuseable only, where the Ignorance it self is so.
Fear can keep a Man out of Danger, but Courage only can support him in it.
Fear is one part of Prudence.
Fear is stronger than Love.
Feather by Feather, the Goose is pluck'd.
Feasting makes no Friendship.
February makes a Bridge, and March breaks it.
Feed a Pig, and you'll have a Hog.
Feeling hath no Fellow.
Felicity lies much in Fancy.
Felicity eats up Circumspection.
Fetters even of Gold are heavy.
Fetters of Gold are still Fetters; and silken Cords pinch.
Few are sit to be entrusted with themselves.
Few dare write the true News of their Chamber.
Few Hearts that are not double, sew Tongues that are not cloven.
Few Leaves and bad Fruit.
Few Men will be better than their Interest bids them.
Few take Wives for God's sake, or for fair Looks.
Few there are that will endure a true Friend.
Few things in the World will bear too much refining.
Fie, fie! Horse-play is not for Gentlemen.
Fields have Eyes, and Hedges Ears.
Fight Dog, sight Bear.
Fine a poor Man Six-pence, and not a Bottle of Wine.
Fine Cloaths oftentimes hide a base Descent.
Fine Cloaths wear soonest out of Fashion.
Fine Cloth is never out of Fashion.
Fine Dressing is usually a foul House, swept before the Door.
Fire and Water are good Servants, but bad Masters.
Fire and Water are not more necessary than Friends are.
Fire in Flax will smoke.
Fire, quoth the Fox, when he piss'd on the Ice.
First come, first serv'd.
Fish and Guests smell at three Days old.
Fish are not to be caught with a Bird-call.
Fish makes no Broth.
Fish ought to swim thrice.
Fishes follow the Bait.
Flattery displays a braver Flag than Humility.
Flatterers haunt not Cottages.
Flattery gets Favour.
Flattery sits in the Parlour, when plain Dealing is kick'd out of Doors.
Flesh never stands so high, but a Dog will venture his Legs.
Flight towards Preferment, will be but slow, without some golden Feathers.
Fling down the Nests, and the Rooks will he gone.
Follow the River, and you'll get to Sea.
Folly and Learning (such as it is) often dwell in the same Person.
Folly as well as Wisdom is justify'd by its Children.
Folly is often sick of its self.
Folly is never long pleas'd with its self.
Folly is the Product of all Countries and Ages.
Folly is the Queen Regent of the World.
Foolish Fear doubleth Danger.
Fools and Madmen ought not to be left in their own Company.
Fools and obstinate Men mike the Lawyers rich.
Fools and Philosophers were made out of the same Metal.
Fools are all the World over; as he said that shod the Goose.
Fools are always resolute, to make good their own Folly.
Fools are not to be convinced.
Fools are pleased with their own Blunders.
Fools are wise Men in the Affairs of Women.
Fool's Bolts may sometimes hit the Mark.
Fools build Houses; and wise Men enjoy them.
Fools grow without watering.
Fool's Haste is no Speed.
Fools have Fortune.
Fools make Feasts, and wise Men eat them.
Fools may ask more in an Hour, than wise Men can answer in seven.
Fools may invent Fashions, that wise Men will wear.
Fools may sometimes give wise Men Counsel.
Fools lade out all the Water, and wise Men take the Fish.
Fools set Stools for wise Men to stumble at.
Fools tie Knots, and wise Men loose them.
Fools will be meddling.
Fools will not part with their Bauble for all Lombard street. 
Foppish Dressing tells the World, the Outside is the best of the Poppet.
Forbearance is no Acquittance.
Fore-cast is better than Work-hard.
Force without Fore cast, is of little avail.
For Fashion's sake, as Dogs go to Church.
Forget other's' Faults by remembring your own.
Forgetting of a Wrong is a mild Revenge.
For mad Words, deaf Ears.
For my own Pleasure, as the Man struck his Wife.
For one rich Man that is content, there are an hundred that are not.
For want of a Nail the Shoe is lost; for want of a Shoe the Horse is lost; for want of a Horse the Man is lost.
For whom does the blind Man's Wife paint herself?
Fortune can take from us nothing but what she gave us.
Fortune favours Fools.
Fortune gives her Hand to a bold Man.
Fortune is like the Market, where many times, if you stay a little, the Price will fall.
Fortune is weary to carry one and the same Man always.
Fortune often lends her Smiles, as Churls do Money, to undo the Debtor.
Fortune often rewards with Interest those that have Patience to wait for her.
Fortune rarely brings Good or Evil singly.
Four Eyes see more than two.
Foul Water will quench Fire.
Foxes dig not their own Holes.
Foxes never fare better, than when they art curst.
Foxes prey furthest from their Earths.
Fraud and Deceit are always in Haste.
Friends are not so soon got or recover'd, as lost.
Friends are the nearest Relations.
Friends got without Desert, will be lost without Cause.
Friendship and Company are a bad Excuse for ill Actions.
Friendship and importunate Begging feed not at the same Dish.
Friendship consists not in saying, What's the best News?
Friendship increases in visiting Friends, but in visiting them seldom.
Friendship is not to be bought at a Fair.
Friendship is the most sacred of all moral Bonds.
Friendship is the Perfection of Love.
Friendships multiply Joys, and divide Griefs.
Friendship that flames, goes out in a flash.
Friendship, the older it grows, the stronger it is.
Friends may meet, but Mountains never.
Friends need no formal Invitation.
Frightning of a Bird is not the way to catch it.
From Fame to Infamy is a beaten Road.
From our Ancestors come our Names; but from our Virtues our Honours.
Frost and Fraud have foul Ends.
Frugality is an Estate alone.
Fruit ripens not well in the Shade.
Full Bellies make empty Skulls.
Full Guts neither run away, nor sight well.
Full of Courtesy, and full of Craft.
Furniture and Mane make the Horse sell.1637 Gadding Gossips shall dine on the Pot-lid.
Gain got by a Lye, will burn one's Fingers.
Gall'd Horses can't endure the Comb.
Gall in Mirth is an ill Mixture, and sometimes Truth is bitter.
Game is cheaper in the Market, than in the Fields and Woods.
Garlands are not for every Brow.
Gawdy slothful People are Wasps, that eat up the Bees Honey.
Gay Clothing is the Happiness of Children and the weakest Women.
Geese with Geese, and Women with Women.
Generally we love our selves more than we hate others.
Gentry by Blood is bodily Gentry.
Getting out well, is a Quarter of the Journey.
Gifts break a Rock.
Gifts from Enemies are dangerous.
Gifts make Beggars bold.
Give a Dog an ill Name, and his Work is done.
Give a Man Luck, and throw him into the Sea.
Give a poor Man Six-pence, and not a Bottle of Wine.
Give even the Devil his Due.
Give him an Inch, and he'll take an Ell.
Give him but Rope enough, and he'll hang himself.
Give Losers leave to speak, and Winners to laugh
Give not Pearls to the Hogs.
Give the Piper a Penny to play, and Two-pence to leave off.
Giving is dead, and restoring is deadly sick.
Glowing Coals will be sparkling.
Go farther, and fare worse.
Go into the Country, to hear what News in Town.
Go steal an Horse, and then you'll die without being sick.
Go to another Door; for this will not be open'd.
Goats are not sold at every Fair.
God defend me from the still Water, and I'll keep my self from the Rough.
God gave him no Children; but the Devil furnished him with abundance of Bastards.
God give me a rich Husband, tho' he be an Ass.
God gives whole Days to the Fortunate, and but some Hours to the Unhappy.
God giveth his Wrath by Weight, but his Mercy without Measure.
God grant me to contend with those that understand me.
God help the Fool, quoth Pedley. 
God help the Rich; the Poor can beg.
God is always at Leisure to do good to those that ask it.
God keep me from the Man, that hath but one thing to mind.
God knows who are the best Pilgrims.
God made no Body to forsake him.
God makes; and Apparel shapes: but its Money that finishes the Man.
God never sends Mouths, but he sends Meat.
God permits the Wicked; but not for ever.
God reaches us good things, by our own Hands.
God save thee, and give thee a Cloke.
God's Help is better than early Rising.
God send me a Friend, that will tell me of my Faults.
God sends Cold after Clothes.
God sends Meat, and the Devil sends Cooks.
God send you more Wit, and me more Money.
God who made the World so wisely, as wisely governs it.
Gold and Silver were mingled with Dirt, till Avarice parted them.
Gold causeth strange Disorders, when it falls into a Fool's Hand.
Gold is no Balm to a wounded Spirit.
Gold, when present, causeth Fear; when absent, Grief.
Golden Dreams make Men awake hungry.
Gone is the Goose that the great Egg did lay.
Good Actions are the best Sacrifice we can offer to God.1698 Good Actions carry their Warrant with them.
Good and Evil are chiefly in the Imagination.
Good at a Distance, is better than Evil at Hand.
Good Bargains are Pick-pockets.
Good Bees never turn to Drones.
Good Blood makes poor Pudding without Suet.
Good Cheap, is Dear at long-run.
Good Clothes open all Doors.
Good Coral needs no Colouring.
Good Counsel makes a proud Man and a Fool angry.
Good Counsel never comes amiss.
Good Dancers have mostly better Heels than Heads.
Good Deeds remain; all things else perish.
Good for the Liver may be bad for the Spleen.
Good Goose, don't bite.
Good Horses can't be of a bad Colour.
Good Jests bite like Lambs, not like Dogs.
Good Kings never make War, but for the sake of Peace.
Good Language cures great Sores.
Good Luck reaches farther than long Arms.
Good Men are a publick Good.
Good Men must die; but Death cannot kill them quite.
Good Men want the Laws for nothing but to defend themselves.
Good Nature is a great Misfortune, if it want Prudence.
Good Nature is the proper Soil upon which Virtue grows.
Good Nature without Prudence, is Foolishness.
Good Neighbours, and true Friends, are two things.
Good Offices are the Cement of Society.
Good Paymasters need no Surety.
Good Paymasters need not bring a Pawn.
Good Purposes should be the Directors of good Actions, not the Apology for bad.
Good Swimmers are oftnest drowned.
Good that comes too late, is as good as nothing.
Good Ware makes a quick Market.
Good Wine needs no Bush.
Good Wits jump.
Good Words cool more than cold Water.
Good Words cost no more than bad.
Good Words cost nothing, but are worth much.
Good Words fill not a Sack.
Good Works will never save you; but you can never be saved without them.
Goods are theirs only, who enjoy them.
Goslins lead the Geese to Water.
Gossiping and Lying go together.
Gossips and Tale-bearers set afire all the Houses they come into.
Government of the Will, is better than Increase of Knowledge.
Grain by Grain, and the Hen fills her Belly.
Grandfather's Servants are never good.
Grantham-Gruel, nine Grats in a Gallon of Water.
Grasp no more than thy Hand will hold.
Gratefulness is the poor Man's Payment.
Gratitude is the least of Virtues, but Ingratitude is the worst of Vices.
Gratitude preserves old Friendship, and procures new.
Graves are of all Sizes.
Great and Good are seldom the same Man.
Great Braggers, little Doers.
Great Designs require great Considerations.
Great Doings at Gregory's; heat the Oven twice for a Custard.
Great Gain makes Work easy.
Great Guts, and small Hopes.
Great Honours and Avarice fly one another.
Great Hopes make great Men.1760 Great Marks are soonest hit.
Great Men have more Adorers than Friends.
Great Men's Vices are accounted Sacred.
Great Minds and great Fortunes don't always go together.
Great Persons seldom see their Face in a true Glass.
Great Riches are of no real and substantial Use.
Great Ships ask deep Waters.
Great Solitude is a sort of Madness.
Great Spirits are easy in Prosperity, and quiet in Adversity.
Great Trees keep under the little ones.
Great Vices, as well as great Virtues, make Men famous.
Great Wealth and Content, seldom live together.
Great Wealth makes us neither more Wise, nor more Healthy.
Great Weight may hang on small Wires.
Green Wood makes hot Fires.
Grief pent up will burst the Heart
Grief that gives way to Verses, is not very lamentable.
Grieving for Misfortunes, is adding Gall to Wormwood.
Guests, that come by Day-light, are best receiv'd.
Guilt is always jealous.1780 Hackney Mistress, Hackney Maid.
Half a Loaf is better than no Bread.
Half an Acre is good Land.
Half-witted Fellows speak much, and say little.
Halt not before a Cripple.
Hang him that has no Shifts; and hang him that has one too many.
Hang not all your Bells upon one Horse.
Happy is he, that is happy in his Children.
Happy is he, that serveth the Happy.
Happy is he, who hath sow'd his wild Oats betimes.
Happy is he, whose Friends were born before him.
Happy is the Child, whose Father went to the Devil.
Happy is the Man, who sees his Faults in hit Youth.
Happy is the Man, whose Enemies have been in small Matters.
Happy Men shall have many Friends.
Happiness generally depends more on the Opinion we have of Things, than on the Things themselves.
Hard Fare makes hungry Bellies.
Hard with hard makes not the Stone-Wall.
Harrow Hell, and rake up the Devil.
Harvest comes not every Day, tho' it come every Year.
Harvest will come; and then every Farmer's rich.
Haste trips up its own Heels.
Hasty Climbers have sudden Falls.
Hasty Gamesters oversee themselves.
Hasty Glory goes out in a Snuff.
Hatred is blind, as well as Love.
Have a Care of a silent Dog, and a still Water.
Have bat a few Friends, tho' much Acquaintance.
Have not thy Cloke to make, when it begins to rain.
He a Soldier, and knows not Onion-seed from Gun-powder?
He bears Misery best, that hides it most.
He bears Poverty very ill, who is asham'd of it.
He begs a Blessing of a wooden God.
He benefits himself, that doth Good to others.
He bought the Fox-skin for Three-pence, and fold the Tail for a Shilling.
He builds Cages sit for Oxen, to keep Birds in.
He calls for a Shooing-Horn, to help on his Gloves.
He came safe from the East-Indies, and was drowned in the Thames. 
He can never be God's Martyr, that is the Devil's Servant.
He cannot be good, that knows not why he is good.
He cannot speak well, that cannot hold his Tongue.
He can swim without Bladders.
He can't demand a Flitch of Bacon at Dunmow. 
He cares not whose Child cries, so his laugh.
He carries too big a Gun for me; I must not engage him.
He changes his Flag, to conceal his being a Pyrate.
He claws it as Clayton claw'd the Pudding, when he eat Bag and all.
He commands enough, that obeyeth a wise Man.
He confesseth himself Guilts, who refuseth to come to a Trial.
He covers me with his Wings, and bites me with his Bill.
He could e'en eat my Heart, without Salt.
He cries Wine, and sells Vinegar.
He dances merrily, whom Fortune pipes to.
He declares himself Guilty, who justifies himself before Accusation.
He deserves not Sweet, that will not taste of Sour.
He deserves not Good, that can away with Bad.
He did me as much Good, as if he had piss'd in my Pottage.
He does Bounty an Injury, who shews her so much as to be laughed at.
He does not believe, that does not live according to his Belief.
He doth much, that doth a thing well.
He drags his Chain, and yet fays, 'tis others that are mad.1841 He dwells far from Neighbours, who is fain to praise himself.
He eats in Plate; but will die in Irons.
He eats the Calf in the Cow's Belly.
He fasts enough, that has a bad Meal.
He fasts enough, whose Wife scolds all Dinner-time.
He frets like gum'd Taffety.
He gave him a thing of nothing, to hang upon his Sleeve.
He gets a double Victory, who overcomes himself, when he doth his Enemy.
He gives one Knock on the Iron, and two on the Anvil.
He goes a great Voyage, that goes to the Bottom of the Sea.
He goes Hot out of his Way, that goes to a good Inn.
He had better put his Horns in his Pocket than blow them.
He had need of a long Spoon, that sups with the Devil.
He had need rise betimes, who would please every Body.
He has a fair Forehead, to graff on.
He has a great Fancy to Marriage, that goes to the Devil for a Wife.
He has a Head as big as a Horse, and Brains as much as an Ass.
He has a Hole under his Nose, that all his Money runs into.
He has a Mouth for every Matter.
He has an even Hand to throw a Louse into the Fire.
He has an ill Look among Lambs.
He has as many Tricks as a dancing Bear.
He has been out a Hawking for Butterflies.
He has brought up a Bird, to pick out his own Byes.
He has but a short Lent, that must pay Money at Easter. 
He has but bad Food, that feeds upon the Faults of others.
He has drank more than he has bled to-day.
He has eat Up the Pot, and asks for the Pipkin.
He has found a Last for his Shoe.
He has good Blood in him, but wants Grotes to it.
He has got the Fiddle, but not the Stick.
He has great Need of a Wife that marries Mamma's Darling.
He has more Guts than Brains.
He has more Wit in his Head, than Sampson had in both his Shoulders.
He has most Share in the Wedding that lies with the Bride.
He has not lost all, who has one Cast left.
He has nothing to eat, and yet invites Guests.
He has one Face to God, and another to the Devil.
He has the Bible in his Hand, and the Alcoran in his Heart.
He has the greatest blind-side, who thinks he has none.
He hath a Colt's Tooth yet, in his old Head.
He hath a good Judgment, that relieth not wholly on his own.
He hath been in the Sun to-day; his Face looks roasted.
He hath conquer'd well that hath made his Enemies fly.
He hath cut both his Legs, and cannot go, not stand.
He hath fed too freely on a Neapolitan Bisket.
He hath good Cards to shew for it.
He hath Impudence to-shew himself a Fool.
He hath left his Purse in his other Breeches.
He hath liv'd ill, that knows not how to die well.
He hath made a good Progress in a Business, that hath thought well of it before-hand.
He hath more Faults than Hairs, and more Wealth than Faults.
He hath never a Cross to bless himself withal.
He hath no mean Portion of Virtue, that loveth it in another.
He hath play'd a wiley Trick, and beguil'd himself.
He hath profited well, that likes Cicero well.
He hath slept well, that remembers not he hath slept ill.
He hath slip'd a Whiting.
He hath some Wit, but a Fool hath the Guidance of it.
He hath stole a Roll out of the Brewer's Basket.
He hath swallow'd a Stake; he cannot bow.
Hackney Mistress, Hackney Maid.
Half a Loaf is better than no Bread.
Half an Acre is good Land.
Half-witted Fellows speak much, and say little.
Halt not before a Cripple.
Hang him that has no Shifts; and hang him that has one too many.
Hang not all your Bells upon one Horse.
Happy is he, that is happy in his Children.
Happy is he, that serveth the Happy.
Happy is he, who hath sow'd his wild Oats betimes.
Happy is he, whose Friends were born before him.
Happy is the Child, whose Father went to the Devil.
Happy is the Man, who sees his Faults in hit Youth.
Happy is the Man, whose Enemies have been in small Matters.
Happy Men shall have many Friends.
Happiness generally depends more on the Opinion we have of Things, than on the Things themselves.
Hard Fare makes hungry Bellies.
Hard with hard makes not the Stone-Wall.
Harrow Hell, and rake up the Devil.
Harvest comes not every Day, tho' it come every Year.
Harvest will come; and then every Farmer's rich.
Haste trips up its own Heels.
Hasty Climbers have sudden Falls.
Hasty Gamesters oversee themselves.
Hasty Glory goes out in a Snuff.
Hatred is blind, as well as Love.
Have a Care of a silent Dog, and a still Water.
Have bat a few Friends, tho' much Acquaintance.
Have not thy Cloke to make, when it begins to rain.
He a Soldier, and knows not Onion-seed from Gun-powder?
He bears Misery best, that hides it most.
He bears Poverty very ill, who is asham'd of it.
He begs a Blessing of a wooden God.
He benefits himself, that doth Good to others.
He bought the Fox-skin for Three-pence, and fold the Tail for a Shilling.
He builds Cages sit for Oxen, to keep Birds in.
He calls for a Shooing-Horn, to help on his Gloves.
He came safe from the East-Indies, and was drowned in the Thames. 
He can never be God's Martyr, that is the Devil's Servant.
He cannot be good, that knows not why he is good.
He cannot speak well, that cannot hold his Tongue.
He can swim without Bladders.
He can't demand a Flitch of Bacon at Dunmow. 
He cares not whose Child cries, so his laugh.
He carries too big a Gun for me; I must not engage him.
He changes his Flag, to conceal his being a Pyrate.
He claws it as Clayton claw'd the Pudding, when he eat Bag and all.
He commands enough, that obeyeth a wise Man.
He confesseth himself Guilts, who refuseth to come to a Trial.
He covers me with his Wings, and bites me with his Bill.
He could e'en eat my Heart, without Salt.
He cries Wine, and sells Vinegar.
He dances merrily, whom Fortune pipes to.
He declares himself Guilty, who justifies himself before Accusation.
He deserves not Sweet, that will not taste of Sour.
He deserves not Good, that can away with Bad.
He did me as much Good, as if he had piss'd in my Pottage.
He does Bounty an Injury, who shews her so much as to be laughed at.
He does not believe, that does not live according to his Belief.
He doth much, that doth a thing well.
He drags his Chain, and yet fays, 'tis others that are mad.
He dwells far from Neighbours, who is fain to praise himself.
He eats in Plate; but will die in Irons.
He eats the Calf in the Cow's Belly.
He fasts enough, that has a bad Meal.
He fasts enough, whose Wife scolds all Dinner-time.
He frets like gum'd Taffety.
He gave him a thing of nothing, to hang upon his Sleeve.
He gets a double Victory, who overcomes himself, when he doth his Enemy.
He gives one Knock on the Iron, and two on the Anvil.
He goes a great Voyage, that goes to the Bottom of the Sea.
He goes Hot out of his Way, that goes to a good Inn.
He had better put his Horns in his Pocket than blow them.
He had need of a long Spoon, that sups with the Devil.
He had need rise betimes, who would please every Body.
He has a fair Forehead, to graff on.
He has a great Fancy to Marriage, that goes to the Devil for a Wife.
He has a Head as big as a Horse, and Brains as much as an Ass.
He has a Hole under his Nose, that all his Money runs into.
He has a Mouth for every Matter.
He has an even Hand to throw a Louse into the Fire.
He has an ill Look among Lambs.
He has as many Tricks as a dancing Bear.
He has been out a Hawking for Butterflies.
He has brought up a Bird, to pick out his own Byes.
He has but a short Lent, that must pay Money at Easter. 
He has but bad Food, that feeds upon the Faults of others.
He has drank more than he has bled to-day.
He has eat Up the Pot, and asks for the Pipkin.
He has found a Last for his Shoe.
He has good Blood in him, but wants Grotes to it.
He has got the Fiddle, but not the Stick.
He has great Need of a Wife that marries Mamma's Darling.
He has more Guts than Brains.
He has more Wit in his Head, than Sampson had in both his Shoulders.
He has most Share in the Wedding that lies with the Bride.
He has not lost all, who has one Cast left.
He has nothing to eat, and yet invites Guests.
He has one Face to God, and another to the Devil.
He has the Bible in his Hand, and the Alcoran in his Heart.
He has the greatest blind-side, who thinks he has none.
He hath a Colt's Tooth yet, in his old Head.
He hath a good Judgment, that relieth not wholly on his own.
He hath been in the Sun to-day; his Face looks roasted.
He hath conquer'd well that hath made his Enemies fly.
He hath cut both his Legs, and cannot go, not stand.
He hath fed too freely on a Neapolitan Bisket.
He hath good Cards to shew for it.
He hath Impudence to-shew himself a Fool.
He hath left his Purse in his other Breeches.
He hath liv'd ill, that knows not how to die well.
He hath made a good Progress in a Business, that hath thought well of it before-hand.
He hath more Faults than Hairs, and more Wealth than Faults.
He hath never a Cross to bless himself withal.
He hath no mean Portion of Virtue, that loveth it in another.
He hath play'd a wiley Trick, and beguil'd himself.
He hath profited well, that likes Cicero well.
He hath slept well, that remembers not he hath slept ill.
He hath slip'd a Whiting.
He hath some Wit, but a Fool hath the Guidance of it.
He hath stole a Roll out of the Brewer's Basket.
He hath swallow'd a Stake; he cannot bow.
He hath swallow'd a Gudgeon.
He hath ty'd a Knot with his Tongue, that he cannot untie with all his Teeth.
He injures a fair Lady, that beholds her not.
He invites future Injuries, who rewards past ones.
He is above his Enemies, that despises their Injuries.
He is a Lion in a good Cause.
He is a more impudent Thief, that robbeth openly, than he that stealeth privately.
He is a Slave of the greatest Slave, who serveth nothing but himself.
He is a very ill Man, who retaineth not a Secret Reverence for a good Man.
He is as hot as if he had a bellyful of Wasps and Salamanders.
He is as much out of his Element, at an Eel in a Sand-bag.
He is desperate that thinks himself so.
He it either a God or a Painter; for he makes Faces.
He is false by Nature, that has a black Head and a red Beard.
He is good as long as he's pleas'd; and so is the Devil.
He is handsome that handsome doth.
He is happy, that knoweth not himself to be otherwise.
He is idle, that might be better imploy'd.
He is ignoble, that disgraces his brave Ancestors by a vitious Life.
He is in great Danger, who being sick, thinks himself well.
He is lifeless, that is faultless.
He is like a Bell, that will go for every one that pulls it.
He is miserable, that dyeth not before he desires to die.
He is more noble that deserves, than he that confers Benefits.
He is my Friend that succoureth me, not he that pitieth me.
He is never alone, who is accompanied with noble Thoughts.
He is no great Heir, that inherits not his Ancestor's Virtue.
He is no wise Man, that cannot play the Fool upon Occasion.
He is not a virtuous Man, that loveth it not even in an Enemy.
He is not born yet, and does he sneeze already?
He is sot charitable, that will not be so privately.
He is not drunk gratis, who pays his Reason for his Shot.
He is not sit for Riches, who is afraid to use them.
He is not good himself, who speaks well of every body alike.
He is not laughed at, that laughs at himself first.
He is not poor that hath not much, but he that craves much.
He is not so much worth, as his Ears soil of Water.
He is not Wise, that is not wise for himself.
He is one that will not lose his Cap in a Crowd.
He is poor indeed, that can promise nothing.
He is rich enough, that needeth neither flatter nor borrow.
He is rich that is satisfied.
He is sillier than a Crab, that has all his Brains in his Belly.
He is so poor, that he has not Salt to his Porridge.
He is so suspicious, that he can't be got at, without a stalking Horse.
We is so wary, that he sleeps like a Hare, with his Eyes open.
He is the best Gentleman, that is the Son of his own Deserts.
He is the Son of a Batchelor.
He is the Wretch that does the Injury; not he that endures it.
He is timorous indeed, that's afraid of a dead Bee.
He is unworthy to live, who lives only for himself.
He is well onward in the Way of Wisdom, who can bear a Reproof, and mend by it.
He is wise, that hath Wit enough for his own Affairs.
He is wiser than most Men are, who is honest.
He is worth Gold that carries it.
He kills a Man, that saveth not his Life, When he can.
He kiss'd and stabb'd at the same Time.
He knows not a Hawk from a Hand-saw.
He knows not a Pig from a Dog.
He knows which Side of his Bread is butter'd.
He laughs ill, that laughs himself to Death.
He leaps into a deep River, to avoid a shallow Brook.
He lighted upon a Lime-Twig.
He lights his Candle at both Ends.
He lives long, that lives till all are weary of him.
He lives longest, that is awake most Hours.
He liveth long, that liveth well.
He loaths the Spring-head, and drinks the foul Stream.
He looks as big, as if he had eaten Bull-Beef.
He looks as tho' he had suck'd his Dam thro' a Hurdle.
He looks like a Sow saddled.
He looks like a wild Cat out of a Bush.
He looks like the Devil over Lincoln. 
He loseth indeed, that loseth at last.
He loseth nothing, that keepeth God for his Friend.
He loseth Thanks, that promiseth and delayeth.
He loves Bacon well, that licks the Sow's Breech.
He loves Mutton well, that eats the Wool.
He loves roast Meat well, that licks the Spit.
He loves you as a Ferret does a Rabbit; to make a Meal of you.
He makes a Feint at the Lungs, but lays his Stroke on the Head.
He makes Arrows of all Sorts of Wood.
He may be trusted with an House full as Mill-Stones.
He may find Fault, but let him mend it if he can.
He may make a Will upon his Nail, for any thing he has to give.
He may very well be contented, that need not buy nor flatter.
He mends like four Ale in Summer.
He merits no Thanks, that does a Kindness for his own End.
He must be a most sad Fellow, that no body can please.
He must have Iron Nails, that scratcheth with a Bear.
He must have Leave to speak, who cannot hold his Tongue.
He must needs go, whom the Devil drives.
He must not talk of running, that cannot go.
He must stoop, that hath a low Door.
He needs little Advice, that is lucky.
He neither ties nor unties.
He never was Good, neither Egg nor Bird.
He never wrought a good Day's Work, that went grumbling about it.
He opens an Oyster with a Dagger.
He passes Sentence, before he hears the Evidence.
He pins his Faith upon another Man's Sleeve.
He pitieth not the Poor, who relieveth them not, when he well may.
He plays well, that wins.
He preaches well, that lives well.
He promises like a Merchant-man, and pays like a Man of War.
He put a fine Feather in his Cap.
He resuseth the Bribe, but putteth forth his Hand.
He remembers his Ancestors, but forgets to feed his Children.
He rode sure indeed, that never caught a Fall in his Life.
He runneth far indeed, that never returneth.
He sail'd into Cornwall without a Bark.
He says any thing but his Prayers, and them he whistles.
He scap'd Hemp, but deserv'd a wooden Halter,
He seemeth wise, with whom all things thrive.
He sendeth to the East-Indies for Kentish Pippins.
He set my House afire, only to roast his Eggs.
He shall have enough to do, who studies to please Fools.
He signifies no more, than a blind Cat in a Barn.
He sits up by Moon-shine, and lies abed in Sun-shine.
He skips like Hail on a Pack-Saddle.
He sneaks, as if he would creep into his Mouth.
He speaks, as if every Word would lift a Dish.
He speaks one Word Nonsense, and two that have nothing in them.
He spent Michaelmas Rent in Midsummer-Moon.
He spits out Secrets like hot Custard.
He steals a Hog, and gives away the Feet in Alms.
He struck at Tib; but down fell Tim. 
He sups ill, who eat up all at Dinner.
He takes in good Counsel, like cold Porridge.
He takes Pepper in his Nose.
He talks in the Bear-Garden Tongue.
He teaches me to be Good, that does me Good.
He teacheth ill, that teacheth all.
He tells me my Way, and don't know it himself.
He, that after sinning mends, recommends himself to God.
He, that always complains, is never pitied.
He, that always fears Dangers, always feels it.
He, that always makes God's Will his, is never crossed.
He that asketh a Courtesy, promiseth a Kindness.
He that asketh faintly, beggeth a Denial.
He that banquets every Day, never makes a good Meal.
He that beareth a Torch, shadoweth himself to give Light to others.
He that bestoweth but a Bone oh thee, would not have thee die.
He that bites on every Weed, may light on Poison.
He that blows a Trumpet at his Alms, is a Pharisee. 
He that blows in the Dust, fills his own Eyes.
He that boasteth of himself, affronteth his Company.
He that boasteth of his Ancestors, confesseth he hath no Virtue of his own.
He that boasts of his own Knowledge, proclaims his Ignorance.
He that bringeth a Present, findeth the Door open.
He that brings up his Son to nothing, breeds a Thief.
He that builds Castles in the Air, will soon have no Land.
He that buyeth Magistracy, must sell Justice.
He that buys and lies, shall feel it in his Purse.
He that can abide a curst Wife, need not fear what Company he liveth in.
He that cannot abide a bad Market, deserves not a good one.
He that cannot conceal his own Shame, will not conceal another's.
He that can read and meditate, need not think the Evenings long, or Life tedious.
He that can reply calmly to an angry Man, is too hard for him.
He that can't ride a gentle Horse, must not attempt to back a mad Colt.
He that casteth all Doubts, shall never be resolved.
He that ceaseth to be a Friend, never was a good one.
He that chastiseth one, amendeth many.
He that cheateth in small things, is a Fool, but in great things, is a Rogue.
He that comes after, sees with more Eyes, than his own.
He that commandeth well, shall be obey'd well.
He that contemplates on his Bed, hath a Day without a Night.
He that converses not, knows nothing.
He that considers in Prosperity, will be lest afflicted in Adversity.
He that cuts himself wilfully, deserves no Balsam.
He that dallies with his Enemy, gives him leave to kill him.
He that dares not venture, must not complain of ill Lock.
He that deals with a senseless Man, had need of a good deal of Sense.
He that defends an Injury, is next to him that commits it.
He that desires but little, has no need of much.
He that despises Shame, wants a Bridle.
He that died half a Year ago, is as dead as Adam, 
He that dies, troubles his Parents but once; but he that lives ill, torments them perpetually.
He that dies young, has made a quick Voyage of it.
He that does any thing for the Publick, is accounted to do it for no body.
He that does not love a Woman, suck'd a Sow.
He that does not speak Truth to me, does not believe me when I speak Truth.
He that does you a very ill Turn, will never forgive you.
He that doeth his own Business, hurteth not his Hand.
He that doth a good Turn, looketh for a good Turn.
He that doth good for Praise only, meriteth but a Puff of Wind.
He that doth not as he ought, must not look to be done to, as he would.
He that doth well, wearieth not himself.
He that doth what he will, oft doth not what he ought.
He that eats most Porridge, shall have most Meat.
He that eats the King's Geese, shall be choak'd with the Feathers.
He that eats till he is sick, must fast till he is well.
He that eats well and drinks well, should do his Duty well.
He that falls in the Dirt, the longer he lies, the dirtier he is.
He that falls to-day, may be up again to-morrow.
He that feareth every Bush, must never go a Birding.
He that fears Danger in time, seldom feels it.
He that fears not the Future, may enjoy the Present.
He that fears you present, will hate you absent.
He that feasteth a Flatterer and a Slanderer, dineth with two Devils.
He that feeds upon Charity, has a cold Dinner and no Supper.
He that finds a Thing, steals it, if he endeavours not to restore it.
He that first came, is not sure to be first serv'd.
He that flatters himself in Sciences, and grows worse in Morals, makes no Improvement.
He that flings Dirt at another, dirtieth himself most.
He that follows Nature, is never out of his Way.
He that gets an Estate, will probably never spend it.
He that gives himself leave to play with his Neighbour's Fame, may soon play it away.
He that gives his Heart, will not deny his Money.
He that gives time to resolve, gives time to deny; and warning to prevent.
He that gives to a grateful Man, puts out to Usury.
He that gives to a worthy Person, bestows a Benefit upon himself.
He that gives to be seen, would never relieve a Man in the dark.
He that giveth customarily to the Vulgar, buyeth Trouble.
He that giveth to a good Man, selleth well.
He that goes a great Way for a Wife, is either cheated, or means to cheat.
He that goes continually abroad a borrowing, shews he has little at home of his own.
He that goes the contrary Way, must go it over twice.
He that goes to Church with an ill Intention, goes to God's House on the Devil's Errand.
He that goes to Church with Brothers-in-Law, comes back without Kindred.
He that grasps at too much, holds nothing fast.
He that gropes in the Dark, finds what he would not.
He that groweth worse, was never good.
He that handles a Nettle tenderly, is soonest stung.
He that handles Pitch, shall foul his Fingers.
He that handles Thorns, shall smart for it.
He that has a great Nose, thinks every Body is speaking of it.
He that hath a Mouth of his own, should not say to another, Blow.
He that has a Sword, and goes home to fetch a better, never comes again.
He that has an hundred and one, and owes an hundred and two, the Lord have Mercy upon him.
He that has an ill Name, is half-hang'd.
He that has but Four, and spends Five, has no need of a Purse.
He that has but one Coat, cannot lend it.
He that has but one Eye, had need look well to That.
He that has but one Eye, is a Prince among those that have none.
He that has but one Hog, makes him Fat; and he that has but one Son, makes him a Fool.
He that has feather'd his Nest, may fly when he will.
He that has led a wicked Life, is afraid of his own Memory.
He that has most Time, has none to lose.
He that has lost his Credit, is dead to the World.
He that has no Charity, merits no Mercy.
He that has no Fools, Knaves, nor Beggars in his Family, was begot by a Flash of Lightning.
He that has no Head, deserves not a laced Hat.
He that has no Heart, ought to have Heels.
He that has no Modesty, has all the Town for his own.
He that has no Shame, has no Conscience.
He that has no Silver in his Purse, should have Silver on his Tongue.
He that has nothing, is frighted at nothing.
He that has nothing to spare, must not keep a Dog.
He that has purchas'd the Devil, must make the most of him.
He that has the worst Cause, makes the most Noise.
He that has too little, wants Wings to fly; he that has too much, is incumbred with his large Tail.
He that hath a Head of Wax, must not walk in the Sun.
He that hath a white Horse and a fair Wife, never wants Trouble.
He that hath a Wife and Children, wants no Business.
He that hath a Wife and Children, must not sit with his Fingers in his Mouth.
He that hath good Corn, may be content with some Thistles.
He that hath Love in his Breast, hath Spurs at his Heels.
He that hath some Land, must have some Labour.
He that hath Time, and looketh for a better Time, loseth Time.
He that helpeth the Evil, hurteth the Good.
He that hews above his Height, may have Chips in his Eyes.
He that hoardeth up Money, taketh Pains for other Men.
He that hopes no Good, fears no Ill.
He that hinders not a Mischief, when it is in his Power, is guilty of it.
He that hunts after Vanity, shall take Vexation.
He that is a Cuckold, and allows it; may be so for ever.
He that imagines he hath Knowledge enough, hath none.
He that is busy, is tempted but by one Devil; he that is idle, by a Legion.
He that is carried down the Torrent, catcheth at every thing.
He that is dispos'd for Mischief, will never want Occasion.
He that is drunk, is gone from Home.
He that is every where, is no where.
He that is grateful, would recompence, if he could.
He that is heady, is ruled by a Fool.
He that is Innocent, may well be Confident.
He that is kinder than he was wont, hath a Design upon thee.
He that is known to have no Money, has no Friends nor Credit.
He that is Master of himself, will soon be Master of others.
He that is needy, when he is married; shall scarce be rich, when he is buried.
He that is not above an Injury, is below himself.
He that is not Company-proof, will be ensnar'd in Company.
He that is not sensible of his Loss, has lost nothing.
He that is only his own Pupil, shall have a Fool to his Tutor.
He that is open to Flattery, is fenc'd against Admonition.
He that is poor, all his Kindred scorn him; he that is rich, all are kin to him.
He that is presently deny'd, is least deceiv'd.
He that is proud of his fine Clothes, fetches his Reputation from his Taylor.
He that is shameless, is graceless.
He that is too busy in mending and judging of others, will never be good himself.
He that is too proud to ask, is too good to receive.
He that is too secure, is not safe.2196 He that is thrown, would ever wrestle.
He that is uneasy at every little Pain, is never without some Ach.
He that is well, and ventures to be ill, deserves no Pity, when it happens.
He that is well shelter'd, is a Fool if he stir out into the Rain.
He that is without Money, is a Bird without Wings.
He that is won with a Nut, may be lost with an Apple.
He that keeps Malice, harbours a Viper in his Breast.
He that keeps up his Riches, and lives poorly, is like an Ass that carries Gold, and eats Thistles.
He that kills a Man when he's drunk, must be hang'd when he's sober.
He that kisseth his Wife in the Market-Place, shall have enough to teach him.
He that knoweth useful things, not he that knows many things, is the wise Man.
He that knows how to waste, finds every thing to his Purpose.
He that knows least, commonly presumes most.
He that knows little, often repeats it.
He that knows not how to hold his Tongue, knows not how to talk.
He that labours and thrives, spins Gold.
He that laughs when he's alone, will mate Sport in Company.
He that leaves the Highway, to cut short, commonly goes about.
He that lets his Fish escape into the Water, may call his Net often, yet never catch it again.
He that licks Honey from a Nettle, pays too dear for it.
He that lies down with the Dogs, must rise with the Fleas.
He that lieth upon the Ground, can fall no lower.
He that listens after what People fay of him, shall never have Peace.
He that lives a Knave, will hardly die an honest Man.
He that lives long, suffers much.
He that lives not well one Year, sorrows for it seven.
He that lives on Hope, has but a slender Diet.
He that lives with the Muses, shall die in the Straw.
He that liveth in Hope, danceth without a Fiddle.
He that looks for a Requital, serves himself, not me.
He that looks too nicely into things, never lives easy.
He that loseth his Wealth, is wanted to have lost his Wits.
He that loseth his Wife and Sixpence, hath lost a Tester.
He that loves himself, too much, loves an ill Man.
He that makes a good War, makes a good Peace.
He that makes a Question, where there is no Doubt; must take an Answer, where there is no Reason.
He that makes himself an Ass, must not take it ill, if Men ride him.
He that makes his Bed ill, must be contented to lie ill.
He that makes one Basket, may make an hundred.
He that makes the Shoe, can't tan the Leather.
He that maketh a Fire of Straw, hath much Smoke, and but little Warmth.
He that marries a Wife and three Children, marries four Thieves.
He that marrieth for Wealth, sells his Liberty.
He that mindeth not his own Business, shall never be trusted with mine.
He that never took Oar in Hand, must not think Scorn to be taught.
He that nothing questioneth, nothing learneth.
He that overcomes his Passions, overcomes his greatest Enemies.
He that overfeeds his Senses, feasteth his Enemies.
He that passeth a Judgment as he runs, overtaketh Repentance,
He that payeth beforehand, shall have his Work ill done.
He that pays last, never pays twice.
He that payeth another, remembreth himself.
He that plants Trees, loves others besides himself.
He that praiseth, bestows a Favour; he that detracts, commits a Robbery.
He that praiseth publikly, will slander privately.
He that preacheth up War, when it might well be avoided, is the Devil's Chaplain.
He that prepares for Ill, gives the Blow a Meeting, and breaks its Stroke.
He that promises too much, means nothing.
He that protects an ill Man, may live to repent of it.
He that pryeth into the Clouds, may be struck with a Thunderbolt.
He that punisheth another in Anger, shall feel it himself, when the Fit is over.
He that puts on a publick Gown, must put off a private Person.
He that reckoneth before his Host, must reckon again.
He that regardeth not his Reputation, despiseth Virtue.
He that regards not a Penny, will lavish a Pound.
He that refuses Praise the first Time, does it, because he would have it the second.
He that remembers his Virtues too much, bids others think of his Vices.
He that repents of a Fault upon right Grounds, is almost Innocent.
He that repents of his own Act, either is, or was a Fool by his own Confession.
He that requites a Benefit, pays a great Debt.
He that resisteth his own evil Inclinations, obeys God.
He that resolves to deal with none but honest Men, must leave off dealing.
He that returns a Good for Evil, obtains the Victory.
He that rewards Flattery, begs it.
He that rides behind another, must not think to guide.
He that runs in the Dark, may well stumble.
He that runs, may rally.
He that runs out by Extravagancy, must retrieve by Parsimony.
He that's afraid of every Nettle, must not piss in the Grass.
He that's afraid to do Good, would be ill if he durst.
He that's always shooting, must sometimes hit.
He that's angry without a Cause, must be pleas'd without Amends.
He that's a wise Man by Day, is no Fool by Night.
He that's born to be hanged, shall never be drowned.
He that's carried down the Stream, needs not row.
He that's cheated twice by the same Man, is an Accomplice with the Cheater.
He that's down, down with him, cries the World.
He that's full, takes no Care for him that's fasting.
He that's ill to himself, will be good to no Body.
He that's killed by a Cannon, was curs'd in hit Mother's Belly.
He that's Man'd with Boys, and Hors'd with Colts, shall have his Meat eaten, and his Work undone.
He that's not handsome at 20, strong at 30, wise at 40, rich at 50, will never be handsome, strong, wise, or rich.
He that seveth his Dinner, will have the more for Supper.
He that scattereth Thorns, must not go Barefoot.
He that scoffs at the Crooked, had need go very upright himself.
He that seeketh Trouble, never misseth of it.
He that seeks Danger, perisheth therein unpitied.
He that serveth the Devil, hath an hard Service of it.
He that serves at the Altar, ought to live by the Altar.
He that serves every Body, is paid by no Body.
He that serves well, need not be afraid to ask his Wages.
He that sets his Net betimes, may expect a fuller Draught than he that fishes later.
He that sharply chides, is the most ready to pardon.
He that sheweth his Wealth to a Thief, is the Cause of his own Pillage.
He that shews a Passion, tells his Enemy where he may hit him.
He that shews his Purse, longs to be rid of it.
He that sins that he may repent, surfeits that he may take a Vomit.
He that sits to work in the Market-place, shall have many Teachers.
He that slights his Enemy, dies by his Hand.
He that sows in the Highway, tires his Oxen, and loseth his Corn.
He that sows Iniquity, shall reap Sorrow.
He that sows Thistles, shall reap Prickles.
He that spares the Bad, injures the Good.
He that speaks ill of his Wife, dishonoureth himself.
He that speaks, sows; he that hears, reaps.
He that speaks without Care, shall remember with Sorrow.
He that spends to his Proportion, is as brave as a Prince; and a Prince exceeding that, is a Prodigal.
He that spends without Regard, shall want without Pity.
He that stays in the Valley, shall never get over the Hill.
He that steals, can hide.
He that stumbles, and falls not quite, gains a Step.
He that stumbles twice at the same Stone, deserves to have his Shins broke.
He that strikes my Dog, would strike me, if he durst.
He that strikes with his Tongue, must ward with his Head.
He that sweareth falsely, denyeth God.
He that swells in Prosperity, will shrink in Adversity.
He that sups upon Sallad, goes not to bed fasting.
He that takes a Wife at Shrewsbury, must carry her to Staffordshire, else she"ll drive him to Cumberland. 
He that takes not up a Pin, slights his Wife.
He that takes Pet at a Feast, loses it all.
He that takes the Devil into his Boat, must carry him over the Sound.
He that takes too great a Leap, falls into the Ditch.
He that talks to himself, talks to a Fool.
He that tells a Lye, buffeteth himself.
He that tells his Wife, is but lately married.
He that the Devil drives, feels no Lead at his Heels.
He that thinks himself a Cuckold, carries live Coals in his Heart.
He that thinks his Business below him, will always be above his Business.
He that ties up another Man's Dog, shall hare nothing left him but the Line.
He that travels much, knows much.
He that trusteth to the World, is sure to be deceived.
He that trusts to borrowed Ploughs, will have his Land lie fallow.
He that waits for dead Men's Shoes, may go Barefoot.
He that waits upon another's Trencher, makes many a little Dinner.
He that walketh with the Virtuous, is one of them.
He that wants Business, may sit out a Ship, or take a Wife.
He that wants Hope, is the poorest Man alive.
He that wants Money, is accounted among those that want Wit.
He that was born under a Three-half-penny Planet, shall never be worth Two-pence.
He that weighs the Wind, must have a steady Hand.
He that will conquer, must light.
He that will enter Paradise, must come with a right Key.
He that will have the Kernel, must crack the Shell.
He that will not bear the Itch, must endure the Smart.
He that will not be counselled, cannot be helped.
He that will not be saved, needs no Sermon.
He that will not live a Saint, can never die a Martyr.
He that will not sail till all Dangers are over, must never put to Sea.
He that will not sail till he have a full fair Wind, will lose many a Voyage.
He that will not stoop for a Pin, shall never be worth a Point.
He that will not suffer Evil, must never think of Preferment.
He that will outwit the Fox, must rise betimes.
He that will sell Lawn, must learn to fold it.
He that worketh Wickedness by another, is wicked himself.
He that works Journey-work with the Devil, shall never want Work.
He that worst may, still holds the Candle.
He that would hang his Dog, gives out first that he is mad.
He that would have a bad Morning, may walk out in a Fog after a Frost.
He that would have a bad Night, may injure his Conscience that Day.
He that would have a Hare for his Breakfast, must hunt over Night.
He that would have the Fruit, must climb the Tree.
He that would know what shall be, must consider what hath been.
He that would learn to pray, let him go to Sea.
He that would right understand a Man, must read his whole Story.
He that would thrive by Law, must fee his Enemy's Counsel as well as his own.
He thought to have turn'd Iron into Gold, and he turn'd Gold into Iron.
He threatens many, that is injurious to one.
He toucheth it as warily as a Cat doth a Coal of Fire.
He travell'd with Mandevile. 
He useth the Rake, more than the Fork.
He wants nothing now, but the Itch, to scratch.
He was born within the Sound of Bow-Bell.
He was scarce of News, who told that his Father was hang'd.
He who beggeth for others, is contriving for himself.
He who cannot counterfeit a Friend, can never be a very bad Enemy.
He who cometh in late, has an ill Lodging.
He who fasteth, and doth no Good; saveth his Bread, but loseth his Soul.
He who findeth Fault, meaneth to buy.
He who greases his Wheels, helps his Oxen.
He who has but one Eye, is always wiping it.
He who hath a Trade, hath a Share every where.
He who hath Bitter in his Breast, spits not all Sweet.
He who hath Money and Capers, is provided for Lent. 
He who imparts Wisdom to another, purifies and exalts his own Mind.
He who is asham'd of his Calling, ever liveth shamefully in it.
He who is born a Fool, is never cured.
He who is not Lucky, let him not go a Fishing,
He who is the Offender, is never the Forgiver.
He who is wanting but to one Friend, loseth a great many by it.
He who killeth a Lion, when absent; feareth a Mouse, when present.
He who laugheth too much, hath the Nature of a Fool he that laugheth not at all, hath the Nature of an old Cat.
He who owes an Hundred, and has an Hundred and One, fears no Body.
He who oweth, is in all the Wrong.
He whose Belly is full, believes not him whose is empty.
He whose Father is Judge, goes safe to his Trial.
He who plants a Walnut-Tree, expects not to eat of the Fruit.
He who sets one Foot in a Bawdy-house, claps t'other in an Hospital.
He who shareth Honey with a Bear, hath the least Part of it.
He who sleepeth all the Morning, may go a begging all the Day after.
He who threateneth, hunteth after a Revenge.
He who trusteth not, is not deceiv'd.
He who trusts all Things to Chance, makes a Lottery of his Life.
He who wants Content, can't find an easy Chair.
He who was never Sick, dies the first Fit.
He will ill catch a Bird flying, that cannot keep his own in a Cage.
He will never get to Heaven, that desires to go thither alone.
He will not give the Way, even to a blind Man.
He will shoot higher, that shoots at the Moon, than he that shoots at a Dunghil, tho' he miss the Mark.
He would be Quarter-Master at home, if his Wife would let him.
He would fain fly, but wants Feathers.
He would find Waters with the first Stroke of his Spade.
He would live, even in a Gravel Pit.
He would not lend his Knife, no not to the Devil to stab himself.
He wounded a dead Man to the Heart.
He wrongs not an old Man, who steals his Supper from him.
He'll as soon eat Sand, as do as a good Turn.
He'll bring Buckle and Thong together.
He'll dance to nothing, but his own Pipe.
He'll eat till he sweats, and work till he freezes.
He'll find Money for Mischief, when he can find none for Corn.
He'll ne'er do right, nor suffer wrong.
He'll ne'er get a Pennyworth, that is afraid to ask a Price.
He'll ne'er have enough, till his Mouth is full of Mould.
He'll rather die with Thirst, than take the Pains to draw Water.
He'll soon be a Beggar, that can't say Nay.
He'll swear the Devil out of Hell.
He'll turn, rather than burn.
He's a Blockhead, that can't make two Verses; and he's a Fool, that makes four.
He's a Fool, that is not melancholy once a Day.
He's a Fool, that is wiser abroad than at home.
He's a Friend at a Sneeze; the most you can get of him, is a God bless you. 
He's a Friend to none, that is a Friend to all.
He's a good Man, whom Fortune makes better.
He's a Hawk of the right Nest.
He's a hot Shot, in a Mustard Pot; with his Heels upright.
He's a little Fellow; but every Bit of that Little is bad.
He's a pretty Fellow of an Orator, that makes Panegyrick of himself.
He's a proud Fox, that will not dig his own Hole.
He's a puddled Stream from a pure Spring.
He's a Slave, that cannot command himself.
He's a Thief; for he has took a Cup too much.
He's a wise Man, that leads Passion by the Bridle.
He's an excellent Man, that can wear Poverty decently.
He's an ill Boy, that goes like a Top; no longer than 'tis whipt.
He's an ill Cook, that can't lick his own Fingers.
He's an ill Man, that takes by Force, when he can have freely.
He's as brisk as Bottled Ale.
He's as sharp, as if he liv'd upon Tewksbury-Mustard.
He's at a great Lose for Jests, that is forc'd to rake Hell for them.
He's born in a good Hour, who gets a good Name.
He's drinking at the Harrow, when he should be driving his Plough.
He's dwindled down from a Pot to a Pipkin.
He's in great want of a Bird, that will give a Groat for an Owl.
He's like a Bagpipe; you never hear him till his Belly is full.
He's like a Fox, Grey before he is Good.
He's like Garby, whose Soul neither God nor the Devil would have.
He's madder than mad, who selleth Heaven for Earth.
He's miserable indeed, that must lock up his Miseries.
He's my Friend, that grindeth at my Mill.
He's my Friend, that speaks well of me behind my Back.
He's not honest, whom the Lock, only makes honest.
He's not the best Carpenter, that makes the most Chips.
He's not Ungrateful, that cannot; but he that will not repay.
He's overshot in his own Bow.
He's poor indeed, whom God hates.
He's so covetous, that he'll not give even a Cup of cold Water.
He's so full of himself, that he is quite empty.
He's so great a Thief, that he stole even a Piece of a Halter from the Gallows.
He's so much a Thief, that he'll steal away even the Commandments.
He's wise, that knows when he's well enough.
He's won with a Feather, and lost with a Straw.
Health is great Riches.
Health is not valued, till Sickness comes.
Health without Wealth, is half a Sickness.
Hearts may agree, tho' Heads differ.
Heaven is a cheap Purchase, whatever it cost.
Heaven is worth the whole World.
Heaven will make amends for all.
Heaven, without good Society, cannot be Heaven.
Hedgehogs lodge among Thorns, because themselves are prickly.
Hell and Chancery are always open.
Hell is full of good Meanings and Wishes; but Heaven is full of good Works.
Hell is full of the Ungrateful.
Hell is wherever Heaven is not.
Help the lame Dog over the Stile.
Her Hands are on the Wheel, but her Eyes are in the Street.
Her Pulse beats Matrimony.
Her Shoulder is with Child.
Her Tongue steals away all the Time from her Hands.
Here I left a Needle, and here I will find it.
Here if you beat a Bush, its odds but you start a Thief.
Here's Talk of the Turk and Pope, but its ray next Neighbour that does me the Harm.
Hertfordshire Kindness.
High Buildings have a low Foundation.
High-flying Hawks are sit for Princes.
High Places have their Precipices.
High Winds blow on high Hills.
High-Ways and Streets have not all the Thieves, Shops have Ten for One.
His Brain is not big enough for his Skull.
His Brains want no Barm to make them work.
His Cart is full.
His Clothes are worth an hundred Pounds, but his Wit is dear of a Groat.
His Learning overbalanceth his Brain; and so is a Burthen.
His Lungs are very sensible; for every thing makes them laugh.
His Milk boil'd over.
His Mill will go with all Winds.
His Promises are lighter than the Breath that utters them.
His Purse and his Palate are ill met.
His Shoes are made of running Leather.
His Tongue goes always of Errands; but never speeds.
His Tongue is as cloven as the Devil's Foot.
His Tongue is no Slander.
Hoist your Sail, when the Wind is fair.
Hold fast an Eel with a Fig-Leaf.
Hold fast is the first Point in Hawking.
Hold your Tongue, Husband; let me talk, that have all the Wit.
Holding an Eel too fast, is the way to let her escape.
Home is home, be it never so homely.
Honest is the Cat, when the Meat is upon the Hook.
Honest Men and Knaves may possibly wear the same Cloth.
Honest Men are justified by the Light.
Honest Men are soon bound; but you can never bind a Knave.
Honest Men fear neither the Light nor the Dark.
Honest Men never have the Love of a Rogue.
Honest Mens Words are as good as their Bonds.
Honest Millers have golden Thumbs.
Honesty and Plain Dealing puts Knavery out of the Biass.
Honesty is a fine Jewel; but much out of Fashion.
Honesty is the best Policy.
Honesty may be dear bought, but can never be a dear Pennyworth.
Honesty, now-a-days, wants a Guard.
Honey is not for the Asse's Mouth.
Honey is sweet; but the Bee stings.
Honey is too good for a Bear.
Honour and Ease are seldom Bedfellows.
Hope is a good Breakfast, but a bad Supper.
Hope is as cheap as Despair.
Hope is worth any Money.
Hope keeps a Man from hanging, and drowning himself.
Hope well, and have well, quoth Hickwell. 
Hopes and Fears chequer Humane Life.
Hopes delayed, hang the Heart upon Tenter-hooks.
Hopes of Pardon mend not, but encourage Criminals.
Hot Love is soon cold.
Hot Men harbour no Malice.
Hot sup; hot swallow.
Hours of Pleasure are short.
How can the Cat help it, if the Maid be a Fool?
How can the Foal amble, when the Horse and Mare trot?
How can you think your self the wiser, for pleasing F00ls?
How difficult a thing it is, to persuade most Men to be happy!
How happy is he, that owes nothing but to himself!
How many Deaths must he die, that lives till he desires to die!
How many things hath he to repent of, that lives long!
Humane Blood is all of a Colour.
Humane Inventions are no essential Parts of Divine Worship.
Humane Laws reach not Thoughts.
Humility will exalt you, tho' Sheepishness will not.
Hunger cannot bear Contradiction.
Hunger fetches the Wolf out of the Woods.
Hunger finds no Fault with the Cookery.
Hunger is not Dainty.
Hunger is not satisfied with wise Sentences.
Hunger is the best Sauce.
Hunger makes raw Beans relish well.
Hunger scarce kills any; but Gluttony and Drunkenness, Multitudes.
Hunger will break thro' Stone-Walls.
Hungry Dogs will eat dirty Puddings.
Hungry Horses make a clean Manger.
Hungry Men think the Cook lazy.
Hunting has as much Pain as Pleasure.
Husband, don't believe what you see, but what I tell you.
Husband, you are a Cuckold; Wife, who told you so?
Husbands are in Heaven, whose Wives chide not.
Hypocrisy is a Sort of Homage, that Vice pays to Virtue.
Hypocrites are a Sort of Creatures, that God never made.
Hypocritical Honesty goes upon Stilts.
Hypocritical Piety is double Iniquity.2584 I am as full as a Jade, quoth the Bride.
I am not sorry that my Son loses at Play, but that he will seek his Revenge.
I am talking of Hay, and you of Horse-Beans.
I ask for a Fork, and you bring me a Rake.
I cannot be at York and London, at the same time.
I cannot believe You, you speak so fair.
I cannot run and sit still, at the same time.
I cannot spin and weave, at the same time.
I can't be your Friend, and your Flatterer too.
I deny that with both my Hands, and all my Teeth.
I do not hear that a Bribe on both Sides is out of Fashion.
I gave you a Stick to break my own Head with.
I had no thought of catching you, when I fish'd for another.
I had rather be fed with Jack-Boots, than with such Stories.
I had rather my Cake burn, than you should turn it.
I have a Crow to pluck with you.
I have a cold Coal to blow at.
I have a good Bow, but I can't come at it.
I have a good Cloke, but 'tis in France. 
I have a tangled Skain of it to wind off.
I have cur'd her from laying in the Hedge, quoth the good Man, when he married his Daughter.
I have more to do, than a Dish to wash.
I have other Fish to fry.
I hope I may tic up my own Sack, when I please.
I hope better, quoth Benson, when his Wife bid him come in, Cuckold.
I know enough to hold my Tongue, but not to speak.
I know he'll come by his long tarrying.
I know him as well as if I had gone thro' him with a lighted Link.
I know him as well as the Beggar knows his Dish.
I know him not, tho' I should meet him in my Porridge.
I know of no Body, that has a mind to die this Year.
I like writing with a Peacock's Quill; because its Feathers are all Eyes.
I live; and Lords do no more.
I love to stand aloof from Jove and his Thunder-bolts.
I love you well, but touch not my Pocket.
I my self had been happy, if I had been unfortunate in Time.
I never ask'd you for Wood, to heat my own Oven with.
I never desir'd you to stumble at the Stone, that lieth at my Door.
I never far'd worse, than when I wish'd for Supper.
I now see, which Leg you are lame of.
I shall never turn my Nine-pence into a Noble, by this Bargain.
I suck'd not this out of my Finger's Ends.
I taught you to swim; and now you'd drown me.
I thought I had given her Rope enough, said Petley, when he hang'd his Mare.
I thought to bless my self, and I beat out both my Eye's.
I took him for a Worm; but he prov'd a Serpent.
I took him napping, as Moss caught his Mare.
I wept when I was born; and now every Day shews, Why.
I will be thy Friend, but not thy Vice's Friend.
I will christen my own Child first.
I will do my good Will, as he that thresh'd in his Cloke.
I will either win the Horse, or lose the Saddle.
I will give you a Crown a-piece for your Lyes, if you'll let me have them all.
I will give you a Shirt full of sore Bones.
I will keep no Cats, that will not catch Mice.
I will make him dance without a Pipe.
I will never keep a Dog to bite me.
I will never stoop so low, to take up just nothing at all.
I will not buy a Pig in a Poke.
I will not change my Cottage in Possession, for a Palace in Reversion.
I will not dance to every Fool's Pipe.
I will not keep a Dog, and bark my self.
I will not make my Dish-Clout my Table-Cloth.
I will not play my Ace of Trumps yet.
I will not pull the Thorn out of your Foot, to put it into mine.
I will not suffer you to pay for this in another World.
I will not touch her with a Pair of Tongs.
I will not want, when I have it; and have it not too.
I will set a Spoke in your Cart for you.
I will send him away with a Flea in his Ear.
I will stick in your Skirts for this.
I will watch your Water-Gate.
I would have a good Horse for my self, not for my Brother.
I would have the Fruit, not the Basket.
I would not do it, to have the King my Cousin.
I would not have your Cackling, for your Eggs.
I would not trust him; no, not with a Bag of Scorpions.
If a Fool have Success, it ruins him.
If a Louse miss its Footing on his Coat, 'twill be sure to break its Neck.
If a Man once sill, all will tread upon him.
If a poor Man give thee ought, it is, that thou should'st give him something better.
If a wise Man should never miscarry, the Fool would burst.
If a Word be worth a Shilling, Silence is worth two.
If Afflictions refine some, they consume others.
If all the World were ugly, Deformity would be no Monster.
If an Ass goes a travelling, he'll not come home an Horse.
If an Ass kick you, will you kick him again; or put him into the Court?
Is any Fool finds the Cap fit him, let him wear it.
If any thing stay, let Work stay.
If better were within, better would come out.
If Death be terrible, the Fault is not in Death, but thee.
If ever I catch his Cart overthrowing, I'll give it one shove.
If every Bird take back its own Feathers, you'll be naked.
If every Fool were to wear a Bauble, they would grow dear.
If Fools went not to Market, bad Wares would not be sold.
If he had spew'd so often as he has lyed, he'd have brought up his Guts long ago.
If her Husband like it, I like it also.
If Honesty cannot, Knavery should not.
If Jack's in Love, he's no Judge of Jill's Beauty.
If I am a Fool, put you your Finger in my Mouth.
If I had a Dog so good for nothing as thou art, I'd hang him.
If I had had no Plough, you had had no Corn.
If I had given Four-pence for that Advice, I had bought it a Groat too dear.
If I had not lifted up the Stone, you had not found the Jewel.
If it should rain Porridge, he'd want a Dish.
If it were a Bear, it would bite you.
If it were not for Hopes, the Heart would break.
If it were not for the Belly, the Back might wear Gold.
If Madness were Pain, you'd hear Outcries in every House.
If Marriages are made in Heaven, you had few Friends there.
If Men had not slept, the Tares had not been sown.
If Money be not thy Servant, it will be thy Master.
If my Shirt knew my Design, I'd burn it.
If no Body take Notice of our Faults, we easily forget them our selves.
If one, two, or three tell you, you are an Ass, put on a Tail.
If our Bodies were to cost no more than our Souls, we might board cheap.
If Pains be a Pleasure to you, Profit will follow.
If Strokes are good to give, they are good to receive.
If the Ball does not stick to the Wall, yet 'twill leave some Mark.
If the Bed could tell all it knows, it would put many to the Blush.
If the Channel's too small, the Water must break out.
If the Counsel be good, no Matter who gave it.
Is the Devil catch a Man idle, he'll set him at work.
If the Frog and Mouse quarrel, the Kite will see them agreed.
If the Mountain will not come to Mahomet, Mahomet must go to the Mountain.
If the Niggard should once taste the Sweetness of Giving, he'd give all away.
If the old Dog barks, he gives Counsel.
If the Parson be from Home, be content with the Curate.
If the Pills were pleasant, they would not want gilding.
If the Sky fall, the Pots will be broken.
If the Sky fall, we shall catch Larks.
If the Walls were Adamant, yet Gold will take the Town.
If there were no Knaves and Fools, all the World would be alike.
If thou can'st not see the Bottom, wade not.
If thou dealest with a Fox, think of his Tricks.
If thou doest no more than barely wish me well, thou art no Brother of mine.
If thou sailest with a bad Wind, thou had'st need to understand Tacking about well.
If thou wouldest have a good Crop, sow with thy Hand, but pour not out of the Sack.
If thou wouldest keep Money, save Money.
If thou wouldest reap Money, sow Money.
If thy Cast be bad, mend it with good Play.
If thy Hand be in a Lion's Mouth, get it out as fast as thou can'st.
If to-day will not, to-morrow may.
If 'twill not be spun, bring it not to the Distaff.
If Virtue keep Court within, Honour will attend without.
If we are bound to forgive an Enemy, we are not bound to trust him.
If we be Enemies to our selves, whither shall we fly?
If we did not flatter our selves, no Body else could.
If Wishes were Thrushes, Beggars might eat Birds.
If you are negligent, others will be so to you.
If you are too fortunate, you will not know your self.
If you are too unfortunate, no Body will know you.
If you be a Fool, and I be a Fool, there will be no meddling with us.
If you be a Jester, keep your Wit till you have use for it.
If you be angry, you may turn the Buckle of your Girdle behind you.
If you be false to both Beasts and Birds, you must, with the Bat, fly only by Night.
If you be not Content, put your hand in your Pocket, and please your self.
If you be not so swift as he, go to Rights.
If you beat Spice, it will smell the sweeter.
If you brew well, you may drink well.
If you buy the Cow, take the Tail into the Bargain.
If you can abide a curst Wife, you need not fear any Company.
If you can be well without Health, you maybe happy without Virtue.
If you command wisely, you'll be obey'd cheerfully.
If you cut down the Woods, you'll catch the Wolf.
If you desire to see by my Light, you must minister Oyl to my Lamp.
If you despise King Log, you shall fear King Crane. 
If you don't open the Door to the Devil, he goes away.
If you eat a Pudding at Home, your Dog shall have the Skin.
If you go into a Labyrinth, take a Clew with you.
If you greaze a Cause well, it will stretch.
If you had as little Money as Manners, you'd be the poorest of all your Kin.
If you had had fewer Friends, and more Enemies, you had been a better Man.
If you hate a Man, eat his Bread; and if you love him, do the same.
If you have done no ill the six Days, you may play the seventh.
If you have many Irons in the Fire, some wilt burn.
If you have no Enemies, it's a sign Fortune has forgot you.
If you have one true Friend, you hare more than your Share comes to.
If you increase the Water, you must increase the Malt.
If you in every Thing fear, you shall not do well; you'll come to do ill in all Things.
If you let a Fool play with you at Home, he'll do so with you in the Market.
If you lie upon Roses, when young; you'll lie upon Thorns, when old.
If you light the Fire at both Ends, the middle will shift for it self.
If you love me, pray make it appear.
If you love not the noise of the Bells, why do you pull the Ropes?
If you love your self too much, no Body else will love you at all.
If you make Bacchus your God, Apollo will not keep you Company.
If you make Money your God, 'twill plague you like a Devil.
If you make not much of three Pence, you'll never be worth a Groat.
Is you make your Wife an Ass, she will make you an Ox.
If you make your Wife a Gold-finch, she may prove in time a Wag-tail.
If you mock the Lame, you will go so your self in time.
If you mull needs rake in a Jakes, you may take the Perfume of it for your pains.
If you oblige those that can never pay you, you make Providence your Debtor.
If you pay for every Lie, you will soon be a Bankrupt.
If you pay not a Servant his Wages, he will pay himself.
If you play with Boys, yon mull take Boy's Play.
If you pity Rogues, you are no great Friend to honest Men.
If you put nothing into your Purse, you can take nothing out.
If you run after two Hares, you will catch neither.
If you save a Rogue from the Gallows, he will rob you that same Night.
If you scold me, I will not flatter you.
If you seek Trouble, it's pity but you should find it.
If you sell the Cow, you sell her Milk too.
If you sit down a meer Philosopher, you will rife almost an Atheist.
If you sleep till Noon, you have no right to complain that the Days are short.
If you slander a dead Man, you stab him in the Grave.
If you steal for others, you shall be hanged yourself.
If you squeeze a Cork, you will get but little Juice.
If you swallow Vice, 'twill rise badly in your Stomach.
If you tell every Step, you will make a long Journey of it.
If you want a Pretence to whip a Dog, it is enough to say, he eat up the Frying-pan.
If you leap into a Well, Providence is not bound to fetch yon out.
If you will obtain, you must attempt.
If you win at that, you will lose at nothing.
If you would compare two Men, you must know them both.
If you would have a Hen lay, you must bear with her cackling.
If you would have honest Men, you must go put of the Land for them.
If you would know the value of a Ducat, try to borrow one.
If you wrestle with a Collier, you will get a Bloteh.
If your Desires be endless; your Cares and Fears will be so too.
If your Head be Glass, engage not at throwing Stones.
If your Joys cannot be long, so neither can your Sorrows.
If your Luck goes on at this Rate, you may very well hope to be hang'd.
If your Shoe pinch you, give it your Man.
In a Calm every one can steer.
Ina Filler's House, all are Dancers.
In a Night's Time springs up a Mushroom.
In a thousand Pound's worth of Law, there is not a Shilling's worth of Pleasure.
In all Games, it is good to leave off a Winner.
In an Enemy Spots are soon seen.
In an Ermin Spots are soon discover'd.
In Conversation dwell not too long on a weak Side.
In Courtesy rather pay a Penny too much, than too little.
In doubtful Matters, Courage may do much; in desperate, Patience.
In fair Weather, prepare for foul.
In Love's Wars, he who flyeth is Conqueror.
In Sleep what difference is there between lomon and a Fool?
In taking Revenge a Man is but even with his Enemy; but in passing it over, he is superior.
In the coldest Flint, there is hot Fire.
In the Company of Strangers, Silence is safe.
In the deepest Water is the best fishing.
In the fair Tale, is foul Falsity.
In the Grave, Dust and Bones justle not for the Wall.
In the greatest Ill, the good Man hath Hope left.
In the short Life of Man, no Time can be afforded to be lost.
In the Time of Mirth take Heed.
In Things that must be, it is good to be resolute.
In Time comes he, whom God sends.
Into the Mouth of a bad Dog, falls many a good Bone.
It amounts to no more than the Tail of a roasted Horse.
It becomes her, as a Pack-saddle would a Sow.
It costeth us more to revenge Injuries, than, to bear them.
It happens in an Hour, that comes not in an Age.
It has been a great Misfortune to many a one, that he lived too long.
It is a bad Action, that Success cannot justify.
It a bad Bargain, where both are Losers.
It is a bad Cause indeed, that none dares speak in.
It is a bad Cloth, that will take no Colour.
It is a bad House, where the Hen crows louder than the Cock.
It is a bad Sack, that will bear no clouting.
It is a bad Soil, where no Flowers will grow.
It is a Stake, that will not stand in the Hedge one Year.
It is a base Thing to tear a dead Lion's Beard off.
It is a base Thing to tread upon a Man, that is down.
It is a blind Goose that knows not a Fox from a Fern-bush.
It is a cunning Part to play the Fool well.
It is a fair degree of Plenty to have what is necessary.
It is a foolish Bird that stayeth the laying Salt upon her Tail.
It is a fortunate Head, that was never broke.
It is a good Blade, that bends well.
It is a good Dog, that can catch any Thing.
It is a good Friend, that is always giving, tho' it be never so little.
It is a good Hunting-bout, that fills the Belly.
It is a good Knife, 'twas made at Dull-edge. 
It is a great Act of Life, to sell Air well.
It is a great Journey to Life's end.
It is a great Point of Wisdom, to find out one's own Folly.
It is a hard-fought Field, where none escapes.
It is a hard Thing to have a great Estate, and not fall in Love with it.
It is a long Lane that never turns.
It is a mad Hare, that will be caught with a Tabor.
It is a Madness for a Sheep, to send a Challenge to a Wolf.
It is a Madness for a Sheep to treat of Peace with a Wolf.
It is a manly Act, to forsake an Error.
It is a mean Ambition to be the Squire of the Company.
It is a miserable Thing for a wise Man to be under the Government of a Fool.
It is a most base Thing to betray a Man, because he trusted you.
It is a rank Courtesy, when a Man is forced to give Thanks for what is his own.
It is a Reproach, to be the first Gentleman of his Race; but it is a greater, to be the last.
It is a lad Burthen for a Woman to carry a dead Man's Child.
It is a sad choice, Frying or Fire.
It is a Shame to steal, but a worse to carry home.
It is a Sign of a good Man, if he grows better for Commendation.
It is a Sign of a worthy Spirit, whom Honour amends.
It is a silly Bargain, where no Body gets.
It is a silly Fish, that is caught twice with the same Bait.
It is a silly Game, where no Body wins.
It is a silly Goose, that comes to a Foxe's Sermon.
It is a silly Horse, that can neither whinney, nor wag his Tail.
It is a Sin against Hospitality, to open your Doors, and shut up your Countenance.
It is a Sin to belie even the Devil himself.
It is a sorry Flock, where the Ewe bears the Bell.
It is a sorry Goose, that will not baste it self.
It it a sort of a Favour, to be denied at first.
It is a strange salt Fish, that no Water can make fresh.
It is a strange Wood, that has never a dead Bough in it.
It is a wicked Thing to make a Dearth one's Garner.
It is a worthier Thing to deserve Honour than to possess it.
It is an easy Thing, to find a Stick to beat a Dog.
It is an equal Failing to trust every Body, and to trust no Body.
It is an hard Winter, when Dogs eat Dogs.
It is an ill Air, where nothing is to be gained.
It is an ill Army, where the Devil carries the Colours
It is an ill Bird, that bewrays its own Nest.
It is an ill-bred Dog, that will beat a Bitch.
It is an ill Dog, that deserves not a Crust.
It is an ill Dog, that is not worth the whistling for.
It is an ill Guest, that never drinks to his Hostess.
It is an ill Procession, where the Devil holds the Candle.
It is an ill Sign, to see a Fox lick a Lamb.
It is an ill Thing to be deceived, but worse to deceive.
It is as great a Mischief to spare all, as it is Cruelty to spare none.
It is as hard a Thing, as to sail over the Sea in an Egg-shell.
It is as hard a Thing to please a Knave, as a Knight.
It is as long a Coming, as Cotswold Barley.
It is as much Intemperance to weep too much, as to laugh too much.
It is as natural a Thing for Means to cure, as 'tis for Fire to burn.
It is as natural to die, as to be born.
It is at Courts, as it is in Ponds; some Fish, some Frogs.
It is almost as necessary to know other Men, as our selves.
It is always Term-Time in the Court of Conscience.
It is better to be beloved than honoured.
It is better to have a Hen to Morrow, than an Egg to Day.
It is better to knot, than to blossom.
It is better to pay, and have but little left; than to have much, and be always in Debt.
It is better to reprove privately, than to be angry secretly.
It is better to spin all Night with Penelope, than sing with Helen all Day.
It is better to take half in Hand, and the rest presently.
It is cheap enough to say, God help you. 
It is easy for a Man in Health, to preach Patience to the Sick.
It is easy to keep a Castle, that was never assaulted.
It is easy to rob an Orchard, when none keep it.
It is easier to bear with what's amiss, than go about to reform it.
It is easier to descend than ascend.
It is easier to fill a Glutton's Belly, than his Eye.
It is easier to prevent ill Habits, than to brake them.
It is easier to pull down, than build up.
It is easier to run from Virtue to Vice, than from Vice to Virtue.
It is easier to strike than defend well.
It is even as broad as it is long.
It is for want of thinking, that most Men are undone.
It is good Beef, that costs nothing.
It is good Fish, if it were but caught.
It is good fishing, in troubled Waters.
It it good Pride, to desire to be the best of Men.
It is good sheltering under an old Hedge.
It is good, to be good in Time; you know not, how long it will last.
It is good to have a Hatch before one's Door.
It is good to have two Strings to one's Bow.
It is good to be akin to an Estate.
It is good to sleep in a whole Skin.
It is good to strike the Serpent's Head, with your Enemy's Hand.
It is Goodness, not Greatness, that will do thee good.
It is hard, even to the most miserable, to die.
It is hard to be high and humble.
It is hard to break an old Hog of a Customs.
It is hard to make a good Web, of a Bottle of Hay.
It is hard to pay and pray too.
It is hard to shave an Egg.
It is hard to suffer wrong, and pay for it too.
It is hard to turn tack upon a narrow Bridge.
It is hard to wive and thrive both in a Year.
It is harder to marry a Daughter well, than to bring her up well.
It is Hope alone, that makes us willing to live.
It is humane to err, but diabolical to persevere.
It is ill Angling after the Net.
It is ill killing a Crow with an empty Sling.
It is ill mistaking in Matters of Importance.
It is ill playing with Gunpowder.
It is ill to drive black Hogs in the Dark.
It is ill to set Spurs to a flying Horse.
It is ill to take an unlawful Oath, but worse to keep it.
It is in vain to cast your Net, where there is no Fish.
It is in vain to learn Wisdom, and yet to live foolishly.
It is in vain to mislike the current Fashion.
It is in vain to use Words, when Deeds are expected.
It is like Nuts to an Ape.
It is lost Labour to play a Jigg to an old Cat.
It is lost Labour to sow, where there's no Soil.
It is Madness to put on Gloves, when you are stark naked.
It is Midsummer Moon with you.
It is Money, that makes the Mare to go.
It is more commendable to deny upon Occasion than to grant upon none.
It is more difficult to praise rightly, than to blame.
It is more painfull to do Nothing, than to eta Something.
ft is more Wisdom sometimes to dissemble Wrongs, than to revenge them.
It is much like a Blacksmith, with a white silk Apron.
It is much safer to reconcile an Enemy to thee, than to conquer him.
It is my own Fault, if I am deceived by the same Man twice.
It is natural to a Grey-Hound to have a long Tail.
It is no Advantage for a Man in a Fever to change his Bed.
It is no Discredit to be a Teacher of that which is credible to be learnt.
It is no easy Matter to bear Prosperity decently.
It is no good Hen, that cackles in your House, and lays in another's.
It is no Injury, that is not meant an Injury.
It is no more Sin to see a Woman weep, than , to see a Goose go barefoot.
It is no more to him, than a Crab in a Cow's Mouth.
It is no Shame to yield to him, that we must not oppose.
It is not a chargeable Thing to salute civilly.
It is not a Sin to sell dear, but it is to make ill Measure.
It is not a Sign of Humility to declaim against Pride.
It is not as thy Mother sayeth, but as thy Neighbours say.
It is not every one that can pickle well.
It is not good to come near the Plague, tho' to cure it.
It is not Humility, but Sordidness, to be regardless of true Honour.
It is not lost, it comes at last.3000 It is not the Beast, but the Mind, that is the Sacrifice.
It is not the Cowl, that makes the Frier.
It is not the find Coat, that makes the sine Gentleman.
It is not to be called a bad Day, that has a good Night.
It is not Want, but rather Abundance, that makes Avarice.
It is nothing to begin, unless you proceed, and end well.
It is often easier to make new, than to cobble up the old.
It is one Thing to speak much, and another to speak pertinently.
It is a pity those that taught you to talk, did not also teach you to hold your Tongue.
It is poor Play, that is not worth the Candle.
It is possible for a Sheep to kill a Butcher.
It is possible to sin against Charity, when we do not against Truth.
It is safe taking a slice off a Cut Loaf.
It is safer to commend the Dead, than the Living
It is safer to hear and take Counsel, than to give it.
It is Sin not to be angry with Sin.
It is some Relief to the Unfortunate, to see there are others more Miserable.
It is sooner said than done.
It is Time enough to cry, Oh! when you are hurt.
It is Time to marry, when the Woman woes the Man.
It is Time to set in, when the Oven comes to the Bread.
It is the Bridle and Spur, that makes a good Horse.
It is the easiest Thing in the World, for a Man to deceive himself.
It is the finest Flower in his Garden.
It is the Justice's Clerk, that makes the Justice.
It is the Marriage of a Cat and a Dog together.
It is the ordinary way of the World, to keep Folly at the Helm, and Wisdom under the Hatches.
It is the Property of Fools, to be always judging.
It is thou must honour the Place, not the Place thee.
It is very pretty, to see a poor Man give to the Rich.
It is very seldom that a great Talker, hath either Discretion or good Manners.
It is Wit to pick a Lock, and steal a Horse; but it is Wisdom to let it alone.
It is wise, not to seek a Secret; and honest, not to reveal it.
It is wiser to run away, when there's no Remedy, than to stay and die in the Field foolishly.
It is working, that makes a Workman.
It is worse to do, than to revenge an Injury.
It looks as well as a Diamond Necklace about, a Sow's Neck.
It matters not what Religion an ill Man is of.
It may be necessary sometimes to hold a Candle to the Devil.
It must be a wiley Mouse, that can breed in a Cat's Ear.
It ought to be a good Tale, that is twice told.
It pitieth me to refuse him, that asketh modestly.
It pricketh betimes, that will be a good Thorn.
It rains in Summer, as well as in Winter.
It signifies nothing to play well, if you lose.
It will be long enough e're you wish your Skin full of Oilet-Holes.
It would have been pity to have spoil'd two Houses with them.
It would vex a Dog, to see a Pudding creep.
Jack at a Pinch.
Jack in an Office, is a great Man.
Jack of all Trades is of no Trade.
Jack would be a Gentleman, if he could but speak French. 
Idle Brains are the Devil's Workhouses.
Idle Fellows are the Devil's Playfellows.
Idle Men are dead all their Life long.
Idle People take the most Pains.
Idleness always envies Industry.
Idleness and Chastity cannot set their Horses together.
Idleness and Lust are sworn Friends.
Idleness is the greatest Prodigality in the World.
Idleness makes the Wit rust.
Idleness must thank it self, if it go barefoot.
Jeerers must be content to taste of their own Broth.
Jests are seldom good the first Time, but the second distasteful.
Jests, like Sweet Meats, have often four Sawce.
Ignorance is less hateful than Conceitedness.
Ignorance is the Mother of Impudence.
Ignorance is the Mother of Romish Devotion.
Ill Doers are ill Thinkers.
Ill gotten Goods seldom prosper.
Ill got, ill spent.
Ill Kings make many good Laws.
Ill Layers up make many Thieves.
Ill Luck is good for something.
Ill Manners produce good Laws.
Ill Natures never want a Tutor.
Ill News comes apace.
Ill Sowers make ill Harvest.
Ill Tongues ought to be heard only by Persons of Discretion.
Ill Weeds grow apace.
Ill Will never speaks well, nor doth well.
Ill Words are Bellows to a slackning Fire.
Ill Wounds may be cured; but not ill Names.
Impatience does not diminish, but always augments the Evil.
Impatience makes every Ill double; but Content makes it none at all.
Impatience never gets Preferment.
Improve Opportunities.
Impudence and Wit are vastly different.
Impudence commonly makes a Fortune.
Inconsiderable Excuses are a sort of self-Accusation.
Incredulity should make Men advised, not irresolute.
Industry is Fortune's right Hand, and Frugality her left.
Industry will never do much, unless there be natural Parts also.
Ingratitude is the Daughter of Pride.
Ingratitude makes the Receiver worse, but the Benefactor better.
Injuries don't use to be written on Ice.
Injuries flighted become none at all.
Injurious Men brook no Injuries.
Injury is to be measured by Malice.
Innocence is no Protection.
Innocence it self, sometimes, hath need of a Mask.
Innocent Actions carry their Warrant with them.
Innovations are dangerous.
Insolence is Pride, with her Mask pulled off.
Insolence puts an end to Friendship.
Invite not a Jew either to Pig or Pork.
Joan reels ill, and winds worse; the Devil a Stomach she has to spin.
Joan's as good as my Lady in the Dark.
Job was not so miserable in his Sufferings, as happy in his Patience.
Joy surfeited turns to Sorrow.
Is it an Emperor's Business to catch Flies?
Is no Coin good Silver but your Penny?
Is there no Mean, but Fast or Feast?
Itch is more intolerable than Smart.
Justice needs not Injury to assist it, in getting its own.
Justice will not condemn even the Devil himself wrongfully.
Keep Counsel thy self first.
Keep the common Road, and thou'rt safe.
Keep thy Plough jogging, so shalt thou have Corn for thy Horses.
Keep touch in small Things.
Keep your Purse and your Mouth close.
Keep your Shop, and your Shop will keep you:
Keeping from falling, is better than helping up.
Kill a Cockatrice in the Egg.
Kill the Lion's Whelp; thou'lt strive in vain, when he's grown.
Kindnesses, that we cannot requite, are troublesome.
Kindness is the noblest Weapon to conquer with.
Kissing goes by Favour.
Kings, alone, are no more than single Men.
Kings have no Power over Souls.
Knavery may serve a Turn; but Honesty never fails.
Knavery, without Luck, is the worst Trade in the World.
Knaves and Fools divide the World.
Knaves are in such Repute, that honest Men are accounted Fools.
Knaves imagine nothing can be done without Knavery.
Knowledge begins a Gentleman, but 'tis Conversation that compleats him.
Knowledge directeth Practice; but yet Practice increaseth Knowledge.
Knowledge in Youth is Sapience in Age.
Knowledge is a Treasure, but Practice is the Key to it.
Knowledge rendereth a Crime inexcusable.
Knowledge, without Practice, makes but half an Artist.
Ladies will rather pardon want of Sense than want of Manners.
Lame Hares are ill to help.
Lament not the Dead, but the Living.
Late Repentance is seldom true.
Laughter is the Hickup of a Fool.
Lavishness is not Generosity.
Law cannot persuade, where it cannot punish.
Law governs Man, and Reason the Law.
Laws catch Flies, but let the Hornets go free.
Lawyers don't love Beggars.
Lay on more Wood; the Ashes will yield Money.
Lay the Saddle upon the right Horse.
Lay Things by; they may come to Use.
Lay thy Hand upon thy Half-penny twice, before thou partest with it.
Laziness calls for Whip and Spur.
Lean not on a Reed.
Lean Liberty is better than fat Slavery.
Learning, in an ill Man, is good Wine in a musty Bottle.
Learning in the Hand of some is a Scepter, in that of others a Fool's Bauble.
Learning is worse lodg'd in him, than Jove was in a Thatcht-House.
Learning makes a good Man better, and an ill Man worse.
Learning makes a Man sit Company for himself.
Learn to crawl, before you can go.
Learn to say, before you sing.
Leave Boy's Play, and go to Push-Pin. 
Leave is Light.
Leave no Dirt, you'll find no Dirt.
Leave off Play, as soon as the Pleasure is past.
Leave the Spring, for the Stream; so you shall hive Mud for Water.
Leave us in the Dirt, and find us in the Mire.
Less of your Courtship, I pray, and more of your Coin.
Let Choler be only a common Soldier, not a Commander.
Let every Cuckold wear his own Horns.
Let every one praise the Bridge, that carries him over.
Let every Pedlar carry his own Pack.
Let every Snail like her own Shell best.
Let her that will not dance, turn out of the Wedding.
Let him fry in his own Grease.
Let him say what he will, Men have spoken well of God, before now.
Let him set up a Shop upon Goodwin's Sands.
Let him, that can play, take the Lute.
Let him, that earns the Bread, eat it.
Let him, that is cold, blow the Fire.
Let him, that owns the Cow, take her by the Tail.
Let him, that receives the Profit, repair the Inn.
Let me gain by you; and no matter whether yon love me or not.
Let not another shuffle and cut the Cards thou art to deal out.
Let not the Mouse-trap smell of Blood.
Let not thy Tongue run away with thy Brains.
Let the best Horse leap the Hedge first.
Let the Church have leave to stand in the Church-yard.
Let the Drunkard alone; and by and by he'll fall of himself.
Let the Guts be full, for its they that carry the Legs.
Let the Hen live, tho' it be with Pip.
Let the People take back their Praise again; I will do as much as I can without that.
Let the Smith himself wear the Fetters he forged.
Let them laugh that win.
Let Women spin, and not preach.
Let your Trouble tarry till its own Day comes.
Letters blush not.
Liars and Wits are Cowards.
Liberality is not giving largely, but giving wisely.
Liberality draweth Flattery.
Lickerish Tongues, treacherous Tails.
Lidford Law; first hang and draw, then hear the Cause.
Life and Misery began together.
Life is half spent, before we know what it is.
Life lyeth not in living by liking.
Life that is too short for the Happy, is too long for the Miserable.
Life without a Friend, is Death with a Vengeance.
Life would be too smooth, if it had no Rubs in it.
Light come, Light go.
Light-heel'd Mothers make leaden-heel'd Daughters.
Light Injuries are made none, by not regarding them.
Light Suppers make clean Sheets.
Lightness of Carriage, and Beauty, are old Companions.
Like a Barber's Chair, fit for every one.
Like a Calf, she has a sweet Tooth in her Head.
Like a Cat, he'll still fall upon his Legs.
Like a Collier's Sack; bad without, but worse within.
Like a Dog in a Manger; you'll not eat your self, nor let the Horse eat.
Like a Loader's Horse, that lives among Thieves.
Like a Miller; he can set to every Wind.
Like a Mill Horse; that goes much, but performs no Journey.
Like an Hog; he does no good till he dies.
Like Banbury Tinkers; that mend one Hole, and make three.
Like Fish; that live in Salt-water, and yet are fresh.
Like Flanders-Mares, fairest afar off.
Like Lambs; yon do nothing but suck, and wag your Tail.
Like Lips, like Lettuce.
Like Master, like Man.
Like Priest, like People.
Like Teague's Cocks; that fought one another, tho' all were of the same Side.
Like the Gardener's Dog; that neither eats Cabbage himself, nor lets any Body else.
Like the Smith's Dog; that steeps at the noise of the Hammers, and wakes at the crashing of Teeth.
Like the Taylor; that sewed for nothing, and found Thread himself.
Like those Dogs; that meeting with nobody else, bite one another.
Like to Like; and Nan to Nicholas. 
Like will to Like; as the Devil said to the Collier.
Like Wood's Dog; he'll neither go to Church, nor stay at Home.
Likely lies in the Mire, when Unlikely gets over.
Likeness begets Love; yet proud Men hate one another.
Lilies are whitest in a Blackmoor's Hand.
Lip-Honour costs little, yet may bring in much.
Lip-Labour, is but lost Labour,
Listen at the Hole, and you'll hear News of your self.
Listeners hear no good of themselves.
Little and often, fills the Purse.
Little Birds may pick a dead Lion.
Little Boats must keep the Shore.
Little Bodies have commonly great Souls.
Little Difference between a Feast, and a Bellyful.
Little Dogs start the Hare, but great ones catch it.
Little Goods are soon spent.
Little Goods, little Care.
Little knows the fat Sow, what the lean one means.
Little said, is soon amended.
Little Serpents may bite mortally.
Little Shame, little Conscience, and much Industry will make a Man rich.
Little Sticks kindle a Fire; but great ones put it out.
Little Wealth brings little Trouble.
Live, and let live.
Live not upon the Opinion of other Men.
Living upon Trust, is the way to pay double.
London-Bridge was made for Wise Men to pass over, and for Fools to pass under.
Long and lazy.
Long and slender, like a Cat's Elbow.
Long e're you cut down an Oak with a Penknife.
Long Life hath long Misery.
Long look'd for, comes at last.
Look high, and fall low.
Look not a given Horse in the Mouth.
Look to him, Jaylor; there's a Frog in the Stocks.
Loquacity is the Fistula of the Soul, ever runing, and never cur'd.
Loquacity storms the Ear, but Modesty takes the Heart.
Lordly Vices require lordly Estates.
Lose a Leg rather than Life.
Lose not a Hog, for a Half-penny-worth of Tar.
Love and Envy make a Man pine.
Love and Madness judge of Things much alike.
Love and Pease-porridge will make their Way.
Love and Pease will make a Man speak at both Ends.
Love and Pride stock Bedlam.
Love comes in at the Window, and flies out at the Door.
Love does much; but Money does more.
Love is as mad as Ajax; it kills Sheep, so it kills me.
Love is the Loadstone of Love.
Love is wont rather to ascend than descend.
Love lives more in Cottages than Courts.
Love me little, and love me long.
Love me, love my Dog.
Love me more, and honour me less.
Love never desires a Partner.
Love of Wit makes no Man rich.
Love requires Boldness, and scorns Bashfulness.
Love sees no Faults.
Love, the Itch, and a Cough cannot be hid.
Love thy Neighbour; but cut not up thy Hedge for him.
Love weeping burns.
Love will creep, where it cannot go.
Lovers complain of their Hearts; but the Distemper is in their Heads.
Lye thou for me; and I'll swear for thee.3304 Madam, I am to the utmost of my Power, not yours.
Magistrates are to obey as well as execute Laws.
Maidens should be seen, and not heard.
Maids, make much of one; good Men are scarce.
Maids say nay, and take it.
Maids want nothing but Husbands, and then they want every Thing.
Make a Model, before thou buildest.
Make a Pearl on your Nail.
Make a Silver Bridge for your Enemy to fly over.
Make a Virtue of Necessity.
Make Hay, while the Sun shines.
Make me a Sooth-sayer, and I'll make thee rich.
Make no Baulks in good Ground.
Make no Orts of good Hay.
Make not a Gauntlet of a Hedging Glove.
Make not another's Shoes, by your Foot.
Make not even the Devil blacker than he is.
Make not Fish of one, and Flesh of another.
Make not thy Sail too big for the Ballast.
Make not thy Tail broader than thy Wings.
Make not your Sauce, before you have caught the Fish.
Make the best of a bad Bargain.
Make the young one squeak, and you'll catch the old one.
Malice drinketh up the greatest Part of in own Poison.
Malice hath a sharp Sight, and a strong Memory.
Malice is mindful.
Man begins to die before he is born.
Man had perish'd long ago, had it not been for publick spirited Persons.
Man punishes the Action, but God the Intention.
Manners and Money make a Gentleman.
Manners make a Man, quoth Will. of Wickham. 
Man, Woman, and Devil, are the three Degrees of Comparison.
Many a Dog's dead, since you were a Whelp.
Many a good Cow hath but a bad Calf.
Many a Man of Fame hath been beholden to Fortune for his Lawrel.
Many an honest Man stands in need of Help, that has not the Face to beg it.
Many can bear Adversity, but sew Contempt.
Many can pack the Cards better than they can play.
Many come to bring their Clothes to Church rather than themselves.
Many Dogs soon eat up a Horse.
Many Dressers put the Bride's Dress out of Order.
Many drops of Water, will sink a Ship.
Many get into a Dispute well, that cannot get out well.
Many Hands make light Work.
Many have come to a Port after a Storm.
Many have been ruin'd, by buying good Penny-worths.
Many humble Servants, but not one true Friend.
Many kiss the Child for the Nurse's sake.
Many kiss the Hands they wish to see cut off.
Many make strait Things crooked, but sew the contrary.
Many Masters, quoth the Toad to the Harrow, when every Tine turn'd her over.
Many owe their Fortunes to their Enviers.
Many rise under their Burthens, more like Camels, than Palm-Trees.
Many Stroaks fell the Oak.
Many talk like Philosophers, and live like Fools.
Many, that are Wits in jest, are Fools in earnest.
Many, that go out for Wool, come home shorn.
Many there be, that buy nothing with their Money but Repentance.
Many Things fall out between the Cup and the Lip.
Many Things grow in the Garden, that were never sow'd there.
Many Words and many Lies look much alike.
Many Words will not fill a Bushel.
Many would be Cowards if they had Courage enough.
Many would have been worse, if their Estates had been better.
March-Birds are best.
March-Grass never did good.
Marriage and Hanging go by Destiny.
Marriage is honourable; but House-keeping chargeable.
Marriage leapeth up upon the Saddle, and soon after Repentance upon the Crupper.
Marry your Daughters betimes lest they marry themselves.
Marry cone up my dirty Cousin.
Masters are mostly the greatest Servants in the House.
Masters mould be sometimes blind, and sometimes deaf.
May it please God not to make our Friends so happy, as to forget us.
May no good Christian ever see an ugly Woman that affects Niceness.
Mean Men admire Wealth, great Men, Glory.
Measure not others Corn, by your own Bushel.
Measure thrice, and cut once.
Meat and Mattins hinder not a Journey.
Meat is much; but Malice is more.
Mediocrity is mean, and below an exalted Spirit.
Medlers are the Devil's Body-Lice; they fetch Blood from those that feed them.
Meer Idleness can have no Excuse.
Men apt to promise, are apt to forget.
Men are less eager for what they may have, than what they cannot obtain.
Men are more prone to revenge Injuries, than to requite Kindnesses.
Men are not to be measur'd by Inches.
Men blush to be cur'd by a shameful Remedy.
Men fear Death, as Children fear going in the Dark.
Men generally look more upon Decency than Virtue.
Men get Wealth, and Women keep it.
Men hate those they have hurt.
Men like to talk of what they love.
Men may bear till their Backs break.
Men may blush to hear what they were not asham'd to act.
Men never play the Fool more, than by endeavouring to be overwise.
Men never think their Fortune too great, nor their Wit too little.
Men of Business must not break their Word twice.
Men of Cruelty are Birds of the Devil's hatching.
Men seek less to be instructed than applauded.
Men take less care of their Conscience than their Reputation.
Men, that are crafty, deal mostly in Generals.
Men, that have much Business, must have much Pardon.
Men work but slowly, that have poor Wages.
Men's Actions are not to be judg'd of at first Sight.
Merry is the Company, till the Reckoning comes.
Merry meet, merry part.
Mettle is dangerous in a blind Horse.
Mice care not to play with Kittens.
Millers need no Noise, yet cannot grind without it.
Mills will not grind, if you give them not Water.
Mirth and Mischief are two Things.
Mirth and Motion prolong Life.
Mischief comes by the Pound, and goes away by the Ounce.
Misers put their Bad and their Belly into their Pocket.
Misfortunes make us wise.
Misfortunes tell us, what Fortune is.
Misfortunes, that can't be avoided, must be sweetned.
Misfortunes, when asleep, ate not to be awaken'd.
Misreckoning is no Payment,
Misunderstanding brings Lies to Town.
Mock no Pannier-Man, if your Father was a Fisher.
Mock not, quoth Mountford, when his Wife called him Cuckold.
Moderate Riches will carry you; if you have more, you must carry them.
Moderate Things are best.
Moderation in Prosperity argues a great Mind.
Modest Assurance, good Humour and Prudence, make a Gentleman.
Modesty is not Bashfulness.
Modesty ruins all that bring it to Court,
Money, as well as Need makes the old Wife trot.
Money cannot buy Merit.
Money in Purse will be always in Fashion.
Money is a merry Fellow.
Money is a Sword, that can cut even the Gordian Knot.
Money is Ace of Trumps.
Money is the best Bait to fish for Man with.
Money is the God of the World.
Money is the only Monarch.
Money is the Sinew of Love as well as of War.
Money is too inconsiderable to love; yet too useful to throw away.
Money, like Dung, does no Good till 'tis spread.
Money makes Marriage.
Money makes not so many true Friends as real Enemies.
Money will do more than my Lord's Letter.
Money will make a Baboon, or a Bear, to ride in a Coach.
Money will make the Pot boil, tho' the Devil piss in the Fire.
More belongs to Marriage than four bare Legs in a Bed.
More Cost than Worship.
More Credit may be thrown down in a Moment, than can be built in an Age.
More die by Food than Famine.
More Flies are taken with a Drop of Honey than a Tun of Vinegar.
More goes to the making of a fine Gentleman than fine Clothes.
More Knave than Fool.
More like the Devil than to Saint Lawrence. 
More Malice than Matter.
More Men are terrified than punished.
More Molehills than Men.
More than enough is too much.
More than we use is more than we want, and a Burthen to the Bearer.
More things affright, than hurt us.
More to do with one Jackanapes, than with all the Bears.
More Words than one to a Bargain.
Mortal Man must not keep up immortal Anger.
Most Men cry, Long live the Conqueror.
Most Men employ their first Years, so as to make their last miserable.
Most Men have a Thorn at their Door.
Most Men worship the rising Sun.
Most of our Evils come from our Vices.
Most Things have two Handles; and a wise Man takes hold of the best.
Mostly, where the Body is finely adorned, the Soul is ungarnished.
Mother's Darlings make but milk-sop Heroes.
Mouth-Civility is no great Pains, but may turn to good Account.
Much better never to catch a Rogue, than let him go again.
Much Bran, and little Flour.
Much Coin, much Care.
Much Compliance, much Craft.
Much Corn lies in the Chaff unseen.
Much in Earth, but little in Heaven.
Much Law, but little Justice.
Much Meat, much Malady.
Much Praying, but no Piety.
Much Religion, but no Goodness.
Much Wit, much Froth.
Much would have more; but often meets with less.
Mud choaks no Eels.
Muddy Springs will have muddy Streams.
Muddy Water is a bad Looking-Glass.
Muddy Waters are the Fishmonger's Gain.
Muffled Cats are not good Mousers.
Musick helps not the Tooth-Ach.
Mustard is good Sauce, but Mirth is better.
Must I tell you a Tale, and find you Ears too?
Mutability is the Badge of Infirmity.
My Cow gives a good Mess of Milk, and then kicks it down.
My Dame fed her Hens with meer Thanks, and they laid no Eggs.
My House is my Castle.
My Mind to me a Kingdom is.
My Money comes in at the Door, and flies out at the Window.
My Name is Twyford; I know nothing of the Matter.
My Teeth are nearer to me than my Kindred is.3504 Nature gives Parts and Merit, but it's Fortune that brings them forth.
Nature is beyond all teaching.
Nature never made us for Play and Pleasure.
Nature takes as much Pains in the Womb for the forming of a Beggar as an Emperor.
Nature teaches us to love our Friends, but Religion our Enemies.
Nature will sometimes lie buried a great while, and yet revive upon occasion of a Temptation.
Natural Folly is bad enough; but learned Folly is intolerable.
Naught is never in Danger.
Nay, stay, quoth Stringer, when his Neck was in the Halter.
Near is my Shirt, but nearer is my Skin.
Necessity and Opportunity may make a Coward valiant.
Necessity dispenseth with Decorum.
Necessity has no Law.
Necessity sharpens Industry.
Neck or nothing; for the King loves no Cripples.
Need makes the naked Quean spin.
Neglect will sooner kill an Injury than Revenge.
Neither a Log, nor a Stork, good Jupiter. 
Neither Coat nor Cloak will hold out against Rain upon Rain.
Neither Fish, nor Flesh, nor good red Herring.
Neither Griefs nor Joys were ordered for Secrecy.
Neither in Kent, nor Christendom. 
Neither marry, nor buy an old Beast: the Reason's plain.
Never a Barrel, the better Herring.
Never chuse Linen nor Women by Candle-Light.
Never rub your Eye but with your Elbow.
Never too old to learn what is good.
Never was a scornful Person well receiv'd.
Never was Cat or Dog drown'd, that could but see the Shore.
New Brooms sweep clean.
New Dishes beget new Appetites.
New Grief awakens the old.
New Lords, new Laws.
New Things are most look'd at.
Next to a good Conscience, a clear Reputation is the clearest Thing in the World.
Next to no Wife, a good Wife is best.
Nice Eaters seldom meet with a good Dinner.
Night is the Mother of Thought.
Nightingales can sing their own Song best.
Nip the Briar in the Bud.
No Autumn-Fruit, without Spring-Blossoms,
No Body calls himself Rogue.
No Body can live longer in Peace than his Neighbour pleases.
No Body can stand in Awe of himself too much.
No Body can think much to bear that, which is the common Fate of all Men.
No Body hath too much Prudence or Virtue.
No Body is fond of fading Flowers.
No Body is willing to acknowledge he is in the Fault.
No Body thinks himself an Impertinent or Fool.
No Carrion will poison a Crow.
No Choice among stinking Fish.
No Condition so low, but may have Hopes; none so high, but may have Fears.
No Cross, no Crown.
No Cut, to Unkindness.
No Day passeth, without something we wish not.
No Dearth, but begins in the Horse-Manger.
No Dish pleases all Palates alike.
No Doors are shut against honest Grey-Hairs.
No Estate can make him rich that has a poor Heart.
No Feast like a Miser's Feast.
No Fence against a Flail.
No Fence against Gold.
No Fence against ill Fortune.
No fine Clothes can hide the Fool, or Clown.
No flying from Fate.
No flying without Wings.
No Fool like the old Fool.
No Friend like to a Bosom-Friend; as the Man said when he pull'd out a Louse.
No Friend to a Bosom-Friend; no Enemy to a Bosom-Enemy.
No Friendship lives long, that owes its Rise to the Pot.
No Gale can equally serve all Passengers.
No gaping against an Oven.
No Garden without its Weeds.
No Glew will hold, when the Joint is bad.
No good building without a good Foundation.
No good Workman without good Tools.
No Happiness without Holiness.
No Heralds in the Grave.
No honest Man ever repented of his Honesty.
No honest Man gets an Estate of a sudden.
No honest Man has the Leer of a Rogue.
No jesting with edg'd Tools.
No ill-natur'd People think well of God.
No Larder, but hath its Mice.
No longer blow, no longer burn.
No longer Foster, no longer Friend.
No longer Pipe, no longer Dance.
No Man can always stand his Ground.
No Man can stand always upon his Guard.
No Man can be happy without a Friend; nor be sure of his Friend, till he is unhappy.
No Man can guess in cold Blood, what he may do in a Passion
No Man can like all, or be lik'd of all.
No Man cryeth stinking Fish.
No Man ever surfeited on too much Honesty.
No Man has a Monopoly of Craft to himself.
No Man is born wise or learned.
No Man is his Craft's Master the first Day.
No Man is the worse, for knowing the worst of himself.
No Man is willing to own him, who is out of the good Opinion of the World.
No Man knows himself, till he hath tasted of both Fortunes.
No Man lives so poor as he was born.
No Man mould be afraid to die, who hath understood what it is to live.
No Man should live in the World, that hat nothing to do in it.
No Man was ever scared into Heaven.
No Man was made for Sports and Recreations.
No Man's Religion ever survives his Morals.
No matter what Religion a Knave or a Fool is of.
No matter what the Vessel is, so the Wine in it be good.
No Merchant gets always.
No Mill, no Meal.
No Pay, no Swiss. 
No Pear without a Stalk.
No Penny, no Pardon.
No Penny, no Pater-noster. 
No Priest, no Mass.
No Priority among the Dead.
No Receiver, no Thief.
No Religion, but can boast of its Martyrs.
No relying on Wine, Women and Fortune.
No Resolutions of Repentance hereafter can be sincere.
No Rogue like to the godly Rogue.
No Rose without a Prickle.
No Ruins are so irreparable, as those of Reputation.
No safe wading in an unknown Water.
No Smoak without some Fire.
No Silver, no Service.
No sort of Head-Clothes will sit a mad Head.
No Sun-shine, but hath some Shadow.
No Sweet, without some Sweat.
No Sweetness in a Cabbage twice boil'd, nor in a Tale twice told.
No Time was ever suitable in all Points.
No Tyrant can take from you your Knowledge and Wisdom.
No Vice but hath its Patron.
No Vice goes alone.
No Villain, like to the conscientious Villain.
No Viper so little, but hath its Venom.
No wonder if he break his Shins, that walks in the Dark.
Noble Plants suit not with a stubborn Soil.
None, but a wise Man, can employ Leisure well.
None but Cats and Dogs are allowed to quarrel in my House.
None but great Men can do Mischief.
None can be good too soon.
None can be wise and safe, but he that is honest.
None can pray well, but he that lives well.
None can think so well of others, as moll do of themselves.
None ever gives the Lie to him, that praiseth him.
None goes to the Gallows for giving ill Counsel.
None hastens to that Marker, where nothing is to be bought but Blows.
None is a Fool always; every one, sometimes.
None is so old, but he hopes for a year longer.
None is so Wise, but the Fool sometimes overtakes him.
None knows the Weight of another's Burthen.
None knows what will happen to him before Sun-set.
None so deaf, as he that will not hear.
None sows such a Grain, as will not sell.
Nothing, but what is ominous, to the Superstitious.
Nothing costs so much as what is given us.
Nothing dries sooner than a Woman's Tears.
Nothing is easy to the negligent.
Nothing is easy to the unwilling.
Nothing is easier than to deceive one's self.
Nothing is good but in its Season.
Nothing is good or bad, but by Comparison.
Nothing is fine, but what is sit.
Nothing is ill, that ends well.
Nothing is more easily blotted out, than a good Turn.
Nothing is more ordinary, than for Vice to correct Sin.
Nothing is ours, but Time.
Nothing is well said, or done, in a Passion.
Nothing more thankful than Pride, when comply'd with.
Nothing sharpens Sight like Envy.
Nothing Stake, nothing draw.
Nothing, that is violent, is permanent.
Nothing to be got without Pains, but Poverty.
Nothing venture, nothing have.
Nothing's impossible to a willing Mind.
Nothing's more playful than a young Cat, nor more grave than the old One.
Not Possession, but Use is the only Riches.
Not to go forward in the Way of Virtue, it to go backwards.
Not to have Hope, is the poorest of all Things.
Not to hear Conscience, is the Way to silence it.
Not to oversee Workmen, is to leave them your Purse open.
Not to repent of a Fault, is to justify it.
Not what is She, but what has She.
Not worthy to carry Guts after a Bear.
Now-a-days Truth is the greatest News.
Now I have got an Ewe and a Lamb, every one cries, Welcome Peter. 
Now it rains into the Sea.3692 Oaks may fall, when Reeds stand the Storm.
Obedience is much more seen in little Things, than in great.
Obscene Words must have a deaf Ear.
Of all Birds give me Mutton.
Of all Crafts to an honest Man, downright is the only Craft.
Of all tame Beasts, I hate a Slut.
Of Idleness never comes any good.
Of Soop and Love, the first is the best.
Offences generally outweigh Merits, with great Men.
Offenders never pardon.
Offer not the Pear to him that gave the Apple.
Oftentimes, to please Fools, wise Men err.
Old Age is not so fiery as Youth; but when once provoked, cannot be appeased.
Old Age, tho' despised, is coveted by all Men.
Old Bees yield no Honey.
Old Birds are not caught with Chaff.
Old Buildings may fall in a Moment.
Old Cats may lap as well as young Children.
Old Custom, without Truth, is but an old Errour.
Old Dogs bark not for Nothing.
Old Foxes want no Tutors.
Old Hosts give Entertainment to Sharks.
Old Maids lead Apes in Hell.
Old Men and Travellers may lie with Authority.
Old Men are soon angry.
Old Men are twice Children.
Old Men feel young Men's Knocks.
Old Men go to Death; but Death comes to young Men.
Old Men have one Foot in the Grave, and many young Men too.
Old Men remember such Things as they delighted in, when young.
Old Men, that dandle Madams, hug Death.
Old Men think themselves cunning.
Old Porridge is sooner warmed, than new made.
Old Reckonings make new Quarrels.
Old Sacks want much patching.
Old Sores are hardly cured.
Old Thanks pay not for a new Debt.
Old Vessels must leak.
Old Women's Gold is not ugly.
Once a Whore, and ever a Whore.
Once in ten Years, one Man hath ned another.
Once in Use, and ever after a Custom.
Once taken is better than twice given.
One Adversary may do us more Harm, than a great many Friends can do us Good.
One barking Dog, sets all the Street a barking.
One Barber shaves not so close; but another finds Work.
One beateth the Bush, and another catcheth the Bird.
One Bird in the Hand, is worth two in the Bush.
One Brother may help another.
One cannot live by selling Goods for Words.
One cannot take true Aim at Things too high.
One Cloud is enough to eclipse all the Sun.
One Crow will not peck out another Crow's Eyes.
One Danger is seldom overcome without another.
One Day of Pleasure is worth two of Sorrow.
One Devil is like another.
One Devil often drubs another.
One Eye of the Master's, sees more than ten of the Man's.
One Eye-witness is better than ten Hearsays.
One Favour qualifies for another.
One Gift well given, recovereth many Losses.
One good Head, is better than an hundred strong Hands.
One good Turn deserves another.
One Grain of Pepper, is worth a Cart-load of Hail.
One had better forgive a Debt, where he cannot recover so much as his Charges.
One Hair of a Woman draws more than a Team of Oxen.
One half of the World wonders how the other lives.
One Hand may wash the other, but both the Face.
One Hour's sleep before Midnight, is worth two after.
One Hour to Day, is worth two to Morrow.
One Jeer seldom goeth forth, but it bringeth back its Equal.
One is of Martin's Religion, another of Luther's. 
One Kindness is the Price of another.
One Leg of a Lark, is worth the whole Body of a Kite.
One Lie calls for many.
One mad Action is not enough to prove a Man mad.
One Man may better steal a Horse, than another look over the Hedge.
One may as much miss the Mark, by aiming too high, as too low.
One may as soon break his Neck as his East, at your House.
One may be confuted, and yet not convinc'd.
One may come soon enough to an ill Market.
One may discern an Ass shrowded in a Lion's Skin, without Spectacles.
One may hold one's Tongue in an ill Time.
One may know by his Nose, what Porridge he loves.
One may know your Meaning by your gaping.
One may live and learn.
One may point at a Star, but not pull at it.
One may say too much, even upon the best Subject.
One may see Day at a little Hole.
One may surfeit with too much, as well as starve with too little.
One may tell Lies, without Danger of the Law.
One may think, that dares not speak.
One may understand like an Angel, and yet be a Devil.
One Nail drives out another.
One never loses, by doing good Turns.
One of his Hands is unwilling to wash t'other for nothing.
One outward Civility is current Pay for another.
One pair of Heels is worth two pair of Hands.
One Pyrate gets nothing of another but his Cask
Ono Saddle is enough for one Horse.
One scabby Sheep is enough to insect the whole Flock.
One Shoulder of Mutton drives down another.
One Shrewd Turn asks another.
One Swallow makes no Summer.
One Suit of Law breeds twenty.
One Tale is good, till another is told.
One that's perfectly idle, is perfectly weary too; and knows not, what he would do or have.
One Thing thinketh the Horse, and another he that saddles him.
One Tongue is enough for two Women.
One Trick needs a great many more, to make it good.
One were as well be out of the World, as be belov'd by no Body in it.
One wicked Weed spoils a whole Mess of Porridge.
One Wood's enough to feed many Elephants.
One wrong Step may give you a great Fall.
One Year of Joy, another of Comfort; the rest of Content, make the married Life happy.
Only that, which is honestly got, is Gain.
Open not your Door, when the Devil knocks.
Openness has the Mischief, tho' not the Malice, of Treachery.
Opportunity makes the Thief.
Oral Sanctity is mental Impiety.
Other Men's Failings accuse us of Frailty.
Other Men's Ills are slightly regarded.
Overdoing, is doing Nothing to the Purpose.
Over Shoes, over Boots.
Over the greatest Beauty, hangs the greatest Ruin.
Our Ancestors grew not great by hawking and hunting.
Our Birth made us Mortal, our Death will make us Immortal.
Our common Friends are but Spies of our Actions.
Our common Conversation is but a Babble about nothing.
Our Desires may undo us.
Our Fellow's Share is always the best.
Our Flatterers are our most dangerous Enemies; and yet often lie in our Bosoms.
Our own Opinion is never wrong.
Our Pity is often misapplied; for none can tell, what another feels.
Our Pleasures are mostly imagin'd, but our Griefs real.
Our Spit is not yet at the Fire; and you are got a basting already.
Our Time is very short; but the Time of doing Good is much shorter.
Our Virtues would be proud, if our Vices whip'd them not.
Our whole Life is but a greater and longer Childhood.
Out, Nettle; in, Dock.
Out of Debt, out of Danger.
Out of God's Blessing, into the warm Sun.
Out of Sight; out of Mind.
Out of the Frying-pan into the Fire.3836 Pain is forgotten, when Gain comes.
Pain is more affecting than Pleasure.
Pain past is Pleasure.
Pains are the Wages of ill Pleasures.
Pale Anger is the Devil's Visage.
Parasites pitch up Toils, to catch Deer in a Platter.
Pardoning the Bad, is injuring the Good.
Parents are Patterns.
Parnassus has no Gold Mines in it.
Past Labour's pleasant.
Passion and Deliberation never set their Horses together.
Passion join'd with Power produceth Thunder and Ruin.
Passion maketh a Man a Beast; but Wine maketh him worse.
Passionate Men, like Fleet Hounds, are apt to over-run the Scent.
Passionate People lay up no Malice.
Pater-Noster built Churches, and Our Father pull'd them down.
Patience and Application will carry us through.
Patience and Pusillanimity are two Things.
Patience grows not in every Garden.
Patience is a Plaister for all Sores.
Patience is good for abundance of Things besides the Gout.
Patience is the best Buckles against Affronts.
Patience, Money, and Time, bring all Things to pass.
Patience provok'd turns to Fury.
Patience upon Force, is a Medicine for a Mad-Dog.
Paul's will not always stand.
Penitence and Innocence are near Relations.
Penny come quick, soon makes two Pence.
Penny in Pocket is a merry Companion.
Penny in Purse will make me drink, when all the Friends I have will not.
Penny-wise, and Pound-foolish.
Perfect Love never settled in a light Head.
Perhaps you'd have Cherries at Christmas.
Perhaps you may have such Broth sent you, as you will not like.
Peter is so godly, that God don't make him thrive.
Pheasants are Fools, if they invite the Hawk to Dinner.
Pick pockets are sore Traders; for they take ready Money.
Pidgeons are taken, when Crows fly at Pleasure.
Pigs love, that lie together.
Pigs play on the Organ at Hogs-Norton. 
Pity cureth Envy.
Pity it is, that no Vanity shou'd be pot into the Composition of Women-kind.
Plain Dealing is a Jewel; but they that wear it, are out of Fashion.
Plain Dealing is Dead; and dyed without Issue.
Plant the Crab-Tree where you will, it will never bear Pippins.
Plants too often removed will not thrive.
Play at small Games rather than stand out.
Play may be good, but Folly can never be of any Use.
Play, Women, and Wine, undoe Men laughing.
Pleasant Discourses make short Day and Night.
Pleasant Hours fly fast.
Pleasure tasteth well aster Service.
Pleasure, that comes too thick, grows fulsom.
Pluck not a Courtesy in the Bud, before it is ripe.
Point not at other's Spots with a foul Finger.
Policy may be virtuous, as well as vicious.
Poor Folks are glad of Porridge.
Poor Folks must fay, thank ye, for a little.
Poor Men may think well, but rich Men may both think well and do well.
Poor Men seek Meat for their Stomach; rich Men Stomach for their Meat.
Poor Men's Tables are soon spread.
Poor Men's Reasons are not heard.
Poor People are apt to think every Body flouts them.
Popular Opinion is the greatest Lie in the World.
Positive Men err most of any Men.
Positiveness is an Evidence of poor Judgment.
Possession is eleven Points in the Law.
Possibilities are infinite.
Poverty breaks Covenants.
Poverty is a Complication of Evils.
Poverty is an evil Counsellor.
Poverty is a Friend to Health.
Poverty is not a Shame; but the being asham'd of it, is.
Poverty is shamefully borne by a Sluggard.
Poverty is querulous.
Poverty makes Men ridiculous,
Poverty makes Men poor-spirited.
Poverty on an old Man's Back, is a heavy Burthen.
Poverty trieth Friends.
Pour not Water on a drowning Mouse.
Praise is always pleasant.
Praise is pleasing to him that thinks he deserves it.
Praise makes good Men better, and bad Men worse.
Praise not the Day before Night.
Praise not the Ford, till you are safe over.
Praise the Sea, but keep on Land.
Praise without Profit puts little into the Pot.
Praises are Admonitions well dressed out.
Praises from an Enemy imply real Merit.
Praises from wicked Men are Reproaches.
Prate is Prate; but its the Duck that lays the Egg.
Prayer should be the Key of the Day, and the Lock of the Night.
Precious Things are not found in Heaps.
Presumption first blinds a Man; and then sets him a running.
Prettiness is short-liv'd.
Prettiness makes no Pottage.
Prevention is much preferable to Cure.
Pride and Poverty are ill-met, yet often seen together.
Pride becomes not a rich Man, but is insupportable in a poor Man.
Pride feels no Frost.
Pride goes before; Shame, follows after.
Pride had rather go out of the Way, than go behind.
Pride increaseth oar Enemies, but putteth on Friends to Fright.
Pride, joined with many Virtues, choaks them all.
Pride in Prosperity turns to Misery in Adversity.
Pride is as loud a Beggar as Want; and a great deal more saucy.
Pride is scarce ever cur'd.
Pride is the most uneasy Thing in the World and the most odious.
Pride is the sworn Enemy to Content.
Pride is to be even in good Actions.
Pride loves no Man, and is belov'd of no Man.
Pride may lurk under a thread-bare Cloak.
Pride perceiving Humility honourable, often borrows her Cloak.
Pride scorns a Director, and Choler a Counsellor.
Pride scorns the Vulgar, yet lies at its Mercy.
Pride seldom leaves its Master without a Fall.
Pride will practice any Thing rather than let her Port decline.
Pride will spit in Pride's Face.
Proffer'd Service stinks.
Promised Relief is always welcome.
Promises engage more effectually than Presents.
Promises may get Friends, but 'tis Performance that keep them.
Prospect is often better than Possession.
Prosperity aid Vanity are often lodg'd together.
Prosperity often best discovers Vices, and Adsity Virtue.
Prosperity destroys Fools, and endangers the Wise.
Prosperity gets Followers; but Adversity distinguishes them.
Prosperity has damn'd more Souls, than all the Devils together.
Prosperity has every Thing cheap.
Prosperity knows not the worth of Patience.
Prosperity takes no Counsel, and fears no Calamity.
Prosperous Men seldom mend their Faults.
Proud Men can't bear with Pride in others.
Proud Peacocks; all Noise and Shew.
Providence directs the Dice.
Providence is better than Rent.
Providence is net purblind.
Providence seems to have forgot the Man, to whom it sends but sew Friends.
Prudence is not satisfied with May-be's.
Prudent Cruelty is better than foolish Pity.
Prudent Pauses forward Business.
Publick Reproof hardens Shame.
Pull down thy Hat on the Windy Side.
Purposing without performing is meer Fooling.
Put a Coward to his Mettle, and he'll fight the Devil.
Put a poor Man's Penny, and a rich Man's Penny into a Purse, and they'll come out alike.
Put another Man's Child into your Bosom, and he'll creep out at your Sleeves.
Put no Money in the Scale against Virtue.
Put not an embroider'd Crupper on an Ass.
Put off your Armour, and then shew your Courage.
Put your Finger into the Fire, and say, 'twas your ill Fortune.
Pylades and Orestes died long ago, and test no Successors.3988 Quarrelling Dogs come halting Home.
Quarrelling Dogs should be kick'd out of Doors.
Quarrels could not last long, were but Prudence on one Side.
Quartane Agues kill old Men, and cure young.
Quick and nimble; more like a Bear than a Squirrel.
Quick at Meat, quick at Work.
Quick Landlords make careful Tenants.
Quick Wits are generally conceited.
Quiet Persons are welcome every where.
Quiet Sleep feels no foul Weather.
Quite out of the Hooks.3999 Ragged Colts may make fine Horses.
Raise up no Spirits, that you cannot conjure down again.
Rash Presumption is a Ladder, which will break the Mounter's Neck.
Rashness is not Valour.
Rashness may conquer; but its not likely it should.
Raw Leather will stretch.
Reason, if we do not live by it, will serve to encrease our Shame and Guilt.
Reason is a firm Foundation to build upon.
Rebukes ought not to have a Grain of Salt more than of Sugar.
Regulate thy own Passions, and bear those of others.
Rejoice, Shrovetide, to-day; for to-morrow you'll be Ashes.
Rejoicing at Men's Misfortunes is, in a Degree, dancing at their Funerals.
Religion is the best Armour in the World, but the worst Cloak.
Religion without Piety hath done more Mischief in the World, than all other Things put together.
Remember the Reckoning.
Remember, thou art but a Man.
Remembring of old Injuries, invites new ones.
Remove an old Tree, and you'll kill it.
Repentance is not to be measured by Inches and Hours.
Repentance is the Whip for Fools.
Repent of a good Action, if you can.
Repetition is every where unacceptable, tho' 'twere in Homer. 
Reputation crackt, is a Venice-Glass broke.
Reputation depends less upon our selves thin upon Fortune.
Reputation is commonly measur'd by the Acre.
Reputation is often got without Merit, and loft without Crime.
Reputation serves to Virtue, as Light docs ts a Picture.
Reproof never docs a Wise Man any Harm.
Resty Horses must be roughly dealt with.
Retrench your Desires, instead of encreasing your Substance.
Revenge in cold Blood k the Devil's own Act and Deed.
Revenge is sharp-sighted.
Revenge never repairs an Injury.
Revenge, the longer it is delayed, the crueller it grows.
Reynard is still Reynard, tho' he put on a Cowl.
Rich Men, and fortunate Men, have need of much Prudence.
Rich Men feel Misfortunes, that fly over poor Men's Heads.
Rich Men have no Faults.
Rich Men have often the Hearts of poor Men.
Rich Men long to be richer.
Rich Men's Spots are cover'd with Money.
Riches abuse them, who know not how to use them.
Riches alone make no Men happy.
Riches are but the Baggage of Fortune.
Riches are gotten with Pain, kept with Care, and lost with Grief.
Riches have made more covetous Men, than Covetousness hath made rich Men.
Riches may at any Time be left, but sot Poverty.
Riches rule the Roast.
Riches serve a wise Man, but command a Fool.
Riches rather enlarge than satisfy Appetites.
Riches well got, and well used, are a great Blessing.
Ride softly, that you may get home the sooner.
Right Coral calls for no Colouring.
Right Mixture makes good Mortar.
Right reckoning makes long Friends.
Right, Roger; yow Sow's good Mutton.
Rigid Justice, is the greatest Injustice.
Rob Peter, to pay Paul. 
Rolling Stones gather no Moss.
Roman Virtue it was, that rais'd the Roman Glory.
Rome was not built in a Day.
Roses have their Prickles.
Roughness may turn ones Humour, but Flattery ones Stomach.4062 Sacrifice not thy Heart upon every altar.
Sadness and Gladness succeed each other.
Sail, quoth the King; hold, saith the Wind.
Salt spilt, is seldom clean taken up.
Sampson was a strong Man, yet could not pay Money before he had it.
Satires ran faster than Panegy ricks.
Save something for the Man, that rides on the white Horse.
Saving is getting.
Sauce for a Goose, is Sauce for a Gander.
Say not ill of the Year, till it be past.
Scabby Heads love not the Comb.
Scabby Parents will have scurfy Children.
Scald not thy Lips with another Man's Porridge.
Scalded Cats fear even cold Water.
Scandal will rub out like Dirt, when it is dry.
Scanderbeg's Sword must have Scanderbeg's Arm.
School-Distinctions are the Impressions of the Devil's cloven Foot.
Scepters and Suitors hate Competitors.
Scorners are an Abomination to a sober Man.
Scorning is catching.
Scratching is bad; because it begins with Pleasure, and ends with Pain.
Seamen are the nearest to Death, and the farthest from God.
Search not a Wound too deep, lest thou make a new one.
Search not for a good Man's Pedigree.
Secret Mines may take the Town, when open Battery cannot;
Seeing's Believing, but Feeling's the Truth.
Seek not to reform every one's Dial by your Watch.
Seek, till you find; and you'll not lose your Labour.
Seek your Salve, where you got your Sore.
Self do, self have.
Self-Exaltation is the Fool's Paradise.
Self-Love is a Mote in every Man's Eye.
Self-Preservation is Nature's first Law.
Sell not the Bear's Skin, before you have caught him.
Send a Fool to Market, and a Fool he'll return.
Send not for an Hatchet, to break open an Egg with.
Send not to Market for Trouble.
Send your noble Blood to Market, and see what it will buy.
Serpents engender in still Waters.
Servants should put on Patience, when they put on a Livery.
Servants will not be diligent, where the Master's negligent.
Serving one's own Passions is the greatest Slavery.
Set a Beggar on Horse-back, and he'll ride to the Devil.
Set a Stool in the Sun; when one Knave rises, another comes.
Set a Thief to catch a Thief.
Set but this Feather well to my Arrow, and he'll certainly moot the Mark.
Set hard Heart against hard Hap.
Set the Hare's Head against the Goose's Giblets.
Set not your Loaf in, till the Oven's hot.
Set not your House on Fire, to be reveng'd of the Moon.
Seven Hour's sleep will make a Clown forget his Design.
Seven may be Company, but nine are Confusion.
Shake a Leicestershire-Man by the Collar, and yon shall hear the Beans rattle in his Belly.
Shall the Goflins teach the Goose to swim?
Shallow Wits censure every Thing, that is beyond their Depth.
Share not Pears with your Master, either in Jest or in Earnest.
Sharp Stomachs make short Devotion.
She broke her Elbow on her Wedding-Day.
She can laugh and cry, both in a Wind.
She cannot leap an Inch from a Slut.
She goes, at if she crack'd Nuts with her Tail.
She had rather kiss than spin.
She has broke her Pipkin.
She has less Beauty than her Picture hath, and truly not much more Wit.
She hath a Gad-Bee in her Tail.
She hath a Tympany with two Heels.
She hath other Tow on her Distaff.
She is at common as a Barber's Chair.
She is as quiet as a Wasp in one's Ear.
She is like a Cat, she will play with her own Tail.
She is neither Maid, Wife nor Widow.
She is not so ugly as to fright one, nor so beautiful as to kill one.
She looks like a Cow T—d, stuck with Primroses.
She mines like a dry Cow T—d.
She simpers like a Frumenty-Kettle.
She spins a good Thread, that brings op her Daughter well.
She, that gazes much, spins not much.
She, that hath an ill Husband, shews it in her Dress.
She, that hath Spice enough, may season as she likes.
She, that is born a Beauty, is half married.
She, that is asham'd to eat at Table, eats in private.
She, that loseth her Modesty and Honesty, bath nothing else worth losing.
She, that marries ill, never wants something to say for it.
She was a neat Dame, that wash'd the Asse's Face.
She was so hungry, she could not stay for the Parson to say Grace.
She, who often looks in the Glass, thinks of her Tail.
She will as soon part with the Cook as the Porridge.
She will scold the Devil out of a haunted House.
She will stay at home perhaps, if her Leg be broke.
Shew me a Liar, and I'll shew you a Thief.
Shew me a Man without a Spot, and I'll shew you a Maid without a Fault.
Ships fear Fire more than Water.
Short and Sweet.
Short Pleasures, long Pains.
Short Reckonings are soon cleared.
Short Shooting loses the Game.
Sick of the Mulligrubs, with eating of chopp'd Hay.
Sickness is better than Sadness.
Sickness is felt, but Health not at all.
Sickness tells us what we are.
Sickness will spoil the Happiness of an Emperor, as well as mine.
Silent Men, like still Waters, are deep and dangerous.
Silence catches a Mouse.
Silence gives Consent.
Silence is a fine Jewel for a Woman; but it's little worn.
Silence is a good Receipt against such Faults, as may cause Offence.
Silence is not the greatest Vice of a Woman.
Silence is Wisdom, when speaking is Folly.
Silence seldom hurts.
Silks and Sattins put out the Kitchen-Fire.
Silly-Dogs are more angry with the Stone, than with the Hand that slung it.
Sim steals the Horse, and carries home the Bridle honestly.
Since he cannot be reveng'd on the Ass, he falls upon the Pack-Saddle.
Since you have been a correcting of me, I have told a hundred and twenty Holes in your Grater.
Since you wrong'd me, you never had a good Thought of me.
Singularity always seems to have a Spice of Arrogancy in it.
Sin is Sin, whether it be seen or no.
Sins and Debts are always more than we think them to be.
Sit firm in thy Place, and none can hurt them.
Sit still, rather than rise and fall down.
Skill is no Burthen.
Slander slings Stones at its self.
Slander leaves a Score behind.
Slanderers are the Devil's Bellows, to blow up Contention.
Sleeping all the Morning, makes it Night till Noon.
Sleeping Foxes have nothing falling into their Mouths.
Slow and sure, like Pedley's Mare.
Sluggards are never great Scholars.
Sluts are good enough to make a Sloven's Porridge.
Small Faults indulged are little Thieves, that let in greater.
Small Pitchers have wide Ears.
Small Rain lays a great Dust.
Small Wounds, if many, may be mortal.
So I be warm, let the People laugh.
So many Countries, so many Customs.
So many Men, so many Minds.
So much is mine as I enjoy, and give away for God's Sake.
So, now you act like your self; and no Body will trust you.
So the Miracle be wrought, what Matter if the Devil did it?
So your self be good, a Fig for your Grandfather.
Soft Fire makes sweet Malt.
Soft Words are hard Arguments.
Soft Words break no Bones.
Soft Words hurt not the Mouth.
Soldiers are Martyrs to Ambition.
Soldiers in Peace, are Chimneys in Summer.
Solitude dulls the Thought, too much Company dissipates it.
Solitude make us love our selves; conversation, others.
Some are Atheists only in fair Weather.
Some are very busy, and yet do nothing.
Some Fish, some Frogs.
Some had rather guess at much, than take Pains to hear a little.
Some have been thought brave, because they were afraid to run away.
Some injure all they fear, and hate all they injure.
Some Mens No is better receiv'd, than others Yea.
Some Save-alls do well in a House.
Some Stomachs nauseate even sweet Meats.
Some, that speak no ill of any, do no good to any
Some will lose rather their best Friend, than their worst Joke.
Some Wits can digest, before others can chew.
Some would play a Tune, before you can tune your Fiddle.
Something hath some Savour.
Sometimes it costs a great deal to do Mischief.
Sometimes its better to give your Apple, than eat it your self.
Sometimes you are like the Dog and Cat, and sometimes like the Monkey and his Clog.
Soon got, soon spent.
Soon hot, soon cold.
Soon ripe, soon rotten.
Sorrow comes unsent for.
Sorrow for a Husband, is like a Pain in the Elbow, sharp and short.
Sorrow is good for nothing but Sin.
Sour Grapes can ne'er make sweet Wine.
Sow good Works, and thou shalt reap Gladness.
Sow Wheat in Dirt, and Rye in Dust.
Spaniels, that fawn when beaten, will never forsake their Masters.
Spare at the Brim, not at the Bottom.
Spare the Rod, and spoil the Child.
Spare to speak, spare to speed.
Spare your Breath, to cool your Broth.
Spare your Rhetoric, and speak Logic.
Sparrows sight for Corn, which is none of their own.
Speak the Truth, and shame the Devil.
Speak, when you are spoke to; come, when you are called.
Spears are not made of Bulrushes.
Speedy Execution is the Mother of good Fortune.
Spend, and be free; but make no Waste.
Spiders, that kill a Man, cure an Ape.
Spilt Wine is worse than Water.
Spin not too fine a Thread, lest it break in weaving up.
Spit in your Hand, and take faster hold.
Spit not against Heaven; 'twill fall back into thy own Face.
Spur not a free Horse to Death.
Stake not thy Head against another's Hat.
Stale Colewort in a fresh Dish.
Standers-by see more than the Gamesters.
Standing Pools gather Filth.
Stars are not seen by Sun-shine.
Stay till you have Sheep, before you shear them.
Step aster Step, the Ladder is ascended.
Steer not after every Mariners Direction.
Still he fisheth, that catcheth one.
Stop a little, to make an End the sooner.
Strait Trees have crooked Roots.
Strength of Body is none of the Virtues.
Strike, while the Iron is hot.
Striking, and not making it felt, is Anger lost.
Strive not against the Stream.
Study Sickness, while you are well.
Stumble at a Straw, and leap over a Block.
Stumbling often, is a Sign of falling quite.
Subtilty set up a Trap, and catch'd it self.
Success is never blamed.
Such a Beginning, such an Ending.
Such a Father, such a Son.
Such a Pot must have such a Lid.
Such a Reason pissed my Goose.
Such a Welcome, such a Farewel.
Such as the Priest, such is the Clark.
Such as the Tree, such is the Fruit.
Sudden Friendship, sure Repentance.
Sudden Glory soon goes out.
Sudden Joy kills sooner than excessive Grief.
Sudden Passions are hard to be manag'd.
Sue a Beggar, and catch a Louse.
Suffering for a Friend, doubleth the Friendship.
Superstition renders a Man a Fool, and Scepticism makes him mad.
Supine Facility, and good Nature are vastly different.
Sure, he's a Lawyer; for he makes Indentures, as he goes.
Surely, she wears low-heel'd Shoes; she's apt to fall backwards.
Sure, that's a Butcher's Horse; he carries a Calf so well.
Surgeons cut, that they may cure.
Surgeons must have an Eagle's Eye, a Lion's Heart, and a Lady's Hand.
Surgeons ought not to be full of Sores themselves.
Suspicion may be no Fault, but shewing it may be a great one.
Sweep before your own Door.
Sweet-Heart, and Honey-Bird, keeps no House.
Sweet Meats must have sour Sauce.
Swine, Bees, and Women cannot be turned.
Sympathy of Manners maketh Conjunction of Minds.4301 Tailors and Writers must mind the Fashion.
Tailors Shreds are worth cutting.
Take all, and pay the Baker.
Take an Hair of the same Dog that bit you.
Take away Fuel, and you take away Fire.
Take away my good Name, and take away my Life.
Take Courage; younger than thou have been hanged.
Take Heart of Grace; younger thou shalt never be.
Take Heed you find not what you do not seek.
Take hold of a good Minute.
Take me upon your Back, and you'll know what I weigh.
Take not a Musket to kill a Butterfly.
Take Time, while Time is; for Time will away.
Take your venture, as many a good Ship hath done.
Tale-Bearers are commonly a Sort of half-witted Men.
Tales of Robin Hood are good enough for Fools.
Talking pays no Toll.
Talk much, and err much.
Talk of Camps, but stay at Home.
Tarry-long brings little Home.
Teach your Grannum to spin.
Teach your Grannum to suck Eggs.
Teaching of others, teacheth the Teacher.
Tell a Lie, and find out the Truth.
Tell a Tale to a Mare, and she'll let a Fart.
Tell a Woman, she's a Beauty; and the Devil will tell her so ten Times.
Tell me, it snows.
Tell Money after your own Mother.
Tell it well, or say nothing.
Temperance, Employment, and a chearful Spirit, are the great Preservers of Health.
Temporizing is sometimes great Wisdom.
Tenterden-Steeple was the Cause of Goodwin's Sands.
That Anger is not warrantable, that has seen two Suns.
That Bolt never came out of your Quiver.
That Cake came out of my Oven.
That City cannot prosper, where an Ox is sold for less than a Fish.
That Dirt made this Dust.
That Dog barks more out of Custom, than Care of the House.
That falls out sometimes in a Day, which never fell out before.
That Fire, that doth not warm me, I'll never permit to scorch me.
That Fire, which lighteth us at a Distance, will burn us when near.
That Fish will soon be caught, that nibbles at every Bait.
That Girdle will not gird me.
That Grief is light, which is capable of Counsel.
That Groat is ill saved, that shames the Master.
That Hour is coming, when we shall more earnestly wish to gain Time, than ever we studied to spend it.
That is a prodigious Plaister for so small a Sore.
That is a weak Staff to trust to.
That is a woeful silly Sheep, that goes to the Wolf to confess.
That is as likely as to see an Hog fly.
That is as true as that the Cat crew, and the Cock rock'd the Cradle.
That is but an empty Purse, that is full of other Folks Money.
That is but a slippery Happiness, that Fortune can give, and Fortune can take away.
That is good Sport, that fills the Belly.
That is no easy Pill to be swallowed.
That is not ours, that is got by unlawful Means.
That is not thine, which Fortune made thine.
That is the Bird, that I would catch.
That is the Bitterness of a Gift, that it deprives us of our Liberty.
That is the old Tune upon the Bag-Pipe.
That is the Way to Beggar's Bush.
That is the upper End, where the chief Person sits.
That is true, which all Men say.
That is well spoken, which is well taken.
That Man is well bought, who costs but a Salutation.
That Man sins charitably, who damns none but himself.
That Mischief comes justly, that is of your own seeking.
That Patient is not like to recover, who makes the Doctor his Heir.
That Penny's well spent, that saves a Groat.
That Rabbit's mad, that makes a League with the Ferrit.
That sick Man is not to be pitied, who hath his Cure in his Sleeve.
That fort of Tympany, which requires nine Months for Cure.
That Trial is not fair, where Affection is Judge.
That War only is just, which is necessary.
That was new, in last Year's new Almanack.
That, which hath its Value from Fancy, is not very valuable.
That, which a Man causes to be done, he does himself.
That, which is bred in the Bone, will never be out of the Flesh.
That, which is easily done, is soon believed.
That which is one Man's Meat, is another Man's Poison.
That, which is well done, is twice done.
That, which makes wise Men modest, makes Fools unmannerly.
That, which may fall out at any Time, may fall out to Day.
That, which proves too much, proves nothing.
That, which was bitter to endure, may be sweet to remember.
That, which we may live without, we need not much covet.
That, which will not be Butter, must be made into Cheese.
That, which will not make a Pot, may make a Pot-lid.
That, which you sow, you must reap.
The absent Party is still faulty.
The absurdest Tongue that is, can disparage.
The absurd Vulgar tastes all Things by the Bar.
The Abuse of Riches is worse than the Want of them.
The Amity, which Wisdom uniteth not, Folly will untie.
The Anvil fears no Blows.
The Ape hugs her Darling, till she kills it.
The Applause of the People, is a Blast of Air.
The Army, that comes off best, loses some.
The Ass brays, when he pleases.
The Ass, that carrieth Wine, drinketh Water.
The Axe goes to that Wood, where it borrow'd its Helve.
The Back door robbeth the House.
The Bait hides the Hook.
The Balance will decide the Matter.
The Bee, from her Industry in the Summer, eats Honey all the Winter.
The Belief and Hope of Heaven, is a sufficient Encouragement to Virtue, when all others fail.
The Belly hates a long Sermon.
The Belly hath ho Ears.
The Belly that's full may well fast.
The best Cart may overthrow.
The best Cloth may have a Moth in it.
The best Fish swim deep.
The best is at the Bottom.
The best is the best cheap.
The best Metal is Iron, the best Vegetable, Wheat; but the worst Animal, is Man.
The best Metals lose their Lustre, unless brightned by Use.
The best Patch is off the same Cloth.
The best Remedy of Afflictions, is submitting to Providence.
The best Surgeon is he, that has been well hack'd himself.
The best Things are hard to come by.
The best Way to see Divine Light, is to put-out thy own Candle.
The better Day, the better Deed.
The better-natur'd, the sooner undone.
The better Workman, the worse Husband.
The biggest Horses are not the best Travellers.
The Bitch that I mean, is not a Dog.
The black Ox never yet trod upon your Feet.
The blind eat many a Fly.
The Body is the Workhouse of the Soul.
The Boughs that bear most, hang lowest.
The Brains don't lie in the Beard.
The Brains of a Fox will be of little Service, if you play with the Paw of a Lion.
The Breast-Plate of Innocence is not always Scandal-Proof.
The brightest of all Things, the Sun, hath its Spots.
The Brother had rather see his Sister rich, than make her so.
The burnt Child dreads the Fire.
The busy Brain, that sows not Corn, sows Thistles.
The Butcher look'd for his Knife, when he had it in his Mouth.
The Camel going to get Horns, lost his Ears.
The Cart before the Horse.
The Cat invites the Mouse to a Feast.
The Cat knows whose Lips she licks.
The Cat sees not every Mouse.
The Chamber of Sickness is the Chapel of Devotion.
The Chapel is not so little, but the Priest may say Service in it.
The cheap Buyer takes bad Meat.
The Chickens are the Country's, but the City eats them.
The chief End of Man, is not to get Money.
The Child faith nothing but what he heard at the Fire-side.
The Church is out of Temper, when Charity waxeth cold and Zeal hot.
The Clock goes, as it pleaseth the Clark.
The Coin, that is most current among us, is Flattery.
The Collier and his Money are both black.
The Comforter's Head never akes.
The Commandments have made as many good Martyrs as the Creed.
The common Hackney-Horse is the worst shod.
The Company-Keeper has almost as many Snares as Companions.
The Complaints of the present Times, is the general Complaint of all Times.
The Conquer'd is never call'd Wise, nor the Conqueror Rash.
The Crane suckled the Ass.
The Credit that is got by a Lie, lasts no longer, than till the Truth comes out.
The Cross on the Breast, and the Devil in the Heart.
The Crow thinks her own Bird fairest.
The Crutch of Time does more than the Club of Hercules. 
The Cuckold was very cunning, but he was cunninger that cuckol'd him.
The Day of our Birth is one Day's advance towards our Death.
The Day that a Man knows he commits a Sin, he condemns himself.
The Day that you do a good Thing, there will be seven new Moons.
The Dead, and only they, should do nothing.
The Dead are got quite away from Fortune.
The Dead are past feeling.
The dearer it is, the cheaper it is to me; for I shall buy the less.
The Death of your first Wife made such an Impression in your Heart, that all the rest fly through.
The Death of Youth is a Shipwreck.
The Devil doth not lie dead in a Ditch.
The Devil gets up to the Belfry, by the Vicar's Skirts.
The Devil hath owed me a Cake of a long Time, and now hath paid me a Loaf.
The Devil himself is good, when he is pleased.
The Devil is a busy Bishop, in his own Diocese.
The Devil is always a buying our Souls of us.
The Devil is never nearer, than when we are talking of him.
The Devil is not always at one Door.
The Devil is the perfectest Courtier.
The Devil lies brooding in the Miser's Chest.
The Devil rebukes Sin.
The Devil's behind the Cross.
The Devil's Flour is half Bran.
The discreet Hand doth not do all that the Tongue says.
The Disobedience of the Patient makes the Physician seem cruel.
The Drunkard continually assaults his own Life.
The Dust, raised by the Sheep, does not choak the Wolf.
The early Sower never borrows of the Late.
The Earth produces all Things, and receives all again.
The earthen Pot must keep clear of the brass Kettle.
The Ebb will fetch off, what the Tide brings
The End all equal.
The End of Fishing is not angling, but catching.
The End of Passion is the Beginning of Repentance.
The Entreaty of a great Man, is putting of a Force upon us.
The Envious hurts others something, but himself very much.
The envious Man's Face grows, sharp, and hit Eyes big.
The Epicure puts his Purse into his Belly; and the Miser his Belly into his Purse.
The eternal Talker neither hears nor learns.
The Evening crowns the Day.
The Evil that cometh out of thy Mouth, flyeth into thy Bosom.
The Eye is the Pearl of the Face.
The Eye, that sees all Things else, sees not its self.
The Eyes, the Ears, the Tongue, the Hands, the Feet, they all fast in their Way.
The Exposition is better than the Text.
The Face should give Leave to the Tongue to speak.
The Failings of other Men accuse us of Frailty.
The fairer the Hostess, the fouler the Reckoning.
The fairer the Paper, the fouler the Blot.
The fairest-looking Shoe may pinch the Foot.
The fairest Rose at last is wither'd.
The fairest Silk is the soonest stained.
The Family of the publick-spirited Men is always extinct.
The Father sighs more at the Death of one Son, than he smiles at the Birth of many.
The Fault of the Ass must not be laid on the Pack-Saddle.
The Favour of great Men, and Praise of the World, are net much to be relied on.
The File grates other Things; bur rub its self out too.
The Fly, that playeth too long in the Candle, singeth her Wings at last.
The Fire that burneth, taketh out the Heat of a Burn.
The first Breath is the Beginning of Death.
The first Chapter of Fools, is to esteem them selves Wise.
The first Cut, and all the Loaf besides.
The First Dish pleaseth all.
The first Faults are theirs that commit them; the second theirs that permit them.
The first Men in the World, were a Gardener, a Ploughman, a Grasier.
The first Pig, but the last Whelp of the Litter, is best.
The first Step to a good Name is a good Life; and the next is good Behaviour.
The first Step to Virtue, is to love Virtue in another Man.
The first Step towards Virtue, is to abstain from Vice.
The Fish by struggling in the Net, hampers its self the more.
The Fish may be caught in a Net, that will not come to a Hook.
The Fork is commonly the Rake's Heir.
The Fool is busy in every one's Business but his own.
The Fool runs away, while his House is burning down.
The Fool faith, who would have thought it?
The Fool wanders, the wise Man travels.
The Foot on the Cradle, the Hands on the Distaff.
The Fowler's Pipe sounds sweet, till the Bird is caught.
The Fox fares best, when he is most cursed.
The Fox knows much, but more he that catcheth him.
The Fox may grow grey, but never-good.
The Fox praiseth the Meat out of the Crow's Mouth.
The Fox's Wiles will never enter into the Lion's Head.
The Friar preached against Theft, when he had a Goose in his Sleeve.
The Frog sings; and yet she has neither Hair nor Wool to cover her.
The Frost hurts not Weeds.
The Frying-pan said to the Kettle, avant black Brows.
The further you run, the further you are behind.
The furthest Way about, is the nearest Way home.
The Gallows groans for you.
The generous Man pays for nothing so much as what is given him.
The golden Age never was the present-Age.
The Good are joyful in the midst of Poverty; but the Wicked are sad in great Riches.
The good Man of the House is the last that knows what's done at Home.
The Good you do is not lost, tho' you forget it.
The Gown's hers that wears it; and the World his that enjoys it.
The Grand-Mother's Correction makes no Impression.
The grey Mare is the better Horse.
The Grave is the general Meeting Place.
The Great and the Little have need of one another.
The great Thieves punish the little ones.
The greater the Man, the greater the Crime.
The greatest Barkers are not the greatest Biters.
The greatest Business of Life is to prepare for Death.
The greatest Calf is not the sweetest Veal.
The greatest Clerks are not the wisest Men.
The greatest Expence we can be at, is that of our Time.
The greatest Favourites are in the most Danger of Falling.
The greatest Hate springs from the greatest Love.
The greatest Learning is to be seen in the greatest Plainness.
The greatest Mischief you Can do the Envious is to do well.
The greatest Oaks have been little Acorns.
The greatest Packs are not always the richest.
The greatest Sounds are not the best Musick.
The greatest Things are done by the Help of small ones.
The greatest Vessel hath but its Measure.
The greatest Wealth is Contentment with a little.
The Ground of true Sorrow for Sin, is the Love of God.
The Groundsel speaketh but what it heard of the Hinges.
The guilty Man fears the Law; the innocent Man, Fortune.
The Guts uphold the Heart, and not the Heart the Guts.
The Hare starts, when a Man least expects it.
The Head gray, and no Brains yet.
The Heathen's Fortune is the Christian's Providence.
The Heathens, when they died, went to Bed without a Candle.
The Hermit thinks, the Sun shines no where but in his Cell.
The higher an Ape mounts, the more he shews his Breech.
The higher a proud Man is rais'd, the giddier he is.
The higher the Hill, the lower the Grass.
The higher, the lower; and the more advanc'd, the more humble.
The highest Spoke in Fortune's Wheel may soon turn lowest.
The Highway is never about.
The hindermost Dog catcheth the Hare.
The Hog is got into the Honey-Pot.
The Hog never looks up to him, that threshes down the Acorns.
The Holidays of Joy, are the Vigils of Sorrow.
The Horse next the Mill carries all the Grist.
The Horse, that draws his Halter, is not quite escaped.
The hungry Belly thinks the Throat cut.
The Hypocrite hurts himself; the Libertine, the whole Society.
The idle Mill earns nothing.
The Jewel is not to be valued for the Cabinet.
The Informer is the worst Rogue of the two.
The Joy of Jerusalem depends upon the Peace of Zion. 
The Isle of Wight hath no Monks, Lawyers or Foxes.
The Judge is condemn'd, when the Criminal is absolv'd.
The Kick of the Dam hurts not the Colt.
The Kid, that keeps above, is in no danger of the Wolf.
The King can make a Serjeant, but not a Lawyer.
The King may bestow Offices; but can't bestow Wit to manage them.
The King may give the Honour, but thou art to make thy self honourable.
The King of good-Fellows is appointed for the Queen of Beggars.
The King's Cheese goes half away in Pareings.
The King's Favour is no Inheritance.
The lame Tongue gets nothing.
The lame Post brings the truest News.
The Lapwing cries most, when furthest from her Nest.
The last Benefit is most remembred.
The last Evil smarts most.
The last Suitor wins the Maid.
The last Taste of Things gives them the Name of sweet or sour.
The Laundress washeth her own Smock first.
The lazy Servant, to save one Step, goes eight.
The least and weakest Man can do some Hurt.
The least Boy carries the biggest Fiddle.
The less Wit a Man has, the less he knows that he wants it.
The lesser the Temptation, the greater the Sin.
The little Wimble will let in the great Auger.
The longest Day must have an End.
The longest Life is but a Parcel of Moments.
The Loquacity of Fools, is a Lecture to the Wise.
The Love of the Wicked is more dangerous than their Hatred.
The low Stakes stand long.
The lower Mill-stone grinds as much as the upper one.
The Lute is in the Hand of him, that knows how to play on it.
The Luxurious want many Things, the Covetous all Things.
The Liar is sooner caught than the Cripple.
The Lion's not half so fierce as he is painted.
The Lion's Skin is never cheap.
The mad Dog bites his Master.
The maintaining of one Vice, costeth more than ten Virtues.
The Man in the Moon drinks Claret.
The Master's Eye makes the Horse fat.
The Meekness of Moses is better than the Strength of Sampson. 
The Memory of a Benefit soon vanisheth; but the Remembrance of an Injury sticketh fast in the Heart.
The Memory of Happiness makes Miserywoeful.
The Mill cannot grind with the Water that is past.
The Mind is the Man.
The Mob has many Heads, but no Brains.
The Moon is a Moon still, whether it shine or not.
The Moon is made of green Cheese.
The more Acquaintance, the more Danger.
The more Cooks, the worse Broth.
The more Danger, the more Honour.
The more Friends, the more Danger.
The more Haste, the worse Speed.
The more Haste we make in a wrong Way, the further we are from our Journey's End.
The more Knave, the better Fortune.
The more Laws, the more Offenders.
The more Light a Torch gives, the less while it lasts.
The more Moors, the greater the Victory.
The more Riches a Fool hath, the greater Fool he is.
The more, the merrier; the fewer, the better Cheer.
The more Wit, the less Courage.
The more Women look into their Glass, the less they look into their Hearts.
The more you stir, the more you stink.
The most exquisite Folly is made of Wisdom too fine spun.
The most lamentable Spectacle in the World, is a dead Man.
The most lasting Monuments are doubtless the Paper-Monuments.
The most Penitent Anchorite has now and then a small Flight of Vanity.
The Mother in Law remembers not, that she was a Daughter in Law.
The Mother knows best, whether the Child be like the Father.
The Motions of Passion, and of Conscience, are two Things.
The Mountains have brought forth a Mouse.
The Mouse, that hath but one Hole, is easily caught.
The Multitude of Offenders is their Protection.
The Muses love the Morning.
The Nature of Things will not be alter'd by our Fancies of them.
The nearer the Church, the further from God.
The noblest Remedy of Injuries is Oblivion.
The noisy Drum hath nothing in it, but meer Air.
The noisy Fowler catches no Birds.
The number of the Malefactors, authorizes not the Crime.
The Nurse it valued, till the Child has done sucking.
The old Horse must die in somebody's keeping.
The old Man's Staff is the Rapper at Death's Door.
The old Withie-Tree would have a new Gate hung at it.
The old Woman would never have look'd for her Daughter in the Oven, had she not been there her self.
The older a Fool is, the worse he is.
The only Way to be sure of not losing a Child, is never to have any.
The only Way to know and to serve God, is to be like him.
The Orange, that is too hard squeez'd, yields a bitter Juice.
The Owl is not accounted the wiser, for living retiredly.
The Owl thinks all her young ones Beauties.
The Ox, when he is weary, treads surest.
The Paleness of the Pilot is a sign of a Storm.
The Parings of a Pippin are better than a whole Crab.
The Passions are like Fire and Water; good Servants, but bad Masters.
The Patient hath more need of the Physician, than the Physician of the Patient.
The People will worship even a Calf, if it be a Golden one.
The Pine wishes her self a Shrub, when the Axe is at her Root.
The Pitcher, that goes often to the Well, comes home broken at last.
The Pleasures of the Rich are bought with the Tears of the Poor.
The Pleasure of this World consists in having Necessaries, not Superfluities.
The Pleasure of what we enjoy, is lost by coveting more.
The Plow goes not well, if the Plowman hold it not.
The Poet, of all forts of Artificers, is the fondest of his Works.
The Poor keep a continual Fast.
The poor Man has his Corn destroyed by Hail every Year.
The poor Man turns his Cake, and another comes and eats it.
The poor Man's Penny unjustly detain'd, is a Coal of Fire in a rich Man's Purse.
The poor Man's Shilling is but a Penny.
The poorest Meat requires some Dress.
The present Fashion is always handsome.
The Prick of a Pin is enough to make an Empire insipid for a Time.
The Priest forgets he was a Clark.
The Prodigal robs his Heir, the Miser himself.
The Proof of a Pudding is in the eating.
The Proof of Obedience is found in small Matters more than in great.
The proudest Vice is asham'd to wear its own Face long.
The purest Gold is most ductile.
The Purse-strings are the most common Ties of Friendship.
The Race is got by running.
The Raven said to the Rook; stand away, black-Coat.
The Revenge of an Idiot is without Mercy.
The Reward of Love, is Jealousy.
The Rich are Trustees under God for the Poor.
The Rich follow Wealth; and the Poor the Rich.
The Rich need not beg a Welcome.
The-Rich never want for Kindred
The rich poor Man is emphatically poor.
The rich Widow cries with one Eye, and laughs with the other.
The Righteous find Peace, when the Wicked feel Torment.
The Road is not bad, if I get home well.
The Sea complains for Want of Water.
The Sea refuses no River.
The second Blow makes the Fray.
The second Vice is Lying, the first being that of owing Money.
The Selvidge sheweth the Cloth.
The Shirt is nearer than the Coat.
The Sign invites you in; but your Money must redeem you out.
The Singing-Man keeps his Shop in his Throat.
The slothful Man is the Beggar's Brother.
The Sluggard makes his Night till Noon.
The Sluggard's convenient Season never comes.
The small Cart creaks, as the heavy Wain should do.
The smaller the Drink, the cooler the Blood, and the clearer the Head.
The Smallness of the Kitchen makes the House the bigger.
The Smith hath always a Spark in his Throat.
The Smoak follows the Fair.
The Smoak of one's own House is better than the Fire at another's.
The Snail slides up the Tower at last, tho' the Swallow mounteth it sooner.
The Society of Ladies is a School of Politeness.
The Sole holdeth with the upper Leather.
The sooty Oven mocks the black Chimney.
The Soul is not where it lives, but where it loves.
The Soul of a cholerick Man sits ever by the Fire side.
The Soul payeth soundly for House-room in the Body. 
The Spaniel, that fawneth when he is beaten, will never forsake his Master.
The Sparrow builds in the Martin's Nest.
The Spider lost her Distaff, and is ever since forc'd to draw her Thread thro' her Tail.
The still Sow eats up all the Draft.
The stillest Humours are always the worst.
The Sting of a Reproach is the Troth of it.
The Stone, that lieth not in your Way, need not offend you.
The Stream can never rise above the Spring-head.
The Study of vain Things is laborious Idleness.
The Subject's Love is the King's best Guard.
The Sun can be seen by nothing but its own Light.
The Sun has stood still, but Time never did.
The Sun is never the worse for shining on a Dunghill.
The Sun is still beautiful, tho' ready to set.
The Sun may do its Duty, tho' your Grapes are not ripe.
The Swan sings, when Death comes.
The Sweat of Adam's Brow hath stream'd down ours ever since.
The sweetest Wine makes the sharpest Vinegar.
The Table is a great Robber.
The Tale runs, as it pleases the Teller.
The Taste of the Kitchen is better than the Smell.
The Tatler's Tongue is ever dancing a silly Jig.
The Taylor that makes not a Knot, loseth a Stitch.
The Tears of a Whore, and the Oaths of a Bully, may be put in the same Bottle.
The Thief is sorry he is to be hanged, but not that he is a Thief.
The Thief's Wife laugheth not always.
The Thought has good Wings, and the Quill a good Tongue.
The Thread leads to the Bottom.
The Thrush avoiding the Trap, fell into Bird-lime.
The Thunder hath but its Clap.
The Time to come, is no more ours than the Time past.
The Tongue breaketh the Bone, tho' it hath none it self.
The Tongue is ever turning to the aching Tooth.
The Tongue is not Steel, yet it cuts sorely.
The Tongue is the Rudder of our Ship.
The Tongue of a Fool carves a Piece of his Heart, to all that sit near him.
The Tongue of idle Persons, is never idle.
The Tongue talks at the Head's Cost.
The Touch stone distinguishes between Gold and Brass.
The Town-Bull is as much a Batchelor as he.
The Tree is no sooner down, but every one runs for his Hatchet.
The true Gentleman is God's Servant, the World's Master, and his own Man.
The two principal Things, are Wisdom and Health.
The Venom of a viperous Tongue may be converted into Treacle.
The very best Men stand in need of Pardon.
The very falling of Leaves frights Hares.
The Vicar of Bray will be Vicar of Bray still.
The unfortunate are counted Fools.
The Voice of an Ass will never reach Heaven.
The usefullest Truths arc the plainest.
The usual Trade and Commerce, is cheating all round by Consent.
The Usurer and Younkier, are Cat and Mouse.
The Vulgar will keep no Account of your Hits, but of your Misses.
The Water that comes from the same Spring, cannot be fresh and salt both.
The Way to avoid great Faults, is to beware of less.
The Way to Babylon, will never bring you to Jerusalem. 
The Way to be safe, is never to be secure.
The Way to live much, is to begin to live well betimes.
The weakest and most timorous, are the most revengeful and implacable.
The weakest go to the Wall.
The Wearer only knows where the Shoe hurts him.
The whole Ocean is made up of single Drops.
The Wicked grow worse, and the good Men better for Trouble.
The wicked Heart never fears God, but when it thunders.
The Wife is the Key of the House.
The Wind blows not always West.
The Wind is not in your Debt, tho' it fills not your Sail.
The Wind keeps not always in one Quarter.
The Wind that blows out Candles, kindles the Fire.
The wise Man draws more Advantage from his Enemies, than a Fool from his Friends.
The wise Man, even when he holds his Tongue, says more than the Fool, when he speaks.
The wise Man is born to rule the Fool.
The Wit of you, and the Wool of a blue Dog, would make a very good Medley.
The Wolf and Fox are both Privateers.
The Wolf doth something every Week, that hinders him from going to Church a Sunday.
The Wolf never wants for a Pretence against a Lamb.
The Wooing was a Day after the Wedding.
The World is a Ladder for some to go up, and some down.
The World is a Net, the more we stir in it, the more we are entangled.
The World is so much Knave, that it holds Honesty to be a Vice and a Folly.
The World is too narrow for two Fools a Quarrelling.
The World's busy Man, is the grand Impertinent.
The World would perish, were all Men learned.
The worse Luck now, the better another Time.
The worse the Passage, the more welcome the Port.
The worst of Men are those, who will not forgive.
The worst Part of Poverty, is to bear it impatiently.
The worst Spoke in a Cart breaks first.
The Wound that bleedeth inwardly, is most dangerous.
The Wrath of Brothers, is fierce and devilish.
There are as well serious Follies, as light ones.
There are many rare Abilities in the World, which Fortune never brings to Light.
There are more Lords in the World, than fine Gentlemen.
There are more natural Buffoons, than artificial.
There are more old Drunkards, than old Physicians.
There are more Maids than Moggy, and more Men than Jockey. 
There are more threatned than struck.
There are more Ways to the Wood than one.
There are more Ways to kill a Dog than hanging.
There are no Birds this Year, in last Year's Nest.
There are no Coxcombs so troublesome, as those that have some Wit.
There can be no Friendship, where there can be no Freedom.
There belongs more than whistling to a Plowman.
There cannot be a more intolerable Thing than a fortunate Fool.
There could be no great ones, if there were no little ones.
There goes the Wedge, where the Beetle drives it.
There I caught a Knave in a Purse-Net.
There is abundance of Money spent, to be laughed at.
There is a Bone for you to pick.
There is a critical Minute for all Things.
There is a deal of Difference between Love and Gratefulness.
There is a different Fame goes about of every Man.
There is a Fault in the House, but would you have it built without any?
There is a Knack of shewing we understand the Matter, when we hold our Peace.
There is a Medium betwixt all Fool, and all Philosopher.
There is a Remedy for every Thing, could we but hit upon it.
There is a scarcity of Friendship, but not of Friends.
There is a Rowland for your Oliver.
There is a Snake in the Grass.
There is a sort of Pleasure in indulging of Grief.
There is something in it, quoth the Fellow, when he drunk Dish-clout and all.
There is a Time to wink, as well as to see.
There is a Witness every where.
There is as much Greatness in owning a good Turn, as in the doing of it.
There is as much hold of his Words, as of a wet Eel's Tail.
There is but bad Choice, where the whole Stock is bad.
There is Chance in a Cock's Spur.
There is no Companion like the Penny.
There is Craft in Daubing.
There is Difference between living long, and suffering long.
There is Falshood in Fellowship.
There is God's Poor, and the Devil's Poor; the first from Providence, the other from Vice.
There is Life in a Muscle.
There is little due to Pleasure, but much to Health.
There is many a good Wife, that can't sing and dance well.
There is more Money got by ill Means, than by good Acts.
There is more Pleasure in loving, than in being belov'd.
There is much more Learning than Knowledge in the World.
There is no adding to Fundamentals.
There is no Art that can make a Fool wise.
There is no Banquet, but some dislike something in it.
There is no better Looking-Glass than an old Friend.
There is no Condition but what sits well upon a Wise Man.
There is no Difference of Bloods in a Bason.
There is no disputing of Tastes, Appetites and Fancies.
There is no Fence against a Panick Fright.
There is no going to Heaven in a Sedan.
There is no Grace in a Benefit, that sticks to the Fingers.
There is no Man so bad, but has a secret Respect for the good.
There is no more Hold of a new Friend, than of a new Fashion.
There is no need of a Ferret to catch an Harlot.
There is no Piety in keeping an unjust Promise.
There is no Plea for the Willful.
There is no Pot so ugly, that a Cover cannot be found for it.
There is no relying on a starry Sky.
There is no Remedy for all Evils but Death.
There is no Reputation so clear, but a Slanderer may stain it.
There is no short Cut of a Way, without some ill Way.
There is no such Flatterer, as a Man's self.
There is no sufficient Recompence, for an unjust Slander.
There is no true Holiness, without Humility.
There is no usual Rule without an Exception.
There is no Woe like to Want.
There is no Wool so white, but a Dyer can make it black.
There is none deceiv'd, but he that trusteth.
There is none so simple, but can give Counsel.
There is not always good Cheer, where the Chimney smoaks.
There is not an Hair so small, but hath its Shadow.
There is not so much Comfort in the having of Children, as there is Sorrow in parting with them.
There is not the thickness of a Sixpence, between Good and Evil.
There is nothing more precious than Time, and nothing more prodigally wasted.
There is Reason in roasting of Eggs.
There is small Difference (to the Eye of the World) in being Naught, and being thought so.
There is some Difference between Peter and Peter. 
There is some Virtue or other to be exercis'd, whatever happens.
There is Winter enough for the Snipe and Woodcock too.
There may be Blue, and better Blue.
There may be such Things as old Fools and young Counsellors.
There must be two at least to a Quarrel.
There needs a long Apprenticeship, to understand the Mystery of the World's Trade.
There never wants a ragged one, for one that's ripp'd.
There were no ill Language, if it were not ill taken.
There were such black Swan's formerly, as Truth and Honesty.
Therefore a Man is a Cuckold, because two are too hard for one.
They agree like Bells; they want nothing but hanging.
They agree like Dogs and Cats coupled.
They agree like London-Clocks.
They are Clove and Orange.
They are Finger and Thumb.
They are Hand and Glove.
They are like Bells; every one in a several Note.
They are little to be fear'd, whose Tongues are their Swords.
They are not all Saints, that use Holy Water.
They are rich, who have true Friends.
They are scarce of Horses, where two ride on a Dog.
They are so like, that both are the worse for it.
They both put their Hands in one Glove.
They cannot set their Horses together.
They complain wrongfully of Neptune, that twice suffer'd Shipwreck.
They have begun a Dispute, which the Devil will not let them make an End of.
They have great Need of a Blessing, that kneel to a Thistle.
They hurt themselves, that wrong others.
They love dancing well, that dance barefoot upon Thorns.
They may sit in the Chair, who have Malt to sell.
They must hunger in Winter, that will not work in Summer.
They need much, whom nothing will content.
They say so, is half a Lie.
They seldom live well, who think they shall live long.
They, that are bound, must obey.
They, that are full of themselves, are wise only for want of thinking.
They, that burn You for a Witch, lose all their Coals.
They, that buy an Office, must sell something.
They, that command the most, enjoy themselves the least.
They, that desire but a few Things, can be cross'd but in few.
They, that do nothing, learn to do ill.
They, that fear an Overthrow, are half beaten.
They, that have good store of Butter, may lay it on thick.
They, that hide, can find.
They, that live longest, must die at last.
They, that live longest, must go farthest for Wood.
They, that talk like Philosophers, are often observ'd to act like Fools.
They, that value not Praise, will never do any Thing worthy of Praise.
They that walk in the Sun, must be content to be tan'd.
They were both equally bad; so the Devil put them together.
They, who cannot do as they would, must do as they can.
Then I'll thatch Grooly-Pool with Pancakes.
Things above thy Heighth, are to be look'd at, not reach'd at.
Things hardly attain'd, are long retain'd.
Things not understood, are admir'd.
Things that are Accidents to us, are Providences to God.
Things that differ in the End, will part in the Way.
Think of thy Deliverance, as well as of thy Danger.
This and better may do, but this and worse will never do.
This Blustering can never untile my House.
This Day is yours, but whose shall To-morrow be?
This Day there is no Trust, but come To-morrow.
This, or any Moment may be your last.
This World is ever running its round.
Tho' a Coat be never so fine that a Fool wears, yet 'tis still but a Fool's Coat.
Tho' all Men were made of one Metal, yet they were not cast all in the same Mould.
Tho' Love is blind, yet til not for want of Eyes.
Tho' Malice may darken Truth, it cannot put it out.
Tho' Modesty be a Virtue, yet Bashfulness is a Vice.
Tho' the Cat winks, she is not blind.
Tho' the Fox runs, the Chickens have Wings.
Tho' the generous Man care the least for Wealth; yet he will be the most gall'd with the Want of it.
Tho' the Heavens be glorious, yet they are not all Stars.
Tho' the Mastiff be gentle, yet bite him not by the Lip.
Tho' the Sauce be good, yet you need not forsake the Meat for it.
Tho' the Sore be healed, yet a Scar may remain.
Tho' the Sun shines, take your Cloak.
Tho' thy Enemy seem a Mouse, yet watch him like a Lion.
Tho' thy Water be never so muddy, don't say, I'll never drink of it.
Tho' you are bound to love your Enemy, you are not bound to put your Sword in his Hand.
Tho' you stroak the Nettle never so kindly, yet it will sting you.
Those are miserable Pleasures, that must end in Pain.
Those are prais'd most, that are prais'd without any Interest.
Those see nothing but Faults, that seek for nothing else.
Those, that are in Love, think other People's Eyes out.
Those, that are always angry, are little regarded.
Those, that are stung by the Scorpion, are heal'd by the Scorpion.
Those, that complain of every thing, never want the Head-ach.
Those, that eat Cherries with great Persons, shall have their Eyes squirted out with the Stones.
Those, that eat the best and drink the best, commonly do worst.
Those, that have much Business, must have much Pardon.
Those, that make the best Use of their Time, have none to spare.
Those, that too much reverence the Ancients, are a scorn to the Moderns.
Thorns make the greatest crackling.
Thou art as like to obtain thy Wish, as the Wolf is to eat the Moon.
Thou canst not fly high with borrowed Wings.
Thou canst not serve God, unless thy Mammon serve thee.
Thou shalt have Moon-shine in thy Mustard-Pot for it.
Threatned Folks live long.
Three are too many to keep a Secret, and too few to be merry.
Three may keep Counsel, if two be away.
Three Women and a Goose make a Market.
Thrift is the Philosopher's Stone.
Throw not Stones at thine own Windows.
Throw the Rope in after the Bucket.
Throwing your Cap at a Bird, is not the Way to catch it.
Tie a Dog to a Crab-Tree, and he'll never love Verjuice more.
Till Death all is Life.
Till Vice gets an Habit, there is a Remedy for it.
Time and Straw ripen Medlars.
Time and Thought tame the greatest Grief.
Time and Tide tarry for no Man.
Time and Words can't be recalled.
Time devours all things.
Time is the Rider that breaks in Youth.
Time past may be repented, but can never be recalled.
Time spent in Vice or Folly is doubly lost.
Time wrongs Antiquity.
Timely and wise Fear of Danger prevents Danger.
Timely Blossom, timely Fruit.
Tittle-tattle, give the Goose more Hay.
'Tis a good Ill, that comes alone.
'Tis a most Sad Sight, to see an old Man in Misery.
Tis a Sign of an ill Cause to rail at your Adversary.
'Tis a sweet Sorrow to bury an outragious Wife.
'Tis a wicked World, and we make Part of it.
'Tis almost as easy to find a true Diamond, as a true Friend.
'Tis altogether vain to learn Wisdom, and yet live foolishly.
'Tis an unhappy Wit, that stirs up Enemies against it self.
'Tis as natural for Women to pride themselves in fine Cloaths, as 'tis for a Peacock to spread his Tail.
'Tis better to suffer Wrong, than do it.
'Tis brave scrambling at the rich Man's Dole.
'Tis Clemency, that makes the absolute Conquest.
'Tis Comparison, that makes Men happy or miserable.
'Tis easy to fall into a Trap; but hard to get out again.
'Tis easier to avoid a Fault, than acquire Perfection.
'Tis easier to bear Unkindnesses than Affronts.
'Tis easier to know how to speak, than how to be silent.
'Tis easier to miss, than to hit a Needle's Eye.
'Tis easier to preserve a Friend, than to recover him when lost.
'Tis easier to ridicule than commend.
'Tis Fortune chiefly, that makes Heroes.
'Tis generous to bear an Injury, but dangerous to requite it.
'Tis God's Blessing, that makes the Pot-boil.
'Tis good grafting on a good Stock.
'Tis good riding in a safe Harbour.
'Tis good to go a Foot with a Horse in Hand.
'Tis harder to unlearn than learn.
'Tis Heighth makes Grantham-Steeple stand awry.
'Tis in vain to kick, after you have once put on Fetters.
'Tis in vain to speak Reason, where 'twill not' be heard.
'Tis late e'er an old Man comes to know he is old.
'Tis Liberty, that every one loves.
'Tis Money, that begets Money.
'Tis more your Goodness, than my Desert.
'Tis not clean Linen only, that makes the Feast.
'Tis not every Question, that deserves an Answer.
'Tis not for every one to catch a Salmon.
'Tis not good to be happy too young.
'Tis not knowing much, but what is useful, that makes a wise Man.
'Tis not Liberty to live licentiously.
'Tis not other's Apprehensions, but your own Liking that should please you.
'Tis not Prating but Working, that brings in the Harvest.
'Tis not the Action, but the Intention, that is good or bad.
'Tis not the Beard, that makes the Philosopher.
'Tis not the Armour, but the right placing of it.
'Tis not the Habit, that makes the Monk.
'Tis not the Matter, but the Mind.
'Tis not the Husbandman, but the good Weather, that makes the Corn grow.
'Tis not the suffering; but the Cause and the Patience, that makes a Martyr.
'Tis not your Posterity, but your Actions, that will perpetuate your Memory.
'Tis Novelty, that sets the People a gaping.
'Tis Perseverance that prevails.
'Tis Pity thou art not a little more Tongue-tied.
'Tis Pride and not Nature, that craves much.
'Tis Pride in Fashion, that puts Humility out of Countenance.
'Tis rare to find a Fish, that will not some time or other bite.
'Tis Self-Conceit, that makes Opinion obstinate.
'Tis Skill, not Strength, that governs a Ship.
'Tis the Abilities of a Horse, that Occasions his Slavery.
'Tis the early Bird, that catcheth the Worm.
'Tis the Horse that stumbles, and not the Saddle.
'Tis the last Feather, that breaks the Horse's Back.
'Tis the Men, not the Houses, that make the City.
'Tis the Place, that shews the Man.
'Tis the Riches of the Mind only, that make a Man rich and happy.
'Tis Time, Conversation, and Business that discovers what a Man is.
'Tis Wisdom sometimes to seem a Fool.
To a crazy Ship all Winds are contrary.
To a good Spender, God is a Treasurer.
To a mortal Man, no Evil is immortal.
To a wise Man, Living is Thinking.
To be a Fool or Knave in Print, doth but bring the Truth to Light.
To be conquer'd by an Hero is an Honour.
To be daily dying is a blessed Life.
To be deceiv'd by a Promise, is worse than to be put by one's Hopes.
To be employ'd in useless Things, is half to be idle.5135 To be virtuous, is to do good, and to do it well.
To be proud of an Hereditary Title, is to rant it in a dead Man's Clothes.
To beg a Courtesy is to sells one's Liberty.
To believe a Business impossible, is the Way to make it so.
To beg Teeth of a roost-Cock.
To blush at Vice shews the World, you are asham'd of it.
To bring an old House over one's Head.
To cast Oyl into the Fire, is not the Way to quench it.
To catch a Tartar.
To catch two Pigeons with one Pea.
To come in Pudding-time.
To come sailing in a Sow's Ear.
To command many, will cost much.
To contemn a just Commendation, is to kick at a Kindness.
To contemn the Poor because of his Poverty, is to affront God's Providence.
To continue good amongst ill Men, that's the Point.
To cut down an Oak, and plant a Thistle.
To-Day a Man, To-Morrow a Mouse.
To-Day is Yesterday's Pupil.
To-Day me, To-Morrow thee.
To dive deep, and bring up a Potsherd.
To do good to the Ungrateful, is to throw Rose-water into the Sea.
To draw the Worm out of the Root.
To eat, and to scratch, a Man need but begin.
To eat well is no Whoredom; and to starve is no Gentility.
To escape the Rocks, and perish in the Sands.
To fall away from a Horse-load, to a Cart-load.
To favour the Ill, is to injure the Good.
To fawn with the Tail, and bite with the Mouth.
To feather one's own Nest.
To fish with a Herring, and catch a Sprat.
To fly on upon Plunder, and lose the Battle.
To fly with waxed Wings.
To get out of one Mire, to run into another.
To give a Reason for Fancy, were to weigh the Fire, and measure the Wind.
To go a Coney-catching with a dead Ferrit.
To go a Cricket-hunting.
To go against Reason and Conscience, is to rebel against God himself.
To go as fast as a Friar, that is invited to Dinner.
To go like a Bear to a Stake.
To go out a Pilgrim, and come home a Curtezan.
To go thorough-Stitch with a Business.
To go through Fire and Water, to serve a Friend.
To grease a fat Sow.
To grow old at Court, and die in the Hospital.
To have an Oar in every Man's Boat.
To have the World in a String.
To him, that has a bad Taste, sweet is bitter.
To him, that wills, ways are seldom wanting.
To him, that you tell your Secret, you resign your Liberty.
To hit the Nail on the Head.
To hold the Wolf by the Ears.
To hold one's Nose to the Grind-stone.
To hold with the Hare, and run with the Hounds.
To hug one, as the Devil hugs a Witch.
To jest is tolerable, but to do Harm by Jest is insufferable.
To keep a Custom, you hammer the Anvil still, tho' you have no Iron.
To kill two Birds with one Stone.
To lather an Asse's Head, is but spoiling of Soap.
To laugh in one's Face, and cut one's Throat.
To leave all at Sixes and Sevens.
To leave no Stone unturn'd.
To lick Honey thro' a cleft Stick.
To lie at Rack and Manger.
To live is not to spend or waste Time, but to employ it.
To love the Door, and leave the Hatch.
To make a Bolt or a Shaft of it.
To make a Bridge of one's Nose.
To make a Man valiant, abuse him lustily.
To make a Mountain of a Mole-hill.
To make two Friends with one Gift.
To make White Black, and Black White.
To-morrow a new Scene of Things may open.
To-morrow Morning I found a Horse-shoe.
To no more purpose, than 'twould be to knock one's Heels against the Ground.
To nourish a Viper in one's Bosom.
To nurse up and keep a Vice is a vast Charge.
To outshoot a Man in his own Bow.
To overcome Pleasure, is the greatest Pleasure.
To pay one in ones own Coin.
To promise, and give nothing, is a Comfort for a Fool.
To punish and not prevent, is to labour at the Pump, and leave open the Leak
To put new Handles to an old Pot.
To put our Sickle into another Man's Corn.
To ride Post for a Pudding.
To rock the Cradle in Spectacles.
To row one Way, and look another.
To run the Wild-Goose Chace.
To see a Storm is better than to feel it.
To see may be easy; but to foresee, that is the fine Thing.
To seek a Needle in a Bottle of Hay.
To seem, and not to be, is throwing the Shuttle without weaving.
To serve the People, is worse than to serve two Masters.
To set up a Sail to every Wind.
To shoot at a Pigeon, and kill a Crow.
To sing like a Bird called a Swine.
To slit one's Nose.
To spare at the Spiggot, and let run out at the Bung-hole.
To speak like a Mouse in a Cheese.
To stop two Gaps with one Bush.
To strain at a Knat, and swallow a Camel.
To stroke with one Hand, and stab with the other.
To succeed well, one must have his lucky Day.
To swallow an Ox, and be choak'd with the Tail.
To swill and drink, is to turn Tripe-Wife and Wash-Guts.
To take from a Soldier Ambition, is to take off his Spurs.
To take from the right Hand, and give to the Left.
To take the wrong Sow by the Ear.
To talk without thinking, is to shoot without aiming.
To throw the Helve after the Hatchet.
To throw the House out of the Window.
To throw the Stone, and hide the Hand.
To thrust one's Foot under another Man's Table.
To turn Cat in Pan.
To twist a Rope of Sand.
To wear a Horn, and not know it, will do one no more Harm, than to eat a Fly and not see it.
To weep excessively for the Dead, is to affront the Living.
To whisper Proclamations is ridiculous.
To win the Horse, or lose the Saddle.
To woo is a Pleasure in a young Man, but a Phrenzy in an old.
Too great and sudden Changes, tho' for the better, are not easily born.
Too late to grieve, when the Chance is past.
Too much and too little occasions the Troubles of Mankind.
Too much Asseveration is a good Ground of Suspicion.
Too much breaks the Bag.
Too much Care may be as bad as downright Negligence.
Too much consulting confounds.
Too much Cordial will destroy.
Too much Familiarity breeds Contempt.
Too much Fear cuts all the Nerves asunder.
Too much of one Thing is good for nothing.
Too much Praise is a Burthen.
Too much Scratching, pains; too much Talking, plagues.
Too much spoileth, too little is nothing.
Touch a gall'd Horse on the Back, and he'll kick.
Touch Pot, touch Penny.
Trade is the Mother of Money.
Travel makes a wise Man better, but a Fool worse.
Travellers should correct the Vice of one Country, by the Virtue of another.
Tripe-Broth is better than no Porridge.
Trouble makes every sad Accident a double Evil, and Contentedness makes it none at all.
Troubles are the only Trials.
Troy was.
Troy was not took in a Day.
True Blue will never stain.
True Jests breed bad Blood.
True Jests do the greatest Execution.
True Magnanimity does not consist so much in undertaking difficult Things, as enduring Evils.
True Sincerity sends for no Witness.
True Valour is Fire; Bullying is Smoak.
True Valour knows as well how to suffer as to act.
Trust him no further than you can throw him.
Trust makes Way for Treachery.
Trust me, but look to thy self.
Trust not a great Weight to a slender Thread.
Trust not to a broken Staff.
Trust thy self only, and another shall not betray thee.
Trusting often makes Fidelity.
Truth and Honesty have no Need of loud Protestations.
Truth and Matter of Fact have no Answers.
Truth and Oyl are ever above.
Truth fears no Colours.
Truth fears no Trial.
Truth finds Foes, where it should find none.
Truth hath a good Face, but ill Clothes.
Truth hath always a sure Bottom.
Truth is God's Daughter.
Truth is the Child of Time.
Truth is Truth, in spite of Custom's Heart.
Truth lieth deep, and must be fetch'd up at Leisure.
Truth loves to go naked.
Truth makes the Devil blush.
Truth may be blamed, but cannot be shamed.
Truth may sometimes come out of the Devil's Mouth.
Truth needs not many Words; but a false Tale, a large Preamble.
Truth never grows old.
Truth seeks no Corners.
Truth will be uppermost, one time or other.
Truth will sometimes break out, unlooked for.
Truth's best Ornament is Nakedness.
Try whether the Ice will bear, before thou venturest upon it.
Try to tame a mad Horse, but knock him not at Head.
'Twas Fear, that first put on Arms.
'Twas got out of the Fire.
'Twas surely the Devil, that taught Women to dance, and Asses to bray.
'Twere better my Enemy envy me, than I him.
Two Anons, and a By and By, are an Hour and a half.
Two cunning Knaves need no Broker.
Two Daughters and a Back door, are three arrant Thieves.
Two Dogs fight for a Bone, and a third runs away with it.
Two dry Sticks will kindle a green one.
Two Eyes may see more than one.
Two Faces under one Hood.
Two Fools in a House are too many by a Couple.
Two good Meals make the third a Glutton.
Two Hands in a Dish, and one in a Purse.
Two Heads are better than one; quoth the Woman, when she had her Dog with her to the Market.
Two of a Trade seldom agree.
Two Sir Positives can scarce meet without a Skirmish.
Two Sparrows, upon one Ear of Wheat, cannot agree.
Two Things a Man should never be angry at; what he can help, and what he cannot help.
Two to one in all Things against the angry Man.
Two to one is odds at Foot-ball.
Two Whores in a House will never agree.
'Twould make a Dog break his Halter.
'Twould make even a Fly laugh.
'Twould make one Scratch, where it doth not itch.5342 Vain-Glory blossoms, but never bears.
Valour is brutish without Discretion.
Valour would fight, but Discretion would run away.
Vanity will prove Vexation.
Varnishing hides a Crack.
Venture a small Fish to catch a great one.
Venture a small Fish to catch a Gudgeon.
Venture not all in one Bottom.
Venture thy Opinion, but not thy self for thy Opinion.
Vexation is rather taken than given.
Ugly Women, finely dress'd, are the uglier for it.
Vice is abominable, when it preaches up Virtue.
Vice is its own Punishment, and sometimes its own Cure.
Vice lives always displeased.
Vice makes Virtue shine.
Vice must never plead Prescription.
Vice often rides triumphant in Virtue's Chariot.
Vice ruleth, where Gold reigneth.
Vice would be frightful, if it did not wear a Mask.
Vices are learned without a Master.
Vicious Men overvalue Vanity; and undervalue Vexation.
Virtue and Happiness are but two Names for the same Thing.
Virtue and Happiness are Mother and Daughter.
Virtue and Vice divide the World; but Vice hat got the greater Share.
Virtue brings Honour, and Honour Vanity.
Virtue carrieth a Reward with it; and so doth Vice, with a Vengeance.
Virtue dwells not in the Tongue, but in the Heart.
Virtue hath few Platonick Lovers.
Virtue hath such Charms, that even the Vicious inwardly reverence it.
Virtue is a Man's both Guard and Glory.
Virtue is built upon its self.
Virtue is despised, if it be seen in a Thread-bare Cloak.
Virtue is more persecuted by the Wicked, than encouraged by the Good.
Virtue is not secure against Envy.
Virtue is of noble Birth; but Riches take the Wall of her.
Virtue is of Worth by it self alone; and so is not Birth.
Virtue is prais'd by all; but practised by few.
Virtue is seldom followed gratis.
Virtue is the Beauty of the Soul.
Virtue is the only Ground for Friendship to be built upon.
Virtue is the only true Nobility.
Virtue is tied to no Degrees of Men.
Virtue it self, without good Manners, is laughed at.
Virtue may be overclouded a while, but 'twill shine at the last.
Virtue merits Veneration, wherever she appears.
Virtue respects not Blood and Alliance.
Virtue scorns a Lie for its Defence.
Virtue would not go far; if a little Vanity walked not with it.
Virtue's Paths are first rugged, then pleasant.
Virtues all agree, but Vices fight one another.
Ulcers cannot be cured, that are concealed.
Unadvised Vows are an Offence to God.
Unbidden Guests know not where to sit down.
Under the Blanket, the black one is as good as the white.
Under the Flowers are Thorns.
Under the Hands of unluckly Persons, Opportunities wax old.
Unexpected Kindnesses, or Injuries make great Impression.
Unexperienced Men think all Things easy.
Unjust Gains may be sweet in the Mouth, but will be bitter in the Belly.
Unkindness has no Remedy at Law.
Unknown, unkiss'd.
Unmannerly a little, is better than troublesome a great deal.
Unpleasing Errors are never so welcome as pleasing Falshoods.
Unreasonable Silence is Folly.
Unseasonable Kindness gets no Thanks.
Vows made in Storms are forgot in Calms.
Upbraiding turns a Benefit into an Injury.
Use Legs, and have Legs.
Use makes Perfectness,
Use Pastime, so as not to lose Time.
Use the Means, and trust to God for the Blessing.5414 Want of Care does us more Damage than want of Knowlege.
Wanton Kitlins may make sober old Cats.
War, Hunting, and Love have a thousand Troubles for their Pleasure.
War is Death's Feast.
War makes Thieves, and Peace hangs them.
War must not be waged by Men asleep.
Ware Shins, quoth Grub, when he flung a Louse in the Fire.
Wary is the Word.
Wasps haunt the Honey-pot.
Waste makes Want.
Water breeds Frogs In the Belly; but Wine kills Worms.
We are all Adam's Children; but Silk makes the Difference.
We are apt to believe what we wish for.
We are born crying, live complaining, and die disappointed.
We are bound to be honest, but not to be rich.
We are ever young enough to Sin; never old enough to repent.
We are more mindful of Injuries than Benefits.
We are never so happy, or unfortunate, as we think our selves.
We are not so sensible of the greatest Health, as of the least Sickness.
We Batchelors grin, but you married Men laugh till your Hearts ake.
We begin not to live, till we are fit to die.
We can live without our Friends, but not without our Neighbours.
We carry our greatest Enemies within us.
We carry our Neighbour's Failings in Sight, we throw our own Crimes over our own Shoulders.
We do nothing but in the Presence of two great Witnesses; God, and our own Conscience.
We desire but one Feather out of your Goose.
We easily forget our Faults, when no body knows them.
We hate Delay; yet it makes us wise.
We have all forgot more, than we remember.
We Hounds kill'd the Hare, quoth the Lap-Dog.
We know not which Stone the Scorpion lurks under.
We'll bark our selves, e're we'll buy Dogs so dear.
We may be good in every Condition.
We may see a Prince, but not search him.
We must live by the Quick, and not by the Dead.
We must not lie down, and cry, God help us. 
We must, not look for a Golden Life in an Iron Age.
We never know the Worth of Water, till the Well is dry.
We perfectly know what is Good, and what is Evil; and may be as certain in Morals as in Mathematics.
We see not what is in the Wallet behind.
We seldom find out that we are flattered.
We shall lie all alike in our Graves.
We shall never have Friends, if we expect to find them without Fault.
We should play, to live; not live, to play.
We should publish our Joys, and conceal our Griefs.
Weak Men and Cowards are generally wiley.
Weak Things united become strong.
Wealth and Content do not always live together.
Wealth and Honours can never cure a wounded Conscience.
Wealth is best known by Want.
Wealth wants not for Worship.
Weeds are apt to grow faster than good Herbs.
Weeds want no sowing.
Weigh right, and sell dear.
Weight, Measure, and Tale take away Strife.
Welcome Death, quoth the Rat, when the Trap fell.
Welcome is the best Cheer.
Welcome, Mischief; if thou comest alone.
Well lather'd is half shaven.
Well may he stumble, that chuses a stony Way.
Well might the Cat wink, when both her Eyes were out.
What a Day may bring, a Day may take away.
What a Dust have I rais'd! quoth the Fly upon the Coach.
What a great deal of Good great Men might do!
What! are you afraid of him that died last Year?
What avails it me, to draw one Foot out of the Mire, and stick the other in?
What belongs to the Publick, is no Body's Propriety.
What cannot be alter'd, must be borne, not blam'd.
What Children hear at Home, soon flies abroad.
What comes too late, is as nothing.
What cometh by Kind, costeth nothing.
What costs little, is less esteemed.
What does a Man think of, when he thinks of Nothing? Answ. A great Man's Promise.
Whatever is given to the Poor, is laid out of the reach of Fortune.
Whatever wants; Pleasure and Vanity must be had.
Whatever we cannot help, is our Misfortune not our Fault.
What good can it do an Ass to be called a Lyon?
What has been, may be.
What have I to do with Bradshaw's Wind mill?
What is a great Estate good for, if it brings Melancholy?
What is a Work-man without Tools?
What is done by Night, appears by Day.
What is gotten over the Devil's Back, is spent under his Belly.
What! is it nothing, but up and Ride?
What is one Pound of Butter among a Kennel of Hounds?
What is the Use of Patience, if we cannot find it when we want it?
What may be done at any Time, will be done at no Time.
What serves Dirt for, if it do not stink?
What should a Cow do with a Nutmeg?
What pretty Things Men will make for Money, quoth the old Woman, when she saw a Monkey?
What Reason and Endeavour cannot bring about, often Time will.
What's a Crab in a Cow's Mouth?
What's a Gentleman but his Pleasure?
What's a Sun-dial in the Shade good for?
What's an Army without a General?
What's an Estate good for, if it cannot buy Content?
What's freer than Gift?
What's good in the Mouth, may be bad in the Maw.
What's mine, is my own: what's my Brother's, is his and mine.
What's, my Torn To-Day, may be thine To-Morrow.
What's none of your Profit, need be none of your Peril.
What's sowed in Youth, will be reaped in Age.
Whatsoever Time does, it undoes.
What the better is the House, for a Sluggard's rising early?
What the Eye sees, need not to be guessed at.
What the Eye sees not, the Heart rues not.
What the good Wife spares, the Cat eats.
What the Heart thinketh, the Tongue speaketh.
What they lose in the Hundred, they gain in the County.
What Tutor shall we find for a Child of sixty Years old?
What! would he be greater than Sir John?
What would you have? a butter'd Faggot?
What would you have? a Calf with a white Face?
What would you have an Ass chop Logick?
Wheat is not to be gather'd in the Blade, but in the Ear.
When a blind Man flourisheth the Antient, woe be unto those that follow him.
When a Fool hath bethought himself, the Market's over.
When a Fox preaches, beware the Geese.
When a Goose dances, and a Fool versifies, there is Sport.
When a Man grows angry, his Reason, rides out.
When a Man hath once done blushing, he commenceth a hardned Sinner.
When a Man is not liked, whatever he doth, is amiss.
When a Man is set upon his own Ruin, 'tis in vain to reason with him.
When a Man repeats a Promise again and again, he means to fail you.
When a Man's Coat is Thread-bare, its an easie Thing to pick a Hole in it.
When a Man's House is on Fire, it's Time to break off Chess.
When a Pig is given you, run presently for a String to lead it home.
When a proud Man hears another praised, he thinks himself injured.
When a Thing is done, Advice comes too late.
When a Tree is once a falling, every one cries, down with it.
When all Fruit fails, welcome Haws.
When all is gene, Repentance comes too late.
When an Ass climbeth a Ladder, you may find Wisdom in Women.
When an Ass is among a Parcel of Monkeys, they all make Faces at him.
When an old Man will not drink, you may safely promise him a Visit in the next World.
When Dover and Calais meet.
When every one gets his own, you'll get the Gallows.
When Flatterers meet, the Devil goes to Dinner.
When Fortune fawneth, she biteth; when she is angry, she woundeth.
When Fortune smiles, embrace her.
When God wills, all Winds bring Rain.
When Gold speaks, you may e'en hold your Tongue.
When he should work, every Finger is a Thumb.
When Honour grew mercenary, Money grew honourable.
When I am dead, make me a Caudle.
When I had thatch'd his House, ha would have hurl'd me from the Roof.
When I wanted an honest Man, I never thought to go to Court for him.
When many strike on an Anvil, they must observe Order.
When Mastiffs sight, little Curs will bark.
When Necessity comes in, turn Modesty out.
When Passion entereth at the Fore-gate, Wisdom goeth out of the Postern.
When Poverty comes in at the Door, Love creeps out at the Window.
When Pride is on the Saddle, Shame is on the Crupper.
When Pride rides, Shame lacqueys.
When Sharpers prey upon one another; there's no Game abroad.
When Sorrow is asleep, wake it not.
When the Barn's full, you may thresh before the Door.
When the Belly is full, the Bones are at Rest.
When the Cat's gone, the Mice grow fawcy.
When the Christning is over, you may have Godfathers enough.
When the Daughter is stolen, shut Pepper-Gate.
When the Demand, is a Jest, the Answer is a Scoff.
When the Devil prays, he has a Booty in his Eye.
When the Devil of Contradiction once possesses a Man, he is hard to be cast out.
When the Devil's a Hog, you shall eat Bacon.
When the Devil's a Vicar, then thou shalt be his Clark.
When the Devil's dead, there's a Widow for Humphrey. 
When the Deg is beaten out of the Room, where will they lay their Stink?
When the Dog's dead, all his Malice dies with him.
When the Eye sees what it never saw, the Heart will think what it never thought.
When the Flatterer pipes, then the Devil dances.
When the Fox could net reach the Grape, he cry'd, they are sour.
When the Frog and Mouse would take up the Quarrel, the Kite decided it.
When the good Man is abroad, the good Woman's Table is soon spread.
When the Head aketh, all the Body feels it.
When the Heart is a fire, some Sparks wilt fly out of the Mouth.
When the Hop grows high, it must have a Pole.
When the Horse is starv'd, you bring him Oats.
When the House is burnt down, you bring Water.
When the Husband drinks to the Wife, ah wou'd be well; when the Wife drinks to the Husband, all is well.
When the Husband is Fire, and the Wise Tow, the Devil easily sets all in a Flame.
When the Maid leaves open the Door, blame not the Cat.
When the Mare hath a bald Face, the Filley hath a Blaze.
When the Master licks the Knife, it's bad for the Man.
When the Mutton's going, it's good to take a Slice.
When the next House is a Fire, it's high Time to look to thy own.
When the old Dog barks, he giveth Counsel.
When the Pig is proffered, hold up the Poke.
When the Pet boils over; it cooleth it self.
When the Pirate prays, there is great Danger.
When the Rights of Hospitality are invaded Revenge is almost allowable.
When the Soul is embitter'd, nothing is sweet.
When the Steed is stole, you shut the Stable-Door.
When the Sun is highest, he casts the least Shadow.
When the Sun shines, no body minds it; but when it is eclipsed, all consider him.
When the Wares are gone, shut up the Shop-Windows.
When the Wine is in, the Wit is out.
When the Wine is run out, you'd stop the Leak.
When there is but little Bread, cut first, if you can.
When thou art at Sea, sail; when at Land, settle.
When thou dancest, take heed, whom thou takest by the Hand.
When two Knaves deal, the Devil drives the Bargain.
When War beginneth, Hell openeth.
When Ware is lik'd, it is half sold.
When we are pleas'd our selves, we begin to please others.
When we commend good Actions, we make them in some Measure our own.
When we do Ill, the Devil tempteth us when we do nothing, we tempt him.
When we first see the Light, we weep; and when we leave it, we groan.
When Wine sinks, Words swim.
When you are good to others, you are best to your self.
When you are in the Way, you ask for the Path.
When you are in vicious Company, you are among your Enemies.
When you die, your Trumpeter will be buried.
When you give others ill Words, you rail at your self.
When you have counted your Cards, you'll find you have little left.
When you have given me roast Meat, you beat me with the Spit.
When you have no Observers, be afraid of your self.
When you have made me shuffle the Cards, then truly you'll not play.
When you obey your Superiour, you instruct your Inferiour.
When your Name is up, you may lie abed till Noon.
Where a Chest lies open, a reputed honest Man may sin.
Where bad's the best, bad must be the Choice.
Where Bees are, there is Honey.
Where Content is, there is a Feast.
Where Curiosity is not the Purveyor, Detraction will soon be starved.
Where Dainties are not to be had, be content with common Fare.
Where Drums speak out, Laws hold their Tongues.
Where Embroidery is wanting, perhaps a patch'd Coat may serve.
Where-ever we meet Misery, we owe Pity.
Where ever an Ass falleth, there will he never fall again.
Where-ever you go, and Business be cross, you have a League of bad Way.
Where every one fleeceth, the Sheep go naked.
Where God hath his Church, the Devil hath his Chapel.
Where it's weakest, there the Thread breaketh.
Where Knaves fall out, honest Men come by their own.
Where Men are kindly used, they will resort.
Where Necessity pinches, Boldness is Prudence.
Where no Fault is, there needs no Punishment.
Where none else will, the Devil himself must bear the Cross.
Where nothing is, nothing can be had.
Where one Door is shut, another is open.
Where Passion is high, there Reason is low.
Where shall a Man have a worse Friend, than he brings from homes?
Where shall the Ox go, but he must labour?
Where something is found, there look again.
Wheresoever we live well, that is our Country.
Wheresoever you see your Kindred, make much of your Friends.
Where the Bee sucks Honey, the Spider sucks Poison.
Where the Dam leaps over, the Kid follows.
Where the Deer is slain, there will some of his Blood lie.
Where the Great Turk's Horse treads, Grass never grows.
Where the Heart is past Hope, the Face is past Shame.
Where the Hedge is lowest, Men leap over.
Where the Knot is loose, the String slippeth.
Where the River is deepest, it runneth quietest.
Where the Sea goes, there let the Sands go.
Where the Will is ready, the Feet are light.
Where there are Boots ready, Spurs may be wanting.
Where there are many Laws, there are many Enormities.
Where there are Pride and Covetousness in a Man, two Devils fight.
Where there are Reeds, there is Water.
Where there is much Love, there is much Mistake.
Where there is no Love, all are Faults.
Where there is nothing to be had, even the King of France must lose his Right.
Where two faithful Friends meet, God makes up the third.
Where two Fools meet, the Bargain goes off.
Where Vain-Glory reigns, Folly is prime Counsellor.
Where Villainy goes before, Vengeance follows after.
Where Water is shallow, no Boat will ride.
Where we least think, there goes the Hare away.
Where Women are and Geese, there wants no gagling.
Where you see a Jester, a Fool is not far off.
Wherries must not put out to Sea.
Whether you boil or bake Snow, you can have but Water of it.
While the Grass grows, the Steed starves.
While there is Life, there is Hope.
While you trust to the Dog, the Wolf slips into the Sheep-Fold.
Whilst it thunders, the Thief turns honest.
White Walls are Fool's Writing-Paper.
Who always buys and sells, feels not what he spends.
Who asks after the Pedigree of a Swine he is to kill?
Who bulls the Cow, must keep the Calf.
Who can help Sickness, quoth the Drunken Wife, when she fell into the Gutter?
Who'd keep a Cow, when he may have a Quart of Milk for a Penny?
Who draws his Sword against his Prince, must throw away the Scabbard.
Who draws others into ill Courses, is the Devil's Factor.
Who eats, and leaves, has another Meal good.
Who eats his Dinner alone, must saddle his Horse.
Who ever repented of a good Action?
Who ever suffer'd for not speaking ill of others?
Who hath Horns in his Bosom, let him not put them on his Forehead.
Who hath a Scold, hath Sorrow to his Sops.
Who keep Company with the Wolf, will learn to howl.
Who knows but that my private Watch may go truer than the Town-Clock?
Who knows who may keep Sheep another Day?
Who loseth his Due, getteth no Thanks.
Who marrieth for Love without Money, hath merry Nights and sorry Days.
Who more busy than they that have least to do?
Who more ready to call her Neighbour Scold, than the arrantest Scold in all the Street?
Who never climbed high, never fell low.
Who perisheth in needless Dangers, is the Devil's Martyr.
Who removeth Land-Mark Stones, bruiseth his Fingers.
Who robs a Cambridge-Scholar, robs twenty.
Who shall bell the Cat?
Who shall keep the Keepers?
Who so bold as blind Baynard? 
Who spends before he thrives, will beg before he thinks.
Who thinks a Woman hath no Merit but her Money, deserves to be made a Cuckold.
Who would desire to spit Blood, tho' into a golden Bason?
Wholesome and poisonous Herbs grow in the same Garden.
Whom God loves, his House is savoury to him.
Whom great Men wrong, they hate.
Whores affect not you, but your Money.
Whoso doth no Evil, is apt to suspect none.
Whoso is apt to believe, shall frequently repent it.
Whoso is not dutiful to a good Mother, shall be punished by an ill Step-Mother.
Whoso is wicked in the Country, will be so also into Town.
Whoso lacketh a Stock, his Gain is not worth a Chip.
Whosoever entertains you with the Faults of others, deserves to serve you in the same Kind.
Whosoever engages in many Pursuits, rarely succeeds in one.
Whosoever is King, thou shalt be his Man.
Whosoever values not his own Life, may be Master of another's.
Why should a rich Man steal?
Wicked Men, like Mad-men, have sometimes their lucid Intervals.
Wickedness is its own Punishment, and many Times its own Cure.
Wickedness with Beauty is the Devil's Hook baited.
Widows are always rich.
Wife and Children are Bills of Charges.
Wife and Children are Hostages given to Fortune.
Wind and Weather, do your utmost.
Wine hath drowned more Men than the Sea.
Wine in the Hogshead quencheth no Thirst.
Wine is a Turn-coat; first a Friend, and then an Enemy.
Wine is the Vintner's; but the Goodness of it, the Drawer's.
Wine neither keeps Secrets, nor fulfils Promises.
Wine shews what a Man is.
Wine that costeth nothing, is digested before it be drank.
Wine turn's a Man inside outwards.
Wine washeth off the Dawb.
Winter draws out what Summer laid in.
Wilful Faults have no Excuse, and deserve no Pardon.
Wilful Waste brings woful Want.
Will any, but an Irish-Man, hang a wooden Kettle over the Fire?
Will is the Cause of Woe.
Will will have its Will, tho' Will Woe win.
Will, without Reason, is blind; and against Reason, is mad.
Willing Minds take up with poor Exercises.
Willows are weak, yet they bind other Wood.
Wisdom don't always speak in Greek and Latin. 
Wisdom goes not always by Years.
Wisdom in a poor Man is a Diamond set in Lead.
Wisdom in Perfection is not for Mortals.
Wisdom is a good Purchase, tho' we pay dear for it.
Wisdom is more to be envyed than Riches.
Wisdom is neither Inheritance nor Legacy.
Wisdom it self is not asham'd to be sprightly and gay upon Occasion.
Wisdom rises upon the Ruins of Folly.
Wisdom sometimes walks in clouted Shoes.
Wisdom without Innocence is Knavery; Innocence without Wisdom is Folly.
Wise and good is better than rich and great.
Wise and good Men invented the Laws; but Fools and the wicked put them upon it.
Wise Men care not for what they cannot have.
Wise Men have but few of their Society.
Wise Men have Reason; other Men, Wit.
Wise Men in the World are like Timber-Trees in a Hedge, here and there one.
Wise Men learn by other Men's Harms; Fools, by their own.
Wise Men learn something of Fools; but Fools nothing of wise Men.
Wise Men make Proverbs, and Fools repeat them.
Wise Men may chance to be caught.
Wise Men may look ridiculous in the Company of Fools.
Wise Men may well be mistaken in Futures.
Wit and Wisdom are like the seven Stars; seldom seen together.
Wit ill apply'd is a dangerous Weapon.
Wit is to be met with every where; but Wisdom is a Rarity.
Wit may be bought too dear.
Wit sometimes helps us to play the Fool with more Confidence.
Wit without Judgment is a weary thing to the Company.
Wit without Wisdom, cuts other Men's Meat and its own Fingers.
With a Fool and a Knave there's no Conclusion.
With an honest and a good Man, Business is soon ended.
With as good a Will, as ever I came from School.
With common Friends, go with Bridle in Hand.
With Cost, good Pottage nay be made out of a Leg of a joint Stool.
With Foxes we must play the Fox.
With-hold not thy Money, where there is Need; and waste it not, where there is none.
Witty Coxcombs are the most troublesome of all Coxcombs.
Wives must have their Wills, while they live, because they make none, when they die.
Woe to that House where there is no chiding.
Wolves may lose their Teeth, but not their Nature.
Women and Wine make Men out of their Wits.
Women are better sold for Sorrow, than bought for Repentance.
Women commend a modest Man, but like him not.
Women conceal all that they know not.
Women grown bad, are worse than Men; because the Corruption of the best turns worst.
Women have Tears of Dissimulation, as well as Sorrow.
Women, Priests and Poultry have never enough.
Women's Work is never done.
Wonder is the Daughter of Ignorance.
Wood half-Coal is easily kindled.
Words are but Wind; but seeing is believing.
Words are for Women; Actions for Men.
Words shew the Wit of a Man, but Action his Meaning.
Work breaks an idle Fellow's Legs, Arms and Back.
Worth begets in base Minds Envy, but in brave Souls Emulation.
Worth hath been under-rated, ever since Wealth hath been over-valued.
Worth without Wealth is a good Servant out of Place.
'Would I were in that Country, where they break Men's Arms that talk of Work.
'Would, No, I thank you, had never been made.
Would you be thanked for feeding your own Swine?
Would you cut down Falkland-Wood with a Penknife?
Would you dye a Raven black?
Would you draw Oyl out of Sand?
Would you eat finer Bread than is made of Wheat, or wear finer Cloth than is made of Wool?5827 Would you have Potatoes grow by the Pot-side?
Would you know Secrets? look for them in Grief or Pleasure.
Would you thatch your House with Pancakes?
Would you treat your Horse with a Peck of Oysters?
Would you wipe with the Water, and wash with the Towel?
Wounds may heal; but not those, that are made by ill Words.
Wranglers are never in the wrong.
Wranglers never want Words, though they may Matter.
Wren's Battles are as eagerly fought, as Crane's are.
Wrinkled Purses make wrinkled Faces.
Write with the Learned, but speak with the Vulgar.5838 Yelping Currs may anger Mastiffs at last.
You and he piss both in a Quill.
You and I draw both in the same Yoke.
You are a fine Fellow, to fetch the Devil a Priest.
You are a Man among the Geese, when the Gander is away.
You are a pretty Fellow, to ride a Goose a Gallop.
You are a sweet Nut, if you were well crackt.
You are an honest Man, and I am your Uncle; and that's two Lies.
You are afraid of the Dog you never saw.
You are come of good Blood, and so is Goose Pudding.
You are in the Highway to Needham. 
You are in the Roast-meat, while we are in the Sod. 
You are like a Cuckow; you have but one Song.
You are like a Hog; never good, while living.
You are like Fig-tree Fuel; much Smoke, and little Fire.
You are like foul Weather; you come unsent for.
You are never pleased, full nor fasting.
You are none of the Hastings, nor Hotspurs.
You are not good, if you are so only for the sake of Praise.
You are not yet a roasting, and yet you'd have Sops in the Pan.
You are one of those Lawyers, that never heard of Littleton. 
You are so cunning, you know not what Weather 'tis, when it rains.
You are so tender, you dare not be hang'd for fear of galling your Neck.
You are very free of another Man's Pottage.
You ask an Elm-Tree for Pears.
You begin well in nothing, except you end well.
You break my Head, then give me a Plaister.
You bring a Bit of Wire, and take away a Bar.
You bring Owls to Athens. 
You cackle often, but never lay an Egg.
You came a Day after the Fair.
You came as seasonably as Snow in Summer.
You came for Wool, but shall return shorn yourself.
You can have no more of a Cat than a Skin.
You can never make a good Shaft of a Pig's Tail.
You can never speech Courage into a Coward.
You cannot escape away from yourself.
You cannot hide an Eel in a Sack.
You cannot judge of a Man, till you know his whole Story.
You cannot make a Hunting-Horn of a Fox's Tail.
You cannot make Velvet of a Sow's Ear.
You cannot say Mass, but at your own Altar.
You can't drive a Wind-Mill with a Pair of Bellows.
You can't eat your Cake, and have it too.
You can't fare well, but you must cry Roast meat.
You cant judge of the Horse by the Harness.
You can't know Wine by the Cask.
You can't sell the Cow, and have her Milk too.
You carry Fire in one Hand, and Water in the other.
You cast your Net, but nothing was caught.
You contend about a Goat's Beard, or Lock of Wool.
You converse daily with the Devil, and pretend to be frighted with a Mouse.
You could make Broth, but you have no Beef.
You could spy Trouble, if your Eyes were out.
You cry, Hem! where there is no Echo.
You cut large Thongs out of another's Hide.
You dare as well pull out one of the Devil's Teeth.
You dare as well take a Bear by the Tooth.
You dig your Grave with your Teeth.
You do but water a dead Stake.
You drink out of the broad end of the Funnel, and hold the little one to me.
You drink Vinegar, when you have Wine at your Elbow.
You eat up that Grass, which I meant to make Hay of.
You find a Gap, where the Hedge is whole.
You find Fault with a fat Goose.
You fish fair, and catch a Frog.
You gaz'd at the Moon, and sell in the Gutter
You give me Colloquintida for Herb-John. 
You give notable Counsel; but he's a Fool that takes it.
You go to a Goat, to buy Wool.
You gorge down Wine, as a Swine swills Whey.
You had rather go to Mill than to Mass.
You have a Barn for all Grain.
You have a little Wit, and it does you good sometimes.
You have a tangled Skain of it, to wind off.
You have always a ready Mouth for a ripe Cherry.
You have brought your Hogs to a fair Market.
You have done your Day's Work; you may unyoke.
You have foul'd your self; and now you'd have me clean you.
You have found a Colt's Nest, and laugh at the Eggs.
You have found, what was never lost.
You have good Manners, but never carry them about you.
You have lost your own Stomach, and found Dog's.
You have made a Hand of it, like a Foot.
You have no Goats, and yet you sell Rids.
You have no need to borrow Confidence.
You have not lived all your Time upon Nuts.
You have taken a Bite out of your own Arm.
You hide your self in a Net, and think, no body sees you.
You keep Easter, when I keep Lent. 
You know not how to sew, and yet you'd be cutting out.
You know not what Ladle your Dish, may come under.
You lay on your Butter, as with a Trowel.
You lick'd not your Lips, since you lyed last.
Yon look as tho' you'd make the Crow a Pudding e're long.
You look for hot Water under the Ice.
You look like a Runner, quoth the Devil to the Crab.
You look like the Devil, in Day-light.
You make a Muck-hill on my Trencher, quoth the Bride.
You make a great Purchase, when you relieve the Necessitous.
You make as good Musick at a Wheel-barrow.
You may be a wise Man, and yet not know how to make a Watch.
You may beat the De'el into your Wife, but you'll never bang him out again.
You may be godly; but you'll ne'er be cleanly.
You may believe any Thing that is good of a grateful Man.
You may dance on the Ropes, without reading Euclid. 
You may follow him long, e're a Shilling drop from him.
You may gape long enough, e're a Bird fly in to your Mouth.
You may give him good Advice, but who can give him Wit to take it?
You may have a good Memory, but you have a confounded Judgment.
You may have worse Offers before May-day. 
You may know by a Handful the whole Sack.
You may keep Wool till it's Dirt, and Flax till it's Silk.
You may know by a Penny, how a Shilling spends.
You may know by the Market-folks, how the Market goes.
You may love your Neighbour, and yet not hold his Stirrup.
You may offer a Bribe, without fear of haying your Throat cut,
You may pay for your Schooling, more than your Learning is worth.
You may row your Heart out, if the Wind and Tide set against you.
You may truss up all his Wit in an Egg-shell.
You may wink and choose.
You measure every Man's Honesty by your own.
You meet a Danger half-way.
You must ask your Neighbours, if you shall live in Peace.
You must be content sometimes with rough Roads.
You must be content to taste your own Broth.
You must look where it is not, as well as where it is.
You must not cut and deal too.
You must not expect sweet from a Dunghill, nor Honour from a Clown.
You must not hope to reap Wheat, where you sow'd none.
You must plow with such Oxen as you have.
You must sell, as Markets go.
You must spoil, before you spin well.
You need not get a golden Pen to write upon Dirt.
You need not go to the Iron-Mills, every Time you lack a Tacknail.
You need not marry; you have Troubles enough without it.
You never do it, without overdoing it.
You ought to untie that Knot, which you knit your self.
You owed me a Sheep, but paid me a Lamb.
You plead aster Sentence given.
You plow with an Ox, that will not miss a Furrow.
You pour Water into a Sieve.
You pretend the Publick, but intend your self.
You pretend to be a Visitor, but are really a Spy.
You put the Clown above the Gentleman.
You run like Teague, before your Errand.
You saddle To-day, and ride out To-morrow.
You saw out your Tree, before you cut it down.
You scatter Meal, and gather Ashes.
You scorn it, as a Dog does Tripe.
You seek the Needle, where you never stuck it.
You set Saffron, and there came up Wolfs-bane.
You sew'd it with a red-hot Needle, and a burning Thread.
You shall have the Whetstone.
You shall never beat the Fly from the Candle, tho' she burn for it.
You shall never clap a Padlock upon my Tongue.
You shew Bread in one Hand, and a Stone in t'other.
You should ask the World's Leave, before you commend your self.
You shut your Budget, before it's full.
You sift Night and Day, and get nothing but Bran.
You sit upon Thorns.
You smile and bite.
You spoil a good Dish with ill Sauce.
You starve in a Cook's Shop.
You take every Bush for a Bug-bear.
You take me up, before I'm down.
You take more Care of your Shoe, than your Foot.
You talk of last Year's Snow.
You tell your Money over a Gridiron.
You to the Cabbage, and I to the Beef.
You trust a great Weight to a slender Thread.
You were begot a Nutting; you speak in Clusters.
You were born, when Wit was scarce.
You were bred in Brazen-Nose College.
You were put out of the Oven for nipping of Pies.
You will neither dance nor hold the Candle.
You will never have a Friend, if you must have one without Failings.
You will never repent of being Patient and Sober.
Yon would be little for God, if the Devil were dead.
You'd find Knots in a Bulrush.
You'd wash a Blackmoor White.
You'll be good, when your Goose pisseth.
You'll beguile none, but those that trust you.
You'll bring a Noble to Nine-pence.
You'll dance at the End of a Rope without teaching.
You'll get the Cat with nine Tails.
You'll have as much Courtesy at Billinsgate. 
You'll keep it no longer, than you can a Cat in a Wheel-barrow.
You'll know an idle Fellow, if you but see him it Dinner.
You'll make an End of your Whistle, tho' the Cart overthrow for it.
You'll never be Mad, you are of so many Minds.
You'll never be Master of Gold enough to break your Back.
You'll never get your Revenge of a rich Man.
You'll not believe a Man is dead, till you see his Brains out.
You'll not believe him Bald, till yon see his Brains.
You'll rather be begg'd, than hang'd for your Wit.
You'll ride a Horse, that was foal'd of an Acorn.
You'll scratch a Beggar, before you die.
Young Cocks love no Coops.
Young is the Goose, that will not eat Oats.
Young Men are made Wise; old Men become so.
Young Men may die; old Men must.
Young Men mould be Learners, when old Men are Actors.
Young Men think old Men Fools; but old Men know the young are so.
Young Prodigal in a Coach will be old Beggar bare-foot.
Your Belly will never let your Back be warm.
Your Bread is butter'd on both Sides.
Your Cake is Dough.
Your dirty Shoes are not welcome in my Parlour.
Your Egg is ready roasted to your Hand.
Your Father's Honour is to you but a second-hand Honour.
Your great Admirers are mostly but silly Fellows.
Your Head's so hot, that your Brains, bubble, oven.
Your Horns hang in your Eyes.
Your Key fits not that Lock.
Your last Pig is farrow'd.
Your main Fault is, you are good for nothing.
Your Mamma's Milk is scarce out of your Nose yet.
Your Mind is upon chacing of Mice.
Your Mouth hath beguil'd your Hands.
Your Nut is ready crackt for you.
Your old Brass will bring you a new Pan.
Your Purse open'd not, when it was paid for.
Your Tongue has got the Start of your Wit.
Your Tongue is made of very loose Leather.
Your Trumpeter's dead, and so you sound your self.
Your Windmill is dwindled into a Nut-cracker.
Your Wits are gone a Wool-gathering.
Youth and white Paper take any Impression.6067 Zeal is by no Means the same with Fury and Rage.
Zeal is fit only for Wise Men; but is found mostly in Fools.
Zeal without Knowledge is Fire without Light.
Zeal without Prudence is Phrenzy.
Zeal, when it is a Virtue, is a dangerous one.6072 He that goes out with often Loss, Comes Home at last by weeping Cross.
If you would live for ever, You must wash the Milk off your Liver.
Who spends more than he should, Shall not have to spend, when he would.
When you are Anvil, hold you still; When you are Hammer, strike your Fill.
My Son is my Son, till he have got him a Wife; But my Daughter's my Daughter all the Days of her Life.
If a Man but knew what would be dear, He need be a Merchant, but only one Year.
Children and Chicken Must be always picking.
Eat at Pleasure, Drink in Measure.
Early to go to Bed, and early to rise, Will make a Man Healthy, Wealthy and Wise.
Find you without Excuse, And find an Hare without a Muse.
Enough's as good as a Feast, To one that's not a Beast.
Truth may be blamed, But cannot be shamed.
If you trust before y ou try, You may repent before you die.
If Youth knew what Age would crave,  It would both get and save. 
If Things were to be done twice, All would be wise. 
He that will steal a Pin, Will steal a better Thing. 
He must needs swim, That is held up by the Chin. 
To borrow upon Usury Bringeth on Beggary. 
Time fleeth away, Without Delay. 
Trash and Trumpery,  Is the Way to Beggary.  
Spend, And God will send.  
Good take-heed  Doth surely speed.  
He that would thrive,  Must rise by Five;  He that hath thriven,  May lie till Seven.  
Two Cats and one Mouse.  Two Wives in one Houses,  Two Dogs at one Bone,  Can never agree in one.  
Wars Bring Scars. 
Wide will wear,  But narrow will tear.  
If Wishes would bide,  Beggars would ride.  
Help, Hands; For I have no Lands.  
Harm watch, Harm catch. 
The more you heap,  The worse you cheap.  9102 Of Saving Cometh Having. 
A Friend in Need  Is a Friend in Deed.  
One God; no more:  But Friends good Store.  
Not God above,  Gets all Men's Love.  
What God will,  No Frost can kill.  
Early Sow, Early Mow. 
The longer East,  The longer West. 
Want makes Strife,  Between the good Man and his Wife. 
In the Forehead and the Eye, The Lecture of the Mind doth lie. 
As a Man is friended,  So the Law is ended.  
There's not so bad a Jill, But there's as bad a Will.  
The Frog Cannot out of her Bog.  
Giving much to the Poor  Increaseth a Man's Store.  
A Belly full of Gluttony Will never study willingly.  
Speak what you will,  An ill Man will turn it ill.  
What Soberness conceals, Drunkenness reveals.  
Soon crooks the Tree,  That good Gambrel would be.  
Fair in the Cradle,  And foul in the Saddle.  
Common Fame Is mostly to blame.  
As the Fool thinks,  So the Bell clinks.  
Much Bruit, Little Fruit. 
Money's better  Than my Lord's Letter.  
What cannot be cured,  Must be endured. 
Nothing's a Man's truly, But what he came by duly.  
April-Showers  Bring May-Flowers.  
A March-Whisker,  Is never a good Fisher.  
They that have no other Meat, Bread and Butter are glad to eat. 
Who buys, Had need of an hundred Eyes;  But one's enough, For him that sells the Stuff.  
Fain would the Cat Fish eat, But she's loth her Feet to wet. 
When the Cat is away,  The Mice may play.  
Be the Day never so long, At length cometh Even-song.  
March borrows of April  Three Days, and they be ill.  
April borrows of March again Three Days of Wind and Rain.  
The first Day of April,  You may send a Fool whither you will. 
The third Day of April,  Comes in the Cuckow and Nightingale. 
March-Winds and May-Sun  Make Cloaths white, and Maids dun. 
A Winter's Thunder  Is a Summer's Wonder.  
A Cherry Year,  A merry Year: A Plumb Year, A dumb Year. 
As the Day lengthens,  So the Cold strengthens.  
If you would a good Hedge have, Carry the Leaves to the Grave. 
If St. Paul be fair and clear, Then betides a happy Year;  If the Wind do blow aloft,  Then of Wars we shall hear full oft; If the Clouds make dark the Sky, Great store of People then will die; If there be either Snow or Rain, Then will be dear all sorts of Grain. 
Sow Beans in the Mud,  And they'll grow like Wood.  
A kindly good Janiveer  Freezeth the Pot by the Feere. 
To rip up old Sores,  And cast up old Scores.  
As your Wedding Ring wears, You'll wear off your Cares.  
If Grass look green in Janiveer, 'Twill look the worser all the Year. 
March in Janiveer,  Janiveer in March I fear.  
Who in Janiveer sows Oats. Gets Gold and Groats;  Who sows in May, Gets little that Way.  
February fill Dike,  Be it black, or be it white,  But if it be white,  It's the better to like.  
All the Months in the Year, Curse a fair Februeer.  
You should upon Candlemas day Throw Candle and Candlestick away. 
He that will not when he may, When he will, he shall have Nay. 
Wishers, and Woulders,  Are never good House-holders.  
The Difference is very wide, That the Sheets will not decide. 
Farewell, Frost:  Nothing got, nor nothing lost. 
That's a Lie with a Latchet; All the Dogs in the Town cannot match it. 
You may as soon  Make a Cloak for the Moon.  
Much matter Of a wooden Platter.  
A Man of Words, and not of Deeds, Is like a Garden full of Weeds. 
Good Weight, and Measure, Is Heaven's Treasure.  
The Receiver Is as bad as the Thiever.  
Before St. Chad,  Every Goose lays both good and bad. 
To the Wise A Word may suffice.  
Words are but Wind,  But Blows unkind.  
Words are but Sands;  Its Money buys Lands,  
In Space Comes Grace. 
Ever spare, And ever bare. 
Great Spenders  Are bad Lenders. 
Tho' I am bitten,  I am not all eaten.  
No Vice Like Avarice. 
Who so blind as he,  That will not see?  
A little Pot Is soon hot. 
Store Is no Sore. 
Essex-Stiles,  Kentish-Miles, Norfolk-Wiles, Many Men beguiles.  
The Postern Door  Makes Thief and Whore.  
After a Delay,  Comes a Stay. 
Sure bind, Sure find. 
Old Young, And old Long. 
Fill what you will,  And drink what you fill.  
Patch by Patch is good Housewifery, But Patch upon Patch plain Beggary. 
He that will live in Peace and Rest, Must hear, and see; and speak the best. 
Fair Words never break a Bone, Foul Words have broke many a one. 
Like Blood, like Goods, and like Age, Make the happiest Marriage.  
Marry in Haste, and repent at Leisure; It's good to marry late, or never. 
When the Fern is as high as a Spoon, You may sleep an Hour at Noon. 
He that lets his Horse drink at every Lake,  And his Wife go to every Wake;  Shall never have a good Horse, Nor a good Wife, which is worse. 
Almost, and hard by,  Saves many a Lie.  
An easy Fool Is a Knave's Tool.  
A cool May and a Windy  Barn filleth up finely.  
May come early, come late, 'Twill make the Cow to quake.  
An hot May, as I have heard, Maketh a fat Church-yard.  
Leave not off a Clout,  Till May be out. 
A May-Flood Never did good. 
Shear your Sheep in May, And clear them all away.  
A swarm of Bees in May,  Is worth a Load of Hay;  But a Swarm in July,  Is not worth a Fly.  
Be sure of Hay,  Till the End of May.  
When April blows his Horn, It's good for Hay and Corn:  
April-Flood Carries away the Frog and her Brood. 
When the Cuckow comes to the bare Thorn,  Sell your Cow, and buy you Corn: But when she comes to the full Bit, Sell your Corn and buy you Sheep. 
'Tis said from the twelfth of May, To the twelfth of July, all is Day. 
Be it Weal, or be it Woe, Beans should blow before May go. 
Look at your Corn in May, And you'll come weeping away;  Look at the same in June,  And you'll come home in another Tune. 
If on the eighth of June it rain, It foretels a wet Harvest, Men Sain. 
Never rued the Man,  That laid in his Fewel before St. John. 
Barnaby bright;  The longest Day and the shortest Night. 
Calm Weather in June  Sets Corn in Tune.  
No Tempest, good July;  Lest Corn come off bluely.  
Dry August and warm  Doth Harvest no harm.  
St. Bartholomew  Brings cold Dew. 
At St. Matthee,  Shut up the Bee. 
St. Matthew Brings on the cold Dew.  
No Weather's ill,  If the Wind be still.  
September, blow soft,  Till the Fruit's in the Loft.  
A Michelmas-rot  Comes ne're in the Pot.  
Foolish Pity  Ruins a City. 
On Lady day the Latter,  The Cold comes on the Water.  
Good October, a good Blast, To blow the Hog Acorn and Mast. 
Often drunk, and seldom sober, Falls like the Leaves in October. 
On St. Luke's Day,  The Oxen have Leave to play.  
November, take Flail,  Let Ships no more sail.  
Lucie Light,  The shortest Day and longest Night. 
When the Wind's in the West, The Weather is at the best.  
When the Wind is in the East, It's good for neither Man nor Beast. 
When the Wind is in the South, It's in the Rain's Mouth.  
When the Wind is in the South, It blows the Bait into the Fish's Mouth. 
Tho' old and wise,  Yet still advise.  
The liquorish Cat  Gets many a Rap. 
Coblers and Tinkers  Are the best Ale drinkers.  
Diversity of Humours  Breedeth Tumours.  
Brabling Curs  Ne'er want sore Ears.  
Hey! ninny nonny!  One Fool makes many.  
The fewer his Years,  The fewer his Tears.  
He giveth twice,  That gives in a trice.  
A Man of Gladness  Seldom falls into Madness.  
No Lock will hold,  Against the Power of Gold.  
Itch, and Ease,  Can no Man please.  
A Suit at Law, and a Urinal, Bring a Man to the Hospital.  
The Life of Man is a Winter's Day And a Winter's Way.  
He is not a Merchant bare, That hath Money-worth, and Ware. 
He that once a good Name gets, May piss abed, and say he sweats. 
Nothing crave,  Nothing have. 
Let no Woman's Painting  Breed thy Heart's fainting.  
A Man without Reason  Is a Beast in Season.  
A good Recorder  Sets all in Order.  
Well to work, and make a Fire, It doth Skill and Care require. 
Good Words, without Deeds, Are Rushes and Reeds.  
The more Years you have,  The nearer your Grave.  
An Ague in the Spring  Is Physick for a King.  
An Apple, an Egg, and a Nut, You may eat after a Slut.  
After Dinner, sit a while: After Supper, walk a Mile.  
Good Keal Is half a Meal. 
He that would live for Aye, Must eat Butter and Sage in May, 
The Father to the Bough;  The Son to the Plough.  
The Head and Feet keep warm; The rest will take no harm.  
The Air of a Window,  Is as the Stroak of a Cross-bow. 
Follow Love, and it will flee; Flee Love, and it will follow thee. 
Whom love we best,  To them we can say least.  
He that loves Glass without G, Take away L, and that is he.  
Wedlock Is a Padlock. 
Blessed is the Eye,  That is between Severn and Wye. 
Many an one for Land,  Takes a Fool by the Hand.  
Canting and Wooing,  Brings Dallying, and Doing.  
Happy's the wooing,  That's not long a doing.  
He that would the Daughter win, Must with the Mother first begin. 
Wives must be had;  Be they good, or bad.  
A nice Wife, and a back Door, Do often make a rich Man poor. 
Free of her Lips,  Free of her Hips.  
Beggars breed;  And rich Men feed.  
Little said, soon amended. Little Money, soon spended.  
One Wit bought,  Is worth two for nought.6273 Pride and Grace  Dwell never in one Place.  
Some have Hap;  And some stick in the Gap.  
Well sees the Mouse  That the Cat's out of the House. 
Up-hill spare me;  ⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀(an Horse) Down-hill forbear me,  Plain Way, spare me not;  Let me not drink, when I am hot. 
We will bear with the Stink, If it bring but in Chink.  
Hell will never have its due, Till it have you.  
He's up too soon.  That's hang'd e're Noon.  
Nothing is a Man's truly,  That he cometh not by duly,  
A Belly, that's us'd to be full, Makes an empty Skull.  
Often Might Overcomes Right. 
Company in Distress  Make the Sorrow less.  
I stout, and thou stout;  Who mall carry the Dirt out?  
Good Health Is infinitely above Wealth.  
Bring something, Lass, along with thee,  If thou intend to live with me. 
An old Cart, well used,  May last out a new one abused. 
All shall be well,  And Jack shall have Jill.  
By Tre, Pol, and Pen,  You may know the Cornish Men.  
Meer Wishes Are silly Fishes.  
A Stitch in Time  May save nine. 
Grace will last;  Beauty will blast.  
Is I can't by Might,  I'll do't by Slight.  
Well begun Is half done. 
Birds of a Feather  Flock together. 
He that is a Blab,  Is a meer Scab. 
Great boast,  Small Roast. 
He that wears black,  Must hang a Brush at his Back. 
When good Cheer is lacking, Our Friends will be packing.  
Salt Cooks bear blame,  But fresh Cooks Shame.  
He's a wise Man, who  When he's well, can hold him so. 
He that will cheat at Play, Will cheat you any Way.  
He that speaks the Thing he should not,  Shall hear the Thing he would not. 
He's a wise Man, who  Can make a Friend of a Foe.  
He that would no Evil do,  Must do nought that's like thereto. 
Blow the Wind never so fast, It will fall at last.  
Be thou Weal, or be thou Woe, Thou shalt not be always so.  
He that comes last  Makes all fast. 
While the Leg warmeth,  The Boot harmeth.  
Better see a Clout,  Than a Hole out. 
A Friend in Court  Makes the Process short.  
A Man is Weal, or Woe;  As he thinks himself so.  
A good Wife, and Health,  Is a Man's best Wealth.  
A borrowed Loan  Should come laughing Home.  
Take-Heed Is a good Read. 
Look not too high,  Lest a Chip fall in your Eye.  
He that doth lend,  Will lose Money and Friend.  
Many a Little  Make a Mickle. 
Little Stroaks  Fell great Oaks. 
Man proposes;  God disposes. 
Measure's A Treasure. 
No Joy, Without Annoy, 
New Honours Change Manners. 
What greater Crime  Than loss of Time?  
The Cow little giveth,  That hardly liveth.  
Let Uterpendragon do what he can, The River Eden will run as it ran. 
A little House well fill'd, A little Land well till'd;  And a little Wife well will'd. 
Four Farthings, and a Thimble, Make a Taylor's Pocket jingle. 
In Truth they must not eat, That will not work in Heat.  
He that has in his Purse no Money, Had need have in his Mouth Honey. 
Where the Horse lies down, There some Hair will be found. 
He's like Marten;  The more Knave, the better Fortune. 
You are a Fool to steal;  Unless you can conceal.  
He that goes a Borrowing,  Goes a Sorrowing.  
Graft good Fruit all,  Or graft not at all.  
Who Dainties love,  Beggars shall prove.  
At the first Hand buy,  At the third let lye.  
Who nothing save,  Shall nothing have.  
By Hawk and by Hound,  Small Profit is found.  
Some come, some go;  This Life is so. 
All's Fish they get,  That cometh to Net.  
An old Nought  Will never be ought.  
One Man's Breath  Is another Man's Death.  
One doth Harm,  And another bears the Blame.  
Too late to spare,  When the Bottom is bare.  
Better one House well fill'd, Than two Houses spill'd.  
To the Grave with the Dead; And let them that live, to the Bread. 
He that Mischief hatcheth, Mischief catcheth.  
A Man can never thrive,  Who hath a wastful Wife.  
'Tis the Farmer's Care,  That makes the Field bear.  
Do not trust nor contend,  Nor lay Wagers, nor lend,  And you'll have Peace to your Live's end. 
Pay what you owe;  And what you're worth you'll know. 
To give and to have,  Doth a Brain crave.  
Excess of Delight  Palls Appetite. 
Wise Fear Begets Care. 
A cold April  The Barn will fill.  
Leave a Jest,  When it pleases you best.  
A crackt Bell  Can never found well.  
Advice whisper'd in the Ear Is not worth a Tare.  
Without Pains,  No Gains. 
Patience with Poverty  Is a poor Man's Remedy.  
He that cannot pay,  Let him pray. 
There is never any Cake,  But there's some of the same Make. 
Shameless Pray,  Must have shameless Nay.  
Sudden Acquaintance  Brings long Repentance.  
Sorrow, and an evil Life,  Maketh soon an old Wife.  
He that speaks Lavishly,  Shall hear as Knavishly.  
Sluggards guise,  Loth to go to Bed, and loth to rise. 
Better are small Fish  Than an empty Dish.  
Sometimes Words  Hurt more than Swords.  
Account not that Slavery,  That brings in Penny Savoury.  
All Work, and no Play,  Makes Jack a dull Boy.  
Penny and Penny,  Laid up, will be many.  
He can ill pipe,  That wants his upper Lip.  
'Tis Plenty,  That makes you dainty.  
It's merry in the Hall,  When Beards wag all.  
One Year a Nurse,  And seven the worse.  
Linnen often to Water,  Soon to tatter. 
Of young Men die many,  Of old Men scape not any.  
Birchen Twigs  Break no Ribs. 
At Candlemas,  The Cold comes to us.  
An Ape is ne'er so like an Ape As when he wears a Doctor's Cap. 
Who will not lay up a Penny, Shall never have many.  
He that would please all, and himself too,  Undertakes what none could ever do. 
He that by the Plow would thrive, Himself must either hold, or drive. 
There's nothing agrees worse, Than a Prince's Heart, and a Beggar's Purse.  
Be it better, or be it worse, Be ruled by him that bears the Purse. 
In vain doth the Mill clack, If the Miller his Hearing lack. 
If one but knew how good it were, To eat a Pullet in Janivere,  If he had twenty in a Flock,  He'd leave but one to go with the Cock. 
A Bushel of March-Dust is a Thing, That's worth the Ransom of a King. 
An Ape's an Ape: a Varlet's a Varlet, Tho' they be clad in Silk or Scarlet. 
The Counsels that are given in Wine, Will do no good to thee, or thine. 
When all is gone, and nothing left, What avails the Dagger, with Dudgeon Haft? 
In times of Prosperity Friends will be plenty.  In time of Adversity not one in twenty. 9395 A Maid oft seen; and a Gown oft worn, Are disesteem'd; and held in scorn. 
Before thou marry,  Make sure of an House wherein to tarry. 
Who more than he is worth doth spend, He makes a Rope his Life to end. 
A thousand Pounds, and a Bottle of Hay,  Is all one at Dooms-Day.  
If the Partridge had the Woodcock's Thigh,  'Twould be the best Bird that ever did fly. 
The Love of a Woman, and a Bottle of Wine,  Are sweet for a Season; but last a short Time.  
Be always as merry as ever you can; For no Man delights in a sorrowful Man. 
He that woos a Maid must come seldom in her Sight,  But he that woos a Widow, must woo her Day and Night.  
A Woman, a Spaniel, and a Walnut Tree, The more they're beaten, the better they be.  
There is no Mischief in the World done,  But a Woman is always one.  
A wicked Woman, and an Evil, Is three half-pence worse than the Devil. 
He that is needy, when he is married, Shall not be rich when he is buried. 
As the Goodman saith, so say we: But as the Goodwife saith, so it must be. 
Fair and foolish, black and proud; Long and lazy: little and loud. 
Maidens must be mild and meek; Swift to hear, and slow to speak. 
Remember Man and keep in Mind, A faithful Friend is hard to find. 
The more Haste, the worse Speed; Quoth the Taylor to his long Thread. 
The good, or ill hap of a good, or ill Life.  Is the good or ill Choice of a good or ill Wife.  
When I did well, I heard it never; When I did ill, I heard it ever. 
When the Fool finds a Horse-shoe, He thinks always so to do.  
Women, and Wine, Game, and Deceit, Make the Wealth small, and the Wants great. 
If Men would make haste when afoot, They need not put their Horses to't. 
What raging rashly is begun, Challengeth Shame, before half done. 
They that worship God meerly for Fear, Would worship the Devil too, if he appear. 
The higher the Plumb-tree, the riper the Plumb;  The richer the Cobler, the blacker his Thumb.  
When Adam delv'd, and Eve span, Pray where was then the Gentleman? 
He that buys Land, buys many Stones; He that buys Flesh, buys many Bones: He that buys Eggs, buys many Shells; But he that buys Ale, buys nothing else. 
Our Fathers who were wondrous wise, Did wash their Throats, before their Eyes. 
Break Coals; cut Candle; set Brand an end,  Neither good Housewife, nor good Housewife's Friend.  
No more Mortar, no more Brick: A crafty Knave has a cunning Trick. 
It would make a Man scratch where it doth not itch,  To see a Man live poor to die rich. 
He that hath more Smocks, than Shirts in a Bucking;  Had need be a Man of a good fore-looking. 
Money we want, and cannot borrow; Yet drink we must, to slacken Sorrow. 
Cold Broth hot again, that loved I never;  Old Love renew'd again, that loved I ever. 
Great Wits to Madness, sure, are near allyed,  And thin Partitions do their Bounds divide. 
Like Dogs that snarl about a Bone; And play together when they've none. 
He that gets Money before he gets Wit, Will be but a short while Master of it. 
His Wit got Wings, and would have flown;  But Poverty still kept him down, 
He has Wit at Will,  That with an angry Heart can hold him still.  
He that spends all upon a Whore, Both Shame and Sorrow must endure. 
It's God that feeds the Crows, That neither tills, harrows, nor sows. 
Know when to spend, and when to spare, And yon need not be busy; you'll ne'er be bare.  
The Tricks a Colt gets at his first breaking,  Will, whilst he liveth, never be lacking. 
He that leaves Certainty, and sticks to Chance,  When Fools pipe, he may dance. 
It's a good Horse that never stumbles; And a good Wife that never grumbles. 
The best Horse needs breaking; And the aptest Child needs teaching. 
He that buys a House ready wrought, Has many a Pin and Nail for nought. 
He that buys Lawn before he can fold it,  Shall repent him before he have sold it. 
Look well before you leap; For Snakes among the Flowers creep. 
He that will meddle with all Things, May go shoe the Goslings.  
If a Woman were as little as she is good;  A Peascod would make her a Gown and a Hood. 
Say well, and Do well, end with a Letter:  Say well is good; but Do well is better. 
Who goes more bare,  Than the Shoemaker's Wife; and the Smith's Mare!  
Who doth sing so merry a Note, As the Cobler, that cannot change a Groat! 
Good riding at two Anchors, Men have told;  For if one break, t'other may hold. 
The World was never so dull still, But if one won't another will. 
I wote well how the World wags; He is most lov'd, that hath most Bags. 
When the Cat winketh,  Little wots the Mouse, what the Cat thinketh.  
They that cobble and clout, Shall have work, when others go without. 
Who gives away Goods, before he be dead,  You should take a Beetle, and knock him at Head.  
Give a Child all he shall crave, And a Dog while his Tail doth wave; And you'll have a fair Dog, and foul Knave. 
It's hard to split the Hair, That nothing is wanted, and nothing to spare.  
He that winketh with one Eye, and seeth with t'other, I would not trust him, tho' he were my Brother.  
He that still gapeth, till he be fed, Well may he gape, untill he be dead. 
Tell me with whom thou goest, And I'll tell thee what thou doest. 
He that hears much, and speaks not all,  Shall be welcome both in Bower and Hall. 
Had I revenged every Wrong, I had not worn my Skirts so long. 
Many talk of Robin-Hood, that never shot in his Bow,  And many talk of little-John, that never did him know.  
Better ride, when Saddles do lack, On a Pad than on a bare Horse's Back. 
He that hath but little, he shall have less,  And he that hath right nought, right nought shall possess. 
If St. Swithin weep, that Year, the Proverb says,  The Weather will be foul for forty Days. 
If the first of July, it be rainy Weather,  'Twill rain more, or less, for four Weeks together.  
A Shower in July, when the Corn begins to fill,  Is worth a Plow of Oxen, and all belongs there till.  
Till St. James's Day be come and gone, You may have Hops, or you may have none. 
Is the twenty fourth of August be fair and clear,  Than hope for a prosperous Autumn that Year.  
When a Musician has forgot his Note, He makes as though a Crumb stuck in his Throat.  
Nothing more smooth than Glass, yet nothing more brittle; Nothing more fine than Wit, yet nothing more fickle.  
March balkham,  Comes in like a Lion, goes out like a Lamb. 
So many Mists as in March you see, So many Frosts in May will be. 
March many-Weathers rain'd and blow'd, But March Grass never did good. 
A Peck of March-Dust, and a Shower in May,  Makes the Corn green and the Fields gay. 
If you will have good Cheese, and have old,  You must turn him seven times, before he is cold.  
When Elder is white, brew and bake a Peck,  When Elder is black, brew and bake a Sack. 
Winter's Thunder and Summer's Flood, Never boded Englishman good,  
The Pigeon never knoweth Woe, But when she doth a benting go. 
This Rule in Gardening never forget, To sow dry, and set wet.  
When the Slow-Tree is as white as a Sheet.  Sow your Barley, whether it be dry or wet. 
If Janiveer's Calends be summerly gay,6273 Pride and Grace Dwell never in one Place.  
Some have Hap;  And some stick in the Gap.  
Well sees the Mouse  That the Cat's out of the House. 
Up-hill spare me;  ⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀(an Horse) Down-hill forbear me,  Plain Way, spare me not;  Let me not drink, when I am hot. 
We will bear with the Stink, If it bring but in Chink.  
Hell will never have its due, Till it have you.  
He's up too soon.  That's hang'd e're Noon.  
Nothing is a Man's truly,  That he cometh not by duly,  
A Belly, that's us'd to be full, Makes an empty Skull.  
Often Might Overcomes Right. 
Company in Distress  Make the Sorrow less.  
I stout, and thou stout;  Who mall carry the Dirt out?  
Good Health Is infinitely above Wealth.  
Bring something, Lass, along with thee,  If thou intend to live with me. 
An old Cart, well used,  May last out a new one abused. 
All shall be well,  And Jack shall have Jill.  
By Tre, Pol, and Pen,  You may know the Cornish Men.  
Meer Wishes Are silly Fishes.  
A Stitch in Time  May save nine. 
Grace will last;  Beauty will blast.  
Is I can't by Might,  I'll do't by Slight.  
Well begun Is half done. 
Birds of a Feather  Flock together. 
He that is a Blab,  Is a meer Scab. 
Great boast,  Small Roast. 
He that wears black,  Must hang a Brush at his Back. 
When good Cheer is lacking, Our Friends will be packing.  
Salt Cooks bear blame,  But fresh Cooks Shame.  
He's a wise Man, who  When he's well, can hold him so. 
He that will cheat at Play, Will cheat you any Way.  
He that speaks the Thing he should not,  Shall hear the Thing he would not. 
He's a wise Man, who  Can make a Friend of a Foe.  
He that would no Evil do,  Must do nought that's like thereto. 
Blow the Wind never so fast, It will fall at last.  
Be thou Weal, or be thou Woe, Thou shalt not be always so.  
He that comes last  Makes all fast. 
While the Leg warmeth,  The Boot harmeth.  
Better see a Clout,  Than a Hole out. 
A Friend in Court  Makes the Process short.  
A Man is Weal, or Woe;  As he thinks himself so.  
A good Wife, and Health,  Is a Man's best Wealth.  
A borrowed Loan  Should come laughing Home.  
Take-Heed Is a good Read. 
Look not too high,  Lest a Chip fall in your Eye.  
He that doth lend,  Will lose Money and Friend.  
Many a Little  Make a Mickle. 
Little Stroaks  Fell great Oaks. 
Man proposes;  God disposes. 
Measure's A Treasure. 
No Joy, Without Annoy, 
New Honours Change Manners. 
What greater Crime  Than loss of Time?  
The Cow little giveth,  That hardly liveth.  
Let Uterpendragon do what he can, The River Eden will run as it ran. 
A little House well fill'd, A little Land well till'd;  And a little Wife well will'd. 
Four Farthings, and a Thimble, Make a Taylor's Pocket jingle. 
In Truth they must not eat, That will not work in Heat.  
He that has in his Purse no Money, Had need have in his Mouth Honey. 
Where the Horse lies down, There some Hair will be found. 
He's like Marten;  The more Knave, the better Fortune. 
You are a Fool to steal;  Unless you can conceal.  
He that goes a Borrowing,  Goes a Sorrowing.  
Graft good Fruit all,  Or graft not at all.  
Who Dainties love,  Beggars shall prove.  
At the first Hand buy,  At the third let lye.  
Who nothing save,  Shall nothing have.  
By Hawk and by Hound,  Small Profit is found.  
Some come, some go;  This Life is so. 
All's Fish they get,  That cometh to Net.  
An old Nought  Will never be ought.  
One Man's Breath  Is another Man's Death.  
One doth Harm,  And another bears the Blame.  
Too late to spare,  When the Bottom is bare.  
Better one House well fill'd, Than two Houses spill'd.  
To the Grave with the Dead; And let them that live, to the Bread. 
He that Mischief hatcheth, Mischief catcheth.  
A Man can never thrive,  Who hath a wastful Wife.  
'Tis the Farmer's Care,  That makes the Field bear.  
Do not trust nor contend,  Nor lay Wagers, nor lend,  And you'll have Peace to your Live's end. 
Pay what you owe;  And what you're worth you'll know. 
To give and to have,  Doth a Brain crave.  
Excess of Delight  Palls Appetite. 
Wise Fear Begets Care. 
A cold April  The Barn will fill.  
Leave a Jest,  When it pleases you best.  
A crackt Bell  Can never found well.  
Advice whisper'd in the Ear Is not worth a Tare.  
Without Pains,  No Gains. 
Patience with Poverty  Is a poor Man's Remedy.  
He that cannot pay,  Let him pray. 
There is never any Cake,  But there's some of the same Make. 
Shameless Pray,  Must have shameless Nay.  
Sudden Acquaintance  Brings long Repentance.  
Sorrow, and an evil Life,  Maketh soon an old Wife.  
He that speaks Lavishly,  Shall hear as Knavishly.  
Sluggards guise,  Loth to go to Bed, and loth to rise. 
Better are small Fish  Than an empty Dish.  
Sometimes Words  Hurt more than Swords.  
Account not that Slavery,  That brings in Penny Savoury.  
All Work, and no Play,  Makes Jack a dull Boy.  
Penny and Penny,  Laid up, will be many.  
He can ill pipe,  That wants his upper Lip.  
'Tis Plenty,  That makes you dainty.  
It's merry in the Hall,  When Beards wag all.  
One Year a Nurse,  And seven the worse.  
Linnen often to Water,  Soon to tatter. 
Of young Men die many,  Of old Men scape not any.  
Birchen Twigs  Break no Ribs. 
At Candlemas,  The Cold comes to us.  
An Ape is ne'er so like an Ape As when he wears a Doctor's Cap. 
Who will not lay up a Penny, Shall never have many.  
He that would please all, and himself too,  Undertakes what none could ever do. 
He that by the Plow would thrive, Himself must either hold, or drive. 
There's nothing agrees worse, Than a Prince's Heart, and a Beggar's Purse.  
Be it better, or be it worse, Be ruled by him that bears the Purse. 
In vain doth the Mill clack, If the Miller his Hearing lack. 
If one but knew how good it were, To eat a Pullet in Janivere,  If he had twenty in a Flock,  He'd leave but one to go with the Cock. 
A Bushel of March-Dust is a Thing, That's worth the Ransom of a King. 
An Ape's an Ape: a Varlet's a Varlet, Tho' they be clad in Silk or Scarlet. 
The Counsels that are given in Wine, Will do no good to thee, or thine. 
When all is gone, and nothing left, What avails the Dagger, with Dudgeon Haft? 
In times of Prosperity Friends will be plenty.  In time of Adversity not one in twenty. 9395 A Maid oft seen; and a Gown oft worn, Are disesteem'd; and held in scorn. 
Before thou marry,  Make sure of an House wherein to tarry. 
Who more than he is worth doth spend, He makes a Rope his Life to end. 
A thousand Pounds, and a Bottle of Hay,  Is all one at Dooms-Day.  
If the Partridge had the Woodcock's Thigh,  'Twould be the best Bird that ever did fly. 
The Love of a Woman, and a Bottle of Wine,  Are sweet for a Season; but last a short Time.  
Be always as merry as ever you can; For no Man delights in a sorrowful Man. 
He that woos a Maid must come seldom in her Sight,  But he that woos a Widow, must woo her Day and Night.  
A Woman, a Spaniel, and a Walnut Tree, The more they're beaten, the better they be.  
There is no Mischief in the World done,  But a Woman is always one.  
A wicked Woman, and an Evil, Is three half-pence worse than the Devil. 
He that is needy, when he is married, Shall not be rich when he is buried. 
As the Goodman saith, so say we: But as the Goodwife saith, so it must be. 
Fair and foolish, black and proud; Long and lazy: little and loud. 
Maidens must be mild and meek; Swift to hear, and slow to speak. 
Remember Man and keep in Mind, A faithful Friend is hard to find. 
The more Haste, the worse Speed; Quoth the Taylor to his long Thread. 
The good, or ill hap of a good, or ill Life.  Is the good or ill Choice of a good or ill Wife.  
When I did well, I heard it never; When I did ill, I heard it ever. 
When the Fool finds a Horse-shoe, He thinks always so to do.  
Women, and Wine, Game, and Deceit, Make the Wealth small, and the Wants great. 
If Men would make haste when afoot, They need not put their Horses to't. 
What raging rashly is begun, Challengeth Shame, before half done. 
They that worship God meerly for Fear, Would worship the Devil too, if he appear. 
The higher the Plumb-tree, the riper the Plumb;  The richer the Cobler, the blacker his Thumb.  
When Adam delv'd, and Eve span, Pray where was then the Gentleman? 
He that buys Land, buys many Stones; He that buys Flesh, buys many Bones: He that buys Eggs, buys many Shells; But he that buys Ale, buys nothing else. 
Our Fathers who were wondrous wise, Did wash their Throats, before their Eyes. 
Break Coals; cut Candle; set Brand an end,  Neither good Housewife, nor good Housewife's Friend.  
No more Mortar, no more Brick: A crafty Knave has a cunning Trick. 
It would make a Man scratch where it doth not itch,  To see a Man live poor to die rich. 
He that hath more Smocks, than Shirts in a Bucking;  Had need be a Man of a good fore-looking. 
Money we want, and cannot borrow; Yet drink we must, to slacken Sorrow. 
Cold Broth hot again, that loved I never;  Old Love renew'd again, that loved I ever. 
Great Wits to Madness, sure, are near allyed,  And thin Partitions do their Bounds divide. 
Like Dogs that snarl about a Bone; And play together when they've none. 
He that gets Money before he gets Wit, Will be but a short while Master of it. 
His Wit got Wings, and would have flown;  But Poverty still kept him down, 
He has Wit at Will,  That with an angry Heart can hold him still.  
He that spends all upon a Whore, Both Shame and Sorrow must endure. 
It's God that feeds the Crows, That neither tills, harrows, nor sows. 
Know when to spend, and when to spare, And yon need not be busy; you'll ne'er be bare.  
The Tricks a Colt gets at his first breaking,  Will, whilst he liveth, never be lacking. 
He that leaves Certainty, and sticks to Chance,  When Fools pipe, he may dance. 
It's a good Horse that never stumbles; And a good Wife that never grumbles. 
The best Horse needs breaking; And the aptest Child needs teaching. 
He that buys a House ready wrought, Has many a Pin and Nail for nought. 
He that buys Lawn before he can fold it,  Shall repent him before he have sold it. 
Look well before you leap; For Snakes among the Flowers creep. 
He that will meddle with all Things, May go shoe the Goslings.  
If a Woman were as little as she is good;  A Peascod would make her a Gown and a Hood. 
Say well, and Do well, end with a Letter:  Say well is good; but Do well is better. 
Who goes more bare,  Than the Shoemaker's Wife; and the Smith's Mare!  
Who doth sing so merry a Note, As the Cobler, that cannot change a Groat! 
Good riding at two Anchors, Men have told;  For if one break, t'other may hold. 
The World was never so dull still, But if one won't another will. 
I wote well how the World wags; He is most lov'd, that hath most Bags. 
When the Cat winketh,  Little wots the Mouse, what the Cat thinketh.  
They that cobble and clout, Shall have work, when others go without. 
Who gives away Goods, before he be dead,  You should take a Beetle, and knock him at Head.  
Give a Child all he shall crave, And a Dog while his Tail doth wave; And you'll have a fair Dog, and foul Knave. 
It's hard to split the Hair, That nothing is wanted, and nothing to spare.  
He that winketh with one Eye, and seeth with t'other, I would not trust him, tho' he were my Brother.  
He that still gapeth, till he be fed, Well may he gape, untill he be dead. 
Tell me with whom thou goest, And I'll tell thee what thou doest. 
He that hears much, and speaks not all,  Shall be welcome both in Bower and Hall. 
Had I revenged every Wrong, I had not worn my Skirts so long. 
Many talk of Robin-Hood, that never shot in his Bow,  And many talk of little-John, that never did him know.  
Better ride, when Saddles do lack, On a Pad than on a bare Horse's Back. 
He that hath but little, he shall have less,  And he that hath right nought, right nought shall possess. 
If St. Swithin weep, that Year, the Proverb says,  The Weather will be foul for forty Days. 
If the first of July, it be rainy Weather,  'Twill rain more, or less, for four Weeks together.  
A Shower in July, when the Corn begins to fill,  Is worth a Plow of Oxen, and all belongs there till.  
Till St. James's Day be come and gone, You may have Hops, or you may have none. 
Is the twenty fourth of August be fair and clear,  Than hope for a prosperous Autumn that Year.  
When a Musician has forgot his Note, He makes as though a Crumb stuck in his Throat.  
Nothing more smooth than Glass, yet nothing more brittle; Nothing more fine than Wit, yet nothing more fickle.  
March balkham,  Comes in like a Lion, goes out like a Lamb. 
So many Mists as in March you see, So many Frosts in May will be. 
March many-Weathers rain'd and blow'd, But March Grass never did good. 
A Peck of March-Dust, and a Shower in May,  Makes the Corn green and the Fields gay. 
If you will have good Cheese, and have old,  You must turn him seven times, before he is cold.  
When Elder is white, brew and bake a Peck,  When Elder is black, brew and bake a Sack. 
Winter's Thunder and Summer's Flood, Never boded Englishman good,  
The Pigeon never knoweth Woe, But when she doth a benting go. 
This Rule in Gardening never forget, To sow dry, and set wet.  
When the Slow-Tree is as white as a Sheet.  Sow your Barley, whether it be dry or wet. 
If Janiveer's Calends be summerly gay, 
Pride and Grace  Dwell never in one Place.  
Some have Hap;  And some stick in the Gap.  
Well sees the Mouse  That the Cat's out of the House. 
Up-hill spare me;  ⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀⠀(an Horse) Down-hill forbear me,  Plain Way, spare me not;  Let me not drink, when I am hot. 
We will bear with the Stink, If it bring but in Chink.  
Hell will never have its due, Till it have you.  
He's up too soon.  That's hang'd e're Noon.  
Nothing is a Man's truly,  That he cometh not by duly,  
A Belly, that's us'd to be full, Makes an empty Skull.  
Often Might Overcomes Right. 
Company in Distress  Make the Sorrow less.  
I stout, and thou stout;  Who mall carry the Dirt out?  
Good Health Is infinitely above Wealth.  
Bring something, Lass, along with thee,  If thou intend to live with me. 
An old Cart, well used,  May last out a new one abused. 
All shall be well,  And Jack shall have Jill.  
By Tre, Pol, and Pen,  You may know the Cornish Men.  
Meer Wishes Are silly Fishes.  
A Stitch in Time  May save nine. 
Grace will last;  Beauty will blast.  
Is I can't by Might,  I'll do't by Slight.  
Well begun Is half done. 
Birds of a Feather  Flock together. 
He that is a Blab,  Is a meer Scab. 
Great boast,  Small Roast. 
He that wears black,  Must hang a Brush at his Back. 
When good Cheer is lacking, Our Friends will be packing.  
Salt Cooks bear blame,  But fresh Cooks Shame.  
He's a wise Man, who  When he's well, can hold him so. 
He that will cheat at Play, Will cheat you any Way.  
He that speaks the Thing he should not,  Shall hear the Thing he would not. 
He's a wise Man, who  Can make a Friend of a Foe.  
He that would no Evil do,  Must do nought that's like thereto. 
Blow the Wind never so fast, It will fall at last.  
Be thou Weal, or be thou Woe, Thou shalt not be always so.  
He that comes last  Makes all fast. 
While the Leg warmeth,  The Boot harmeth.  
Better see a Clout,  Than a Hole out. 
A Friend in Court  Makes the Process short.  
A Man is Weal, or Woe;  As he thinks himself so.  
A good Wife, and Health,  Is a Man's best Wealth.  
A borrowed Loan  Should come laughing Home.  
Take-Heed Is a good Read. 
Look not too high,  Lest a Chip fall in your Eye.  
He that doth lend,  Will lose Money and Friend.  
Many a Little  Make a Mickle. 
Little Stroaks  Fell great Oaks. 
Man proposes;  God disposes. 
Measure's A Treasure. 
No Joy, Without Annoy, 
New Honours Change Manners. 
What greater Crime  Than loss of Time?  
The Cow little giveth,  That hardly liveth.  
Let Uterpendragon do what he can, The River Eden will run as it ran. 
A little House well fill'd, A little Land well till'd;  And a little Wife well will'd. 
Four Farthings, and a Thimble, Make a Taylor's Pocket jingle. 
In Truth they must not eat, That will not work in Heat.  
He that has in his Purse no Money, Had need have in his Mouth Honey. 
Where the Horse lies down, There some Hair will be found. 
He's like Marten;  The more Knave, the better Fortune. 
You are a Fool to steal;  Unless you can conceal.  
He that goes a Borrowing,  Goes a Sorrowing.  
Graft good Fruit all,  Or graft not at all.  
Who Dainties love,  Beggars shall prove.  
At the first Hand buy,  At the third let lye.  
Who nothing save,  Shall nothing have.  
By Hawk and by Hound,  Small Profit is found.  
Some come, some go;  This Life is so. 
All's Fish they get,  That cometh to Net.  
An old Nought  Will never be ought.  
One Man's Breath  Is another Man's Death.  
One doth Harm,  And another bears the Blame.  
Too late to spare,  When the Bottom is bare.  
Better one House well fill'd, Than two Houses spill'd.  
To the Grave with the Dead; And let them that live, to the Bread. 
He that Mischief hatcheth, Mischief catcheth.  
A Man can never thrive,  Who hath a wastful Wife.  
'Tis the Farmer's Care,  That makes the Field bear.  
Do not trust nor contend,  Nor lay Wagers, nor lend,  And you'll have Peace to your Live's end. 
Pay what you owe;  And what you're worth you'll know. 
To give and to have,  Doth a Brain crave.  
Excess of Delight  Palls Appetite. 
Wise Fear Begets Care. 
A cold April  The Barn will fill.  
Leave a Jest,  When it pleases you best.  
A crackt Bell  Can never found well.  
Advice whisper'd in the Ear Is not worth a Tare.  
Without Pains,  No Gains. 
Patience with Poverty  Is a poor Man's Remedy.  
He that cannot pay,  Let him pray. 
There is never any Cake,  But there's some of the same Make. 
Shameless Pray,  Must have shameless Nay.  
Sudden Acquaintance  Brings long Repentance.  
Sorrow, and an evil Life,  Maketh soon an old Wife.  
He that speaks Lavishly,  Shall hear as Knavishly.  
Sluggards guise,  Loth to go to Bed, and loth to rise. 
Better are small Fish  Than an empty Dish.  
Sometimes Words  Hurt more than Swords.  
Account not that Slavery,  That brings in Penny Savoury.  
All Work, and no Play,  Makes Jack a dull Boy.  
Penny and Penny,  Laid up, will be many.  
He can ill pipe,  That wants his upper Lip.  
'Tis Plenty,  That makes you dainty.  
It's merry in the Hall,  When Beards wag all.  
One Year a Nurse,  And seven the worse.  
Linnen often to Water,  Soon to tatter. 
Of young Men die many,  Of old Men scape not any.  
Birchen Twigs  Break no Ribs. 
At Candlemas,  The Cold comes to us.  
An Ape is ne'er so like an Ape As when he wears a Doctor's Cap. 
Who will not lay up a Penny, Shall never have many.  
He that would please all, and himself too,  Undertakes what none could ever do. 
He that by the Plow would thrive, Himself must either hold, or drive. 
There's nothing agrees worse, Than a Prince's Heart, and a Beggar's Purse.  
Be it better, or be it worse, Be ruled by him that bears the Purse. 
In vain doth the Mill clack, If the Miller his Hearing lack. 
If one but knew how good it were, To eat a Pullet in Janivere,  If he had twenty in a Flock,  He'd leave but one to go with the Cock. 
A Bushel of March-Dust is a Thing, That's worth the Ransom of a King. 
An Ape's an Ape: a Varlet's a Varlet, Tho' they be clad in Silk or Scarlet. 
The Counsels that are given in Wine, Will do no good to thee, or thine. 
When all is gone, and nothing left, What avails the Dagger, with Dudgeon Haft? 
In times of Prosperity Friends will be plenty.  In time of Adversity not one in twenty. 9395 A Maid oft seen; and a Gown oft worn, Are disesteem'd; and held in scorn. 
Before thou marry,  Make sure of an House wherein to tarry. 
Who more than he is worth doth spend, He makes a Rope his Life to end. 
A thousand Pounds, and a Bottle of Hay,  Is all one at Dooms-Day.  
If the Partridge had the Woodcock's Thigh,  'Twould be the best Bird that ever did fly. 
The Love of a Woman, and a Bottle of Wine,  Are sweet for a Season; but last a short Time.  
Be always as merry as ever you can; For no Man delights in a sorrowful Man. 
He that woos a Maid must come seldom in her Sight,  But he that woos a Widow, must woo her Day and Night.  
A Woman, a Spaniel, and a Walnut Tree, The more they're beaten, the better they be.  
There is no Mischief in the World done,  But a Woman is always one.  
A wicked Woman, and an Evil, Is three half-pence worse than the Devil. 
He that is needy, when he is married, Shall not be rich when he is buried. 
As the Goodman saith, so say we: But as the Goodwife saith, so it must be. 
Fair and foolish, black and proud; Long and lazy: little and loud. 
Maidens must be mild and meek; Swift to hear, and slow to speak. 
Remember Man and keep in Mind, A faithful Friend is hard to find. 
The more Haste, the worse Speed; Quoth the Taylor to his long Thread. 
The good, or ill hap of a good, or ill Life.  Is the good or ill Choice of a good or ill Wife.  
When I did well, I heard it never; When I did ill, I heard it ever. 
When the Fool finds a Horse-shoe, He thinks always so to do.  
Women, and Wine, Game, and Deceit, Make the Wealth small, and the Wants great. 
If Men would make haste when afoot, They need not put their Horses to't. 
What raging rashly is begun, Challengeth Shame, before half done. 
They that worship God meerly for Fear, Would worship the Devil too, if he appear. 
The higher the Plumb-tree, the riper the Plumb;  The richer the Cobler, the blacker his Thumb.  
When Adam delv'd, and Eve span, Pray where was then the Gentleman? 
He that buys Land, buys many Stones; He that buys Flesh, buys many Bones: He that buys Eggs, buys many Shells; But he that buys Ale, buys nothing else. 
Our Fathers who were wondrous wise, Did wash their Throats, before their Eyes. 
Break Coals; cut Candle; set Brand an end,  Neither good Housewife, nor good Housewife's Friend.  
No more Mortar, no more Brick: A crafty Knave has a cunning Trick. 
It would make a Man scratch where it doth not itch,  To see a Man live poor to die rich. 
He that hath more Smocks, than Shirts in a Bucking;  Had need be a Man of a good fore-looking. 
Money we want, and cannot borrow; Yet drink we must, to slacken Sorrow. 
Cold Broth hot again, that loved I never;  Old Love renew'd again, that loved I ever. 
Great Wits to Madness, sure, are near allyed,  And thin Partitions do their Bounds divide. 
Like Dogs that snarl about a Bone; And play together when they've none. 
He that gets Money before he gets Wit, Will be but a short while Master of it. 
His Wit got Wings, and would have flown;  But Poverty still kept him down, 
He has Wit at Will,  That with an angry Heart can hold him still.  
He that spends all upon a Whore, Both Shame and Sorrow must endure. 
It's God that feeds the Crows, That neither tills, harrows, nor sows. 
Know when to spend, and when to spare, And yon need not be busy; you'll ne'er be bare.  
The Tricks a Colt gets at his first breaking,  Will, whilst he liveth, never be lacking. 
He that leaves Certainty, and sticks to Chance,  When Fools pipe, he may dance. 
It's a good Horse that never stumbles; And a good Wife that never grumbles. 
The best Horse needs breaking; And the aptest Child needs teaching. 
He that buys a House ready wrought, Has many a Pin and Nail for nought. 
He that buys Lawn before he can fold it,  Shall repent him before he have sold it. 
Look well before you leap; For Snakes among the Flowers creep. 
He that will meddle with all Things, May go shoe the Goslings.  
If a Woman were as little as she is good;  A Peascod would make her a Gown and a Hood. 
Say well, and Do well, end with a Letter:  Say well is good; but Do well is better. 
Who goes more bare,  Than the Shoemaker's Wife; and the Smith's Mare!  
Who doth sing so merry a Note, As the Cobler, that cannot change a Groat! 
Good riding at two Anchors, Men have told;  For if one break, t'other may hold. 
The World was never so dull still, But if one won't another will. 
I wote well how the World wags; He is most lov'd, that hath most Bags. 
When the Cat winketh,  Little wots the Mouse, what the Cat thinketh.  
They that cobble and clout, Shall have work, when others go without. 
Who gives away Goods, before he be dead,  You should take a Beetle, and knock him at Head.  
Give a Child all he shall crave, And a Dog while his Tail doth wave; And you'll have a fair Dog, and foul Knave. 
It's hard to split the Hair, That nothing is wanted, and nothing to spare.  
He that winketh with one Eye, and seeth with t'other, I would not trust him, tho' he were my Brother.  
He that still gapeth, till he be fed, Well may he gape, untill he be dead. 
Tell me with whom thou goest, And I'll tell thee what thou doest. 
He that hears much, and speaks not all,  Shall be welcome both in Bower and Hall. 
Had I revenged every Wrong, I had not worn my Skirts so long. 
Many talk of Robin-Hood, that never shot in his Bow,  And many talk of little-John, that never did him know.  
Better ride, when Saddles do lack, On a Pad than on a bare Horse's Back. 
He that hath but little, he shall have less,  And he that hath right nought, right nought shall possess. 
If St. Swithin weep, that Year, the Proverb says,  The Weather will be foul for forty Days. 
If the first of July, it be rainy Weather,  'Twill rain more, or less, for four Weeks together.  
A Shower in July, when the Corn begins to fill,  Is worth a Plow of Oxen, and all belongs there till.  
Till St. James's Day be come and gone, You may have Hops, or you may have none. 
Is the twenty fourth of August be fair and clear,  Than hope for a prosperous Autumn that Year.  
When a Musician has forgot his Note, He makes as though a Crumb stuck in his Throat.  
Nothing more smooth than Glass, yet nothing more brittle; Nothing more fine than Wit, yet nothing more fickle.  
March balkham,  Comes in like a Lion, goes out like a Lamb. 
So many Mists as in March you see, So many Frosts in May will be. 
March many-Weathers rain'd and blow'd, But March Grass never did good. 
A Peck of March-Dust, and a Shower in May,  Makes the Corn green and the Fields gay. 
If you will have good Cheese, and have old,  You must turn him seven times, before he is cold.  
When Elder is white, brew and bake a Peck,  When Elder is black, brew and bake a Sack. 
Winter's Thunder and Summer's Flood, Never boded Englishman good,  
The Pigeon never knoweth Woe, But when she doth a benting go. 
This Rule in Gardening never forget, To sow dry, and set wet.  
When the Slow-Tree is as white as a Sheet.  Sow your Barley, whether it be dry or wet. 
If Janiveer's Calends be summerly gay, 